<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891004-0043 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-04-89.f2.A1042</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 191 / Wednesday, October 4, 1989/ Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Mine Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">30 CFR Parts 7, 70, and 75 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 1219-AA27 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Approval, Exposure Monitoring, and Safety Requirements for the Useof Diesel-Powered Equipment in Underground Coal Mines </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Mine Safety and Health Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>These proposed rules would establish new requirementsfor the approval of diesel engines and other related equipment used inunderground coal mines, establish exposure monitoring and reporting requirementsfor air sampling of gaseous diesel emissions by coal mine operators, andprovide safety standards for the use of diesel-powered equipment in undergroundcoal mines. The proposals are, in part, derived from existing regulationsin 30 CFR parts 18, 31, 32, 36, and 75 and are intended to provide protectionagainst explosion, fire and other safety and health hazards related tothe use of diesel-powered equipment. The proposed rules would also seekto amend certain equipment safety standards in existing part 75 that arenow applicable only to electric-powered equipment so that such standardswould apply, where necessary, to diesel-powered equipment as well. Thenew standards would be consistent with advances in mining technology, addressknown hazards not now covered by standards and provide reduced paperworkrequirements where possible.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Written comments must be submitted on or before January2, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Send written comments to the Mine Safety and Health Administration,Office of Standards, Regulations and Variances, Room 631, Ballston TowerNo. 3, 4015 Wilson Boulevard, Arlington, Virginia 22203. Copies of the``Report of the Mine Safety and Health Administration Advisory Committeeon Standards and Regulations for Diesel-Powered Equipment in UndergroundCoal Mines'' may be obtained from the same office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Patricia W. Silvey, Director,Office of Standards, Regulations and Variances, Mine Safety and HealthAdministration, telephone (703) 235-1910.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Summary and Rulemaking Background </ITAG>The Mine Safety and Health Administration is proposing to regulate theapproval and use of diesel-powered equipment in underground coal mines,and establish related health monitoring provisions. These proposals aremade under the authority of sections 101 and 508 of the Federal Mine Safetyand Health Act of 1977 (Mine Act), 30 U.S.C. 811 and 957. This proposalis based on the final report of the Mine Safety and Health Administration(MSHA) Advisory Committee on Standards and Regulations for Diesel-PoweredEquipment in Underground Coal Mines (Committee). On October 6, 1987, MSHA published a Notice of Establishment of the AdvisoryCommittee in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (52 FR 37381). The notice announced the Secretaryof Labor's (Secretary) finding that it was in the public interest to establishthe Committee to review standards and regulations related to the approvaland use of diesel-powered equipment in underground coal mines, and thatthe Secretary was considering the promulgation of standards and regulationsfor diesel-powered equipment. The Committee Charter was subsequently filedin compliance with the provisions of the Federal Advisory Committee Actand section 102(c) of the Mine Act. Nine Committee members were appointedby the Secretary, and notice of their appointment was published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on January 5, 1988 (53 FR 189). As required bythe Mine Act, the majority of members had no economic interests in thecoal or other mining industry, and were not operators, miners, or officersor employees of the Federal Government or any state or local government.Two of the Committee members represented the interests of the industry,and two of the Committee members represented the interests of labor. The nine Committee members provided a broad range of expertise in the areasof health, mine safety, and engineering. Two Committee members were medicaldoctors. One physician had experience in studying and treating pulmonaryoccupational diseases, and the other was a former public health officeras well as a private practitioner. Another Committee member was a certifiedindustrial hygienist with a doctoral degree in public health, and extensiveexperience studying and working for the occupational health needs of miners.One Committee member was a scientific researcher who conducted studiesto show the effects of diesel exhaust on laboratory animals. The Committeealso included a retired engineer who designed mining equipment for a largemining equipment manufacturing company and an engineer and college professorwho had researched the mechanics of diesel-powered engines in the undergroundmine environment. Also present as a Committee member was a health and safetyspecialist who had investigated health and safety related problems at mines.A mine operator with extensive experience operating a mine using diesel-poweredequipment was appointed to the Committee. The Chairman of the Committeehad served as the Deputy Director of the Bureau of Mines and also had yearsof management experience in several mining companies. The areas of expertiserepresented by the Committee members provided a body of experience andknowledge covering all mining topics which aided the group in reachingits conclusions and recommendations about diesel-powered equipment. Underthe Mine Act, the Committee was chartered for a 6-month term. The Committeemandate was to provide recommendations on three broad issue areas concerningequipment approval, safe use, and protection of miners' health. On January 4, 1988, a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 87) announced the date of the first Committeemeeting, and responded to comments received from interested parties onthe establishment of the Committee. The Advisory Committee held six meetings over a six-month period. Two supplementalvisits were made to underground coal mines where diesel equipment was inuse. Each Committee member visited at least one of the coal mines. By visitingthe coal mines, each member was able to see diesel-powered equipment inoperation. They observed the methods used to service and maintain the equipment,provide for fuel storage, and otherwise provide health and safety protectionsfor the miners at work underground.Several panel presentations of health and safety experts were given atmeetings in order to help provide information and data for the Committeeto consider in reaching its recommendations. At the third meeting of theCommittee, a panel of health experts presented the most recent studiesconcerning the possible carcinogenic effect of diesel exhaust exposure.The panel of experts also attempted to address how the information whichwas presented could be integrated in order to reach an objective estimationof the human risks to exposure. As a result of the health panel presentationsand in order to adequately address the health issues presented, the CommitteeChairman appointed a four-member Health Subcommittee. The Subcommitteemet several times in order to reach a conclusion on the recommendationconcerning diesel particulate. The fourth meeting of the Committee includeda panel of experts who provided information and data to the Committee concerningthe use of fire suppression systems as an alternative approach for addressingthe potential fire hazard of diesel-powered equipment for use in areaswhere permissible electric equipment is not required. At the Committee'sfifth meeting, a panel of 13 miners who worked with diesel-powered equipmentin underground coal mines presented their experiences and concerns withthe use of diesel-powered equipment including health effects, equipmenthazards, and training and maintenance needs. MSHA provided the Committee with a set of draft regulations covering theapproval of diesel engines and power packages, safety and use practices,and exposure monitoring. The Committee reviewed the information as a firststep in developing its recommendations. Several Committee members alsoprovided for consideration draft regulations for the safe use of diesel-poweredequipment and for exposure monitoring of gaseous diesel emissions. Initialpresentations were conducted for the Committee by MSHA, the National Institutefor Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) and the Bureau of Mines (BOM).The Committee received an overview of MSHA's Interagency Task Force Reportentitled, ``The Health and Safety Implications of the Use of Diesel-PoweredEquipment in Underground Coal Mines.'' During its deliberations, the Committee addressed three broad areas ofconcern: approval issues_issues concerning equipment design and performance;use issues_issues concerning the safe use of diesel equipment in the undergroundcoal mine environment; and health issues_issues concerning the evaluationand control of health hazards associated with diesel equipment. These areasare generally regulated by 30 CFR parts 7, 70, and 75. The Committee recognizedpotential hazards in a number of areas including safety hazards not presentwith electric equipment traditionally used in coal mines, fire hazardsattendant with the use of diesel-powered equipment, hazards involved inthe handling of fuel underground, and the acute and long-term effects ofdiesel exhaust on the health of the miners. Based on the information whichit examined, the Committee concurred that regulations should be promulgatedby MSHA to govern the approval and use of diesel-powered equipment in undergroundcoal mines and recommended that a number of specific areas be addressed.The Committee recommendations serve as the basis for this proposal. TheCommittee, as part of its transmittal letter transferring the Report tothe Secretary, stated that, ``[t]he actions which we suggest reflect ourbest judgment on how to ensure the safety and health of our nation's coalminers. We believe that the recommendations contained in [the] report areworthy of serious and immediate attention by the Department [of Labor].''The Committee's final report should be read in conjunction with the discussionof this proposed rule. Copies are available upon request from MSHA's Officeof Standards, Regulations, and Variances at the address listed above. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Discussion of Proposed Rules </ITAG>A. 30 CFR Part 7 General Discussion Approval requirements for diesel-powered equipment used in undergroundcoal mines are necessary to protect against mine fires and explosions,the risks of which are greater in coal mines due, in part, to the presenceof potentially explosive concentrations of methane and combustible dust.In underground coal mines, methane combined with sparks which may be presentfrom the internal combustion process, accumulation of combustible fuel,oil, and excessive heat on engine and power package surfaces, all contributeto the increased risk. Further, diesel exhaust may contribute to miners'exposure to harmful gases. Accordingly, MSHA is proposing to establishrequirements for testing and approval of diesel-powered equipment in undergroundcoal mines. Under the Mine Act, MSHA is required to approve certain products for usein underground mines. This approval indicates that these products havemet MSHA's specifications and test requirements, and have been designedand manufactured to ensure that the products will not present a fire, explosion,or other safety hazard related to use. The Committee was presented with an overview of the approval process. Historically,MSHA and its predecessor agencies have approved equipment intended foruse in areas of mines where methane and combustible dusts might providepossible sources of explosion or fire. During the approval process, equipmentis evaluated against a set of published technical requirements. Conformancewith design requirements is established by a detailed comparison of thedesign requirement against the finished product and the drawings providedby the manufacturers. Compliance with performance aspects of these requirementsis determined by testing the product and comparing the test results againstestablished criteria. If the product complies with the design and technicalperformance requirements, an MSHA approval is issued which is valid aslong as that product is built in accordance with the drawings and specifications.The Agency has established programs through which the manufacturer or purchasercan modify approved equipment after appropriate technical evaluation byMSHA. Diesel-powered equipment was first introduced in the United States intounderground coal mines in 1946 but did not attain significant use untilthe 1970's. In 1989, there were over 1500 diesel-powered units in use inover 120 coal mines across the United States. Because of the growth inuse of these machines, MSHA believes that regulations are necessary inorder to protect the safety and health of the nation's coal miners. Currently,MSHA under the authority of 30 CFR part 36, approves diesel-powered equipmentfor use in gassy non-coal mines under regulations requiring that certaintechnical requirements are met. In underground coal mines, mine ventilationplans specify the use of diesel-powered equipment approved as permissibleunder part 36 in areas of the mine where permissible electric equipmentis required. Thus, diesel-powered equipment for underground coal minesis generally approved under part 36. However, part 36 was originally developedfor gassy non-coal mines and does not address a number of more recent technicalimprovements in diesel technology. MSHA is seeking comments from interestedparties on the continued use of parts 31, 32, and 36 in underground coalmines, and the continued applicability of these parts to metal and nonmetalmines in light of the newly proposed requirements for diesel engines anddiesel power packages which are contained in this document. MSHA couldrevoke or revise parts 31, 32, or 36 and seeks information from all partsof the mining industry on how to best handle those approval requirements.This proposal provides new subparts for the testing and approval of dieselengines and power packages in underground coal mines. The Agency intendsthat, once these subparts would be published as a final rule, the use ofpart 36 equipment would be permitted according to the provisions of proposed30 CFR 75.1907. Part 36 could remain in effect for metal-nonmetal mines;however, MSHA specifically seeks comments from interested parties on thecontinued application of the part 36 approval regulations to metal-nonmetalmines and specifically requests comments on whether part 36 should be revisedor revoked and replaced in light of the new proposed approval regulationsfor diesel-powered equipment in underground coal mines. In preparation for the Advisory Committee, MSHA reviewed existing approvalrequirements for diesel-powered equipment and provided four draft documentsto serve as the basis for Advisory Committee discussions on the approvalissues. These documents included draft approval requirements developedunder part 7 for diesel engines and diesel power packages intended foruse in areas of coal mines, depending upon the hazard likely to be presentin the coal mine.For the proposed approval regulation, subpart E, category A engine requirementsand subpart F power package requirements are applied to products intendedfor use in an underground mine environment where methane may be encounteredand where combustible materials are present. Subpart E engine and subpartG power package approval requirements are applied to products for use inareas of the mine where no methane is expected to be present but wherecombustible materials are present. Separate approval requirements wereestablished for the engine since features affecting health and safety arecontrolled by the engine manufacturer. Certain other safety features suchas flame arresters, spark arresters, and water scrubbers must be addedto the engine to ensure that it can be operated safely in the coal mineenvironment. An engine in combination with these safety features is termeda diesel power package. A proposal for a separate approval was developedfor the power package because the power package manufacturer is normallya company other than the engine manufacturer and controls the assemblyof the power package. Approved diesel power packages can be incorporatedby equipment manufacturers into a wide variety of machines without theneed for further MSHA evaluation of power package features. MSHA thereforeintends that two approvals would be necessary: one for the engine and onefor the power package. At the time of the Committee's work, MSHA had not yet drafted proposalsfor the evaluation of the completely assembled unit of diesel-powered equipmentincorporating an approved power package. The MSHA drafts which were initiallyprovided to the Committee only specified the engine and power package requirements.Committee discussions also raised the issue of the scope of additionalfeatures which could be included in the approval requirements for the completelyassembled unit of equipment. The Committee recommended that an approvalprogram be established which would emphasize other equipment safety featureswhich could be readily addressed by an equipment manufacturer. These featurescould include the incorporation of a fuel system, exhaust gas dilutionsystem, fire suppression system, and appropriate electric and braking systems,and would address the interrelationship of all these systems and wouldprovide some safety advantages. For example, the location of the fuel systemmight be important in relation to the surface temperature encountered ona diesel power package. In order to carry out the Committee recommendation, MSHA has publishedan advance notice for proposed rulemaking (ANPRM) elsewhere in today's<T4>Federal Register</T4>. MSHA has not sought to propose approval requirementsat this time because the Agency is seeking further guidance on certainissues from the mining community. It should be noted that the ANPRM has referred to the approval requirementsfor diesel machines as subparts H and I to part 7. Subpart H would providean approval evaluation for diesel machines used where permissible electricequipment is required, and subpart I would provide an approval evaluationfor diesel machines used where permissible electric equipment is not required.In attempting to provide notice to the public about the interaction betweenthe proposed approval evaluation and the dates by which products wouldbe required to be evaluated under proposed andSection; 75.1907, the Agencyhas referred to the ANPRM part 7 subparts H and I in the proposed rulepublished in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The use of those subparts is meant as guidanceto the public on MSHA's intended application of those subparts and thetime schedule for their implementation on diesel-powered machinery usedin underground coal mines. The Committee endorsed the concept that approved diesel equipment be requiredin all areas of the mine where permissible electric equipment is required.This endorsement was based on the MSHA draft approval regulations providedto the Committee which essentially follow existing part 36 approval requirementsto protect equipment from potentially explosive concentrations of methanegas and combustible quantities of coal dust. Thus, subpart E, categoryA engines and subpart F of the proposal, dealing with diesel engines andpower packages respectively, were designed to apply to products intendedfor use in an underground mine environment where methane may be encounteredand where combustible materials are present. Conversely, the Committeerecommended that permissible diesel-powered equipment should not be requiredin outby areas where non-permissible electric equipment is allowed. Thisdelineation of where to require certain types of explosion-proof diesel-poweredequipment is based largely on the regulatory structure currently used byMSHA for electric equipment, and the fact that current safety standardsenforced by MSHA are designed to keep intake airways free of methane. Therefore,equipment used in these outby areas would not be exposed to explosive concentrationsof methane and would not need to have explosion protection features. The need to approve diesel-powered equipment, except for the limited classwhich is addressed below, for use in outby areas is a concept which theCommittee directly recommended based on the MSHA draft regulation originallysubmitted to the Committee. MSHA is proposing approval programs for outbydiesel-powered equipment. Subpart E, category B engines and subpart G powerpackages are designed to apply to engines and power packages for use inareas of the mine where no methane is expected to be present, but combustiblematerials are present. MSHA specifically solicits comments on whether outbydiesel-powered equipment should be approved. The proposals for the diesel engine and power package and the advance noticeof proposed rulemaking (ANPRM) for the machine approval have been includedunder part 7. In establishing the part 7 concept, MSHA anticipated proposingadditional subparts for products that have characteristics suitable forapplicant or third party testing because the tests can be objectively runin a routine and readily reproducible manner, without any elements of subjectiveanalysis. Products whose testing and evaluation depend upon the experience,judgment and knowledge of Agency personnel would not be candidates forpart 7 subparts. In light of these factors, MSHA solicits comments on thesuitability of diesel engines, power packages and machine approvals underpart 7. An alternative could be development of approval requirements callingfor MSHA testing and evaluation based on applicant submissions of productsamples and technical data or a program combining features of part 7 andother approval programs. A major recommendation made by the Committee was to establish a categoryof ``limited class'' outby equipment which, instead of surface temperaturecontrols, would have fire prevention features such as special fuel systemprotection, fire suppression systems and an engine compartment air temperaturesensor with the capability to shut down the engine. They also recommendedthis be accomplished without a formal part 7 approval program. This recommendationis addressed more completely under part 75. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Topic-by-Topic Discussion of 30 CFR part 7 subpart E </ITAG><T3>Section 7.81 Purpose and Effective Date. </T3>Proposed subpart E wouldestablish specific requirements for approval of all diesel engines intendedfor use in underground coal mines. That is, this subpart would establishengine performance and exhaust emission requirements for approval of dieselengines in areas of underground coal mines where permissible electric equipmentis required, and where nonpermissible electric equipment is allowed. Aneffective date would also be set for implementation of the regulation.<T3>Section 7.82 Definitions.</T3> Section 7.82 would set out the definitionswhich apply in subpart E. The definitions are specific to this subpart.They are designed to clarify the requirements of subpart E and apply toapprovals for diesel engines in areas of mines where permissible electricequipment is required and where nonpermissible electric equipment is allowed.Category A engines would be defined as engines intended for use in areasof underground coal mines where permissible electric equipment is required.Category B engines would be defined as engines intended for use in areasof underground coal mines where nonpermissible electric equipment is permitted.<T3>Section 7.83 Application Requirements.</T3> Under the proposed rule,an application for approval of a subpart E diesel engine would containsufficient information to demonstrate compliance with the technical requirementsof this subpart. The application would be accompanied by a general arrangementdrawing, detail drawings of emission related parts, and a drawing listthat would identify the drawings which are to be included as part of theapproval process. A statement would also be required which specifies whetherthe approval application is for a category A engine or a category B engine.This section of the proposed rule would allow applicants to submit compositedrawings in lieu of individual drawings. The use of composite drawingswould allow manufacturers flexibility in their drawing system. The proposedrule would also provide for the submission of certain information whichwould become part of the approval documentation after approval testinghas been completed. Some information on the diesel engine cannot be determined prior to performingthe approval tests. The information would include the ventilation rate,particulate index, and the fuel deration chart for altitude. The ventilationrate and fuel deration chart would be documented in the approval letterand on the approval marking under andSection; 7.90. The particulate indexwould be documented in the approval letter. The information is necessaryto ensure that the diesel engine would be operated properly and sufficientventilating air would be available to provide miners with protection againstoverexposure to the diesel engine's gaseous and particulate exhaust emissions.The addition of the particulate index would provide miners some healthbenefits. <T3>Section 7.84 Technical Requirements.</T3> Proposed andSection; 7.84 wouldlist the specific technical requirements for both category A and categoryB engines necessary to ensure that the diesel engine's gaseous and particulateexhaust emissions are controlled and would provide protection against overexposureof the miner to these contaminants. The technical requirements for thegaseous emissions are based on the applicable sections of the existingrequirements in 30 CFR part 36. The technical requirement for a dieselparticulate index would be new. These requirements would provide a healthbenefit to miners. The proposal would address the design requirements of the fuel injectionsystem that affect the performance and emission characteristics of thediesel engine. The requirement would also prevent unauthorized changesor adjustments to the fuel system which would help ensure the integrityof the fuel system. The Advisory Committee recommended that limits be placed on the gaseouspollutants to achieve a basically clean engine. The proposal limits themaximum levels of carbon monoxide and oxides of nitrogen (nitric oxideand nitrogen dioxide). The limit for oxides of nitrogen for category Bengines is a new requirement for outby engines although it is based onandSection; 36.26(b). These limits were derived from existing andSection;andSection;36.26(b) and 32.4(f) and have been used by MSHA for many years in approvingdiesel equipment. These limits have proven to be effective in providinga clean burning engine, and would provide health benefits to undergroundcoal miners. The Advisory Committee addressed the issue that for each engine model,a ventilation rate would be established that indicates the amount of airrequired to dilute carbon monoxide, nitric oxide, nitrogen dioxide, andcarbon dioxide to the (8-hour) air quality standard level. A nameplateairflow quantity will be determined for each speed and horsepower ratingrequested by the applicant. The proposal would require that a fuel deration chart be developed to ensurethat when the engine is performing at higher altitudes, the gaseous componentsof carbon monoxide and oxides of nitrogen at the maximum fuel-air ratioremain below the specified levels stated. The Advisory Committee recommended that the particulate emissions shouldbe evaluated based on engine emission data. The proposal would establisha particulate index that would report the air quantity necessary for dilutionof the diesel particulate matter to one milligram of diesel particulateper cubic meter of air for each speed and horsepower rating requested bythe applicant. The amount of particulate matter would be determined byoperating the diesel engine at 10 steady state conditions, introducingthe exhaust gas into a dilution tunnel, and collecting a particulate samplefrom the diluted exhaust gas on a filter. The establishment of the particulateindex would provide a health benefit to miners. <T3>Section 7.85 Critical Characteristics.</T3> Proposed andSection; 7.85would list the critical characteristics that must be inspected or testedon each subpart E diesel engine prior to shipment or use. This would ensurethat the performance and emission characteristics of production enginesare equivalent to the performance and emission characteristics of the laboratorytest engine. This section would help to provide protection to the mineragainst overexposure to the diesel engine's gaseous and particulate exhaustemissions.<T3>Section 7.86 Test Equipment and Specifications. </T3>Proposed andSection;7.86 would describe the principal equipment required to perform the approvaltests and would divide the test equipment into three main areas: (1) dynamometertest cell; (2) gaseous emission sampling system; (3) particulate samplingsystem. For each area, the proposal would give specifications for the testapparatus and standard laboratory test conditions. Where appropriate, specificrequirements are outlined for either category A engines or category B engines.The apparatus used for the dynamometer test cell and gaseous emission samplingsystem has been successfully used in the MSHA laboratory for many yearsand is typical of the equipment used by diesel engine manufacturers. Theapparatus used for the particulate sampling system would be new and isbased on the Advisory Committee's recommendation that the particulate emissionsshould be evaluated. Most manufacturers of diesel engines used for over-the-roadapplications and engine emissions laboratories use this apparatus to complywith existing Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) particulate emissionrequirements for that type of engine. The apparatus used for the particulatesampling system was derived from specifications meeting EPA requirementsin 40 CFR part 86.13l0-88. <T3>Section 7.87 Test for Determination of Maximum Fuel-Air Ratio. </T3>ProposedandSection; 7.87 would describe the test for determination of the maximumfuel-air ratio as referenced in the technical requirements, andSection; 7.84(b).Where appropriate, specific requirements are outlined for either categoryA engines or category B engines. The test would determine the maximum concentrationsof carbon monoxide and oxides of nitrogen throughout the manufacturer'sspecified operational range of the engine. If the prescribed levels arenot exceeded, then the manufacturer's specified maximum fuel-air ratiois allowed. If the prescribed levels are exceeded, the engine manufacturermust modify the engine to conform to the requirements. The proposal wouldrequire that the tests be conducted using the equipment specified in proposedandSection;andSection; 7.86(a) and 7.86(b). The test procedure specified inthe proposal would provide repeatable and reliable test results. The testprocedure is currently used by MSHA for certification tests under 30 CFRpart 36 except for the percent of methane injected into the engine intakeair system. Existing part 36 specifies 1.5 percent by volume methane, whereasthe proposal would specify 1.0 percent by volume methane. The 1.0 percentconcentration would be proposed for consistency with existing part 75,which requires changes or adjustments in the mine ventilation when 1.0percent methane or more is detected. <T3>Section 7.88 Test for Determination of Ventilation Rate. </T3>ProposedandSection; 7.88 would describe the test for determination of a ventilationrate as referenced in the technical requirements, andSection; 7.84(c). Whereappropriate, specific requirements are outlined for either category A enginesor category B engines. The test would determine the raw exhaust gas concentrationof carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, nitric oxide, nitrogen dioxide, andmethane in the exhaust. The proposal would specify the test equipment and operating parametersrequired as discussed in andSection; 7.87. Using the laboratory test dataand calculations specified, ventilation numbers would be determined foreach gas component at the (8-hour) air quality standard level. The proposalwould specify a method for determining the ventilation rate which wouldrepresent the gaseous nameplate ventilation rate for the engine. This test would help ensure that correct quantities of ventilating airare provided to give miners protection against overexposure to the dieselengine's gaseous emissions. <T3>Section 7.89 Test for Determination of Particulate Index. </T3>ProposedandSection; 7.89 would describe the test for determination of a particulateindex as referenced in proposed andSection; 7.84(e). Where appropriate, specificrequirements are outlined for category A engines. The test would be performedto determine the concentration of diesel particulate matter. This concentrationof particulate matter collected would be an equal weighted, average particulateemission generated from the engine at several steady-state speed and horsepowerconditions. This type of test would represent average engine conditionsthat would be experienced by miners during normal operation of the dieselengine. The proposal would require that the test be conducted using theequipment specified in proposed andSection;andSection; 7.86(a) and 7.86(c).The proposal would give the calculations required and give a method ofdetermining the particulate index. The particulate index would be expressedas a ventilation number and, as recommended by the Advisory Committee,be used by mine operators for mine system design and by MSHA as a basisfor evaluating and approving minimum air quantities in mine ventilationplans. <T3>Section 7.90 Approval Marking. </T3>Proposed andSection; 7.90 would requirea legible and permanent approval plate with the assigned MSHA approvalnumber, ventilation rate, and pertinent engine information inscribed. Thisplate would be required to be securely attached to the subpart E dieselengine. The proposal would allow identification of approved subpart E dieselengines in a manner that facilitates field identification of the engineas approved by MSHA. <T3>Section 7.91 Post-Approval Product Audit. </T3>Proposed andSection; 7.91would require an approval holder, upon request, to supply to MSHA at nocost an approved subpart E diesel engine for audit. This request wouldbe made no more than once a year by MSHA, except for cause. MSHA couldalso obtain subpart E diesel engines for audit from the approval holderor other sources such as mine suppliers or equipment distributors any timeat MSHA expense, and under existing andSection; 7.8(b) the approval holdermay observe any tests conducted under the audit. <T3>Section 7.92 New Technology. </T3>Section 7.92 of the proposal wouldallow approval of subpart E diesel engines that incorporate technologyfor which the specific requirements of subpart E are not appropriate, ifMSHA determines that the diesel engine is as safe as those which meet therequirements of this subpart. This section of the proposal would applyto either new technology or new applications of existing technology tosubpart E diesel engines. In order to implement this provision, MSHA wouldprescribe appropriate technical requirements and test procedures when suchapproval is sought. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Topic-by-Topic Discussion of 30 CFR Part 7 Subpart F </ITAG><T3>Section 7.95 Purpose and Effective Date. </T3>Proposed subpart F wouldestablish specific requirements for MSHA approval of diesel power packagesintended for use in areas of underground coal mines where permissible electricequipment is required. It would also set an effective date for implementationof the regulation. <T3>Section 7.96 Definitions. </T3>Section 7.96 would set out the definitionswhich apply in subpart F. The definitions are specific to this subpartand do not apply to any other subpart. They are designed to clarify therequirements of subpart F and apply to approvals for diesel power packagesin areas of mines where permissible electric equipment is required. <T3>Section 7.97 Application Requirements. </T3>Under the proposed rule,an application for approval of a subpart F diesel power package would containsufficient information to demonstrate compliance with the technical requirementsof this subpart. The application would be accompanied by a general arrangementdrawing, detail and assembly drawings of certain parts and system components,a power package checklist, documentation showing that applicable electricalsystems and components have been previously approved, and a drawing listthat would identify the drawings which are to be included as part of theapproval process. This section of the proposed rule would allow applicants to submit compositedrawings in lieu of individual drawings. The use of composite drawingswould allow manufacturers flexibility in their drawing systems. The proposed rule would also provide for the submission of certain informationwhich would become part of the approval documentation after approval testinghas been completed. Some specifications of the diesel power package designcannot be determined prior to performing the approval tests. These specificationswould include the settings of adjustable sensors and devices utilized onthe diesel power package to meet the test requirements and the operatinglimitations of the equipment. These specifications are necessary to ensure that the fire and explosionproof characteristics of the diesel power package are maintained. This section would also require the applicant to submit a finalized versionof the power package checklist because the checklist submitted with theinitial application may not include the proper settings as determined bythe approval testing. <T3>Section 7.98 Technical Requirements. </T3>The technical requirementsspecified by this section are intended to ensure that the diesel enginecan be operated without creating a fire or explosion hazard. This sectionfollows the Advisory Committee recommendation that permissible diesel-poweredequipment be required in areas of coal mines where permissible electricequipment is required. These technical requirements would provide the sameprotection to diesel-powered equipment as is presently provided by permissibleelectric equipment. The primary hazards in these areas would be explosiveconcentrations of methane gas and combustible quantities of coal dust.These technical requirements are largely derived from 30 CFR part 36 whichestablished requirements for diesel-powered equipment in gassy, non-coalmines. They have been modified to address the presence of combustible coaldust by reducing the maximum allowable surface temperature to 302 anddegrees;F(150 anddegrees;C). That maximum surface temperature is the same as is requiredfor permissible electric equipment. Other detailed requirements would be specified to ensure that flame arresting,spark arresting, and surface temperature limiting features are provided.<T3>Section 7.99 Critical Characteristics. </T3>Proposed andSection; 7.99would list the critical characteristics that must be inspected or testedon each subpart F diesel power package prior to shipment or use to ensurethat the diesel power package will not create an explosion or fire hazard,produce hazardous levels of emissions or diesel particulate, or be a safetyhazard. This list of critical characteristics was developed using the applicablesections of the detailed technical requirements, andSection; 7.98, and theproposed application requirements, andSection; 7.97. <T3>Section 7.100 Explosion Tests. </T3>Proposed andSection; 7.100 woulddescribe the explosion tests to be performed as referenced in the proposedtechnical requirements, andSection; 7.98. This proposal is derived from existingandSection; 36.46, and retains requirements for explosion testing of theintake and exhaust systems to determine the adequacy of the flame arrestersand joints in preventing propagation of an explosion. It also evaluatesthe ability of the intake and exhaust system components to withstand internalexplosions without permanent deformation, passage of flames, or glowingparticles. Additionally, the proposal would determine the lowest waterlevel of the exhaust conditioner where it would act as an effective flamearrester, and the peak explosion pressures in each segment of the intakeand exhaust system. <T3>Section 7.101 Surface Temperature Tests. </T3>Proposed andSection; 7.101would describe the surface temperature tests to be performed as referencedin the proposed technical requirements, andSection; 7.98. The requirementfor these tests are retained from existing andSection; 36.48, which requirestesting of the surface temperatures of components. The surface temperaturetests would be used to determine if the temperature of any surface of thesubpart F diesel power package exceeds 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C).Because this machinery would operate in underground mine environments wherecombustible materials are present, a surface temperature of 302 anddegrees;F(150 anddegrees;C) or less would be necessary to avoid a potential fire hazard.<T3>Section 7.102 Exhaust Gas Cooling Efficiency Test. </T3>Proposed andSection;7.102 would describe the exhaust gas cooling efficiency test to be performedas referenced in the proposed technical requirements, andSection; 7.98. Thisrequirement is retained from existing andSection; 36.47 which requires testingof the exhaust gas cooling system. This test would be performed to determinewhether the exhaust conditioner functions effectively and cools the exhaustgas below 170 anddegrees;F (76 anddegrees;C) when operating under the specifiedconditions. <T3>Section 7.103 Safety System Controls Test. </T3>Proposed andSection;7.103 would describe the tests which must be conducted to ensure that allthe safety system controls are properly designed for the system and arefunctioning properly. This requirement is retained from existing andSection;36.47 which specifies tests for specific safety sensors. The safety systemcontrols include a variety of sensors, shutdown devices, and power packagefeatures that ensure that the engine is operating without creating a fireor explosion hazard.One of the sensors evaluated during these tests is the exhaust gas temperaturesensor. This device would shut the engine down before the exhaust gas temperatureexceeds 185 anddegrees;F (85 anddegrees;C). This sensor is a device used inaddition to the low water level shutdown and ensures that flame arrestingprotection is provided in the exhaust system should the low water levelsensor fail to function. The Advisory Committee specifically recommendedthat this device be provided. <T3>Section 7.104 Internal Static Pressure Test.</T3> Proposed andSection;7.104 would describe the internal static pressure test that would be performedto determine if the designs of the intake and exhaust system componentsare structurally sound as referenced in the technical requirements, andSection;7.98, and the explosion tests, andSection; 7.100. Included are installation procedures, instrumentation specifications, proceduresfor conducting the tests, and criteria for evaluating the test results.The specified procedures are intended to ensure that test results are reliable,repeatable and consistent. MSHA has designed all of the procedures to be easily understood by applicantswho may choose to conduct their own testing, or by third party testingfacilities, under 30 CFR part 7. <T3>Section 7.105 Approval Marking.</T3> Section 7.105 of the proposalwould require a legible and permanent approval plate with the assignedMSHA approval number and the exhaust conditioner grade limitation inscribed.This plate would be required to be securely attached to the subpart F dieselpower package in a way that would not impair any explosion proof characteristicsof the machine. The proposal would allow identification of approved subpartF diesel power packages in a manner that facilitates field identificationof the machine as approved by MSHA, and would restrict operation of themachine to the maximum grade specified on the approval plate. <T3>Section 7.106 Post-Approval Product Audit.</T3> Proposed andSection;7.106 would require an approval holder, upon request, to supply to MSHAat no cost an approved subpart F diesel power package for audit. This requestwould be made no more than once a year by MSHA, except for cause. MSHAcould also obtain subpart F diesel power packages for audit from the approvalholder or other sources such as mine suppliers or equipment distributorsanytime at MSHA expense, and under existing andSection; 7.8(b) the approvalholder may observe any tests conducted under the audit. <T3>Section 7.107 New Technology.</T3> Section 7.107 of the proposal wouldallow approval of subpart F diesel power packages that incorporate technologyfor which the specific requirements of subpart F are not appropriate, ifMSHA determines that the diesel power package is as safe as those whichmeet the requirements of this subpart. This section of the proposal wouldapply to either new technology or new applications of existing technologyto subpart F diesel power packages. In order to implement this provision,MSHA would prescribe appropriate technical requirements and test procedureswhen such approval is sought. <T3>Section 7.108 Power Package Checklist.</T3> Proposed andSection; 7.108would provide that the approval holder provide with each approved dieselpower package, a power package checklist which identifies the featuresthat must be checked or tested to determine if the subpart F diesel powerpackage is in approved condition. MSHA envisions that this checklist wouldidentify many of the critical characteristics specified in andSection; 7.99.The checklist would also include the tests that would be performed to ensurethat the safety shutdown system devices are functioning properly. Illustrationswould be required to assist the user in identifying specific features onthe diesel power package. Although proposed 30 CFR part 75 maintenancerequirements would require the use of these checklists in equipment maintenanceprograms, MSHA does not intend that the subpart F power package checklistbe used as a maintenance manual. It would be provided in addition to themanufacturer's maintenance manual. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Topic-by-Topic Discussion of 30 CFR part 7 Subpart G </ITAG><T3>Section 7.111 Purpose and Effective Date.</T3> Proposed subpart G wouldestablish specific requirements for MSHA approval of diesel power packagesintended for use in areas of underground coal mines where permissible electricequipment is not required. It would also set an effective date for implementationof the regulation. <T3>Section 7.112 Definitions.</T3> Section 7.112 would set out the definitionswhich apply in subpart G. The definitions are specific to this subpartand do not apply to any other subpart. They are designed to clarify therequirements of subpart G and apply to approvals for diesel power packagesin areas of mines where permissible electric equipment is not required.<T3>Section 7.113 Application Requirements.</T3> Under the proposed rule,an application for approval of a subpart G diesel power package would containsufficient information to demonstrate compliance with the technical requirementsof this subpart. The application would be accompanied by a general arrangementdrawing, detail and assembly drawings of certain parts and system components,a power package checklist, and a drawing list that would identify the drawingswhich are to be included as part of the approval process. This section of the proposed rule would allow applicants to submit compositedrawings in lieu of individual drawings. The use of composite drawingswould allow manufacturers flexibility in their drawing systems. The proposed rule would also provide for the submission of certain informationwhich would become part of the approval documentation after approval testinghas been completed. Some specifications of the diesel power package designcannot be determined prior to performing the approval tests. These specificationswould include the settings of adjustable sensors and devices utilized onthe diesel power package to meet the test requirements and the operatinglimitations of the equipment. These specifications are necessary to ensure that the characteristics ofthe diesel power package which provide fire protection are maintained.This section would also require the applicant to submit a finalized versionof the power package checklist because the checklist submitted with theinitial application may not include the proper settings as determined bythe approval testing. <T3>Section 7.114 Technical Requirements.</T3> The technical requirementsspecified by this section are intended to ensure that the diesel enginecan be operated without creating a fire hazard. This section follows theAdvisory Committee recommendation that surface temperature controls berequired on all diesel-powered equipment (except limited class equipment)operating in areas of mines where nonpermissible electric equipment isallowed. The surface temperature controls would maintain external surfacesof the diesel power package below temperatures that could ignite combustiblematerials. The primary hazard in these areas would be combustible quantitiesof coal dust. The technical requirements are largely derived from existingpart 36 which established requirements for diesel-powered equipment ingassy, non-coal mines. The requirements have been modified by eliminatingthe explosion proof requirements to address the outby areas of mines whereexplosive concentrations of methane are not present and by reducing themaximum allowable surface temperature to 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C)to address the presence of combustible coal dust. Other detailed requirements would be specified to ensure that surface temperaturelimiting features are provided. <T3>Section 7.115 Critical Characteristics.</T3> Proposed andSection; 7.115would list the critical characteristics that must be inspected or testedon each subpart G diesel power package prior to shipment or use to ensurethat the diesel power package will not create a fire hazard, produce hazardouslevels of emissions or particulate, or be a safety hazard. This list ofcritical characteristics was developed using the applicable sections ofthe detailed technical requirements, andSection; 7.114, and the proposedapplication requirements, andSection; 7.113. <T3>Section 7.116 Surface Temperature Tests.</T3> Proposed andSection; 7.116would describe the surface temperature tests to be performed as referencedin the proposed technical requirements, andSection; 7.114. The requirementsfor these tests are retained from existing andSection; 36.48, which requirestesting of the surface temperatures of components. The surface temperaturetests would be necessary to determine if the temperature of any surfaceof the subpart G diesel power package exceeds 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C).Because this machinery would operate in underground mine environments wherecombustible materials are present, a surface temperature of 302 anddegrees;F(150 anddegrees;C) or less would be necessary to avoid a potential fire hazard.<T3>Section 7.117 Exhaust Gas Cooling Efficiency Test.</T3> Proposed andSection;7.117 would describe the exhaust gas cooling efficiency test that wouldbe performed as referenced in the proposed technical requirements, andSection;7.114. This requirement is retained from existing andSection; 36.47 whichrequires testing of the exhaust gas cooling system. This test would beperformed to determine whether the exhaust conditioner functions effectivelyand cools the exhaust gas below 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C) when operatingunder the specified conditions. <T3>Section 7.118 Safety System Controls Test.</T3> Proposed andSection;7.118 would describe the tests which must be conducted to ensure that allthe safety system controls are properly designed for the system and arefunctioning properly. This requirement is retained from existing andSection;36.47 which specifies tests for specific safety sensors. The safety systemcontrols include a variety of sensors, shutdown devices, and power packagefeatures that ensure that the engine is operating without creating a firehazard. Included are installation procedures, instrumentation specifications, proceduresfor conducting the tests and criteria for evaluating the test results.The specified procedures are intended to ensure that test results are reliable,repeatable and consistent.MSHA has designed all of the procedures to be easily understood by applicantswho may choose to conduct their own testing, or by third party testingfacilities, under 30 CFR part 7. <T3>Section 7.119 Approval Marking. </T3>Section 7.119 of the proposalwould require a legible and permanent approval plate with the assignedMSHA approval number inscribed. This plate would be required to be securelyattached to the subpart G diesel power package. The proposal would allowidentification of approved subpart G diesel power packages in a mannerthat facilitates field identification of the machine as approved by MSHA.<T3>Section 7.120 Post-Approval Product Audit. </T3>Proposed andSection;7.120 would require an approval holder, upon request, to supply to MSHAat no cost an approved subpart G diesel power package for audit. This requestwould be made no more than once a year by MSHA, except for cause. MSHAcould also obtain subpart G diesel power packages for audit from the approvalholder or other sources such as mine suppliers or equipment distributorsanytime at MSHA expense, and under existing andSection; 7.8(b) the approvalholder may observe any tests conducted under the audit. <T3>Section 7.121 New Technology. </T3>Section 7.121 of the proposal wouldallow approval of subpart G diesel power packages that incorporate technologyfor which the specific requirements of subpart G are not appropriate, ifMSHA determines that the diesel power package is as safe as those whichmeet the requirements of this subpart. This section of the proposal wouldapply to either new technology or new applications of existing technologyto subpart G diesel power packages. In order to implement this provision,MSHA would prescribe appropriate technical requirements and test procedureswhen such approval is sought. <T3>Section 7.122 Power Package Checklist. </T3>Proposed andSection; 7.122would provide that the approval holder provide with each approved dieselpower package, a power package checklist which identifies the featuresthat must be checked or tested to determine if the subpart G diesel powerpackage is in approved condition. MSHA envisions that this checklist wouldidentify many of the critical characteristics specified in andSection; 7.115.The checklist would also include the tests that would be performed to ensurethat the safety shutdown system devices are functioning properly. Illustrationswould be required to assist the user in identifying specific features onthe diesel power package. Although proposed 30 CFR part 75 maintenancerequirements would require the use of these checklists in equipment maintenanceprograms, MSHA does not intend that the subpart G power package checklistbe used as a maintenance manual. It would be provided in addition to themanufacturer's maintenance manual. B. 30 CFR Part 70 Discussion From the beginning of its assignment, the Committee regarded the healtheffects of diesel exhaust as a key area to be addressed in its deliberations.At the same time, the Committee expressed concern about the ability toassess all the health effects of diesel exhaust based on the limited amountof data available at that time. As part of its introductory materials,MSHA gave each Committee member a draft regulation on occupational exposurelimits and environmental monitoring. The staff representative from NIOSHpresented some information on the health effects of exposure to dieselemissions. The Committee requested additional information from expertsand the Committee Chairman appointed one member to organize a panel ofhealth and research experts in the field of diesel exhaust. The panel wasconvened at the third Committee meeting where health issues were extensivelydiscussed. The Committee Chairman appointed a special subcommittee to determinewhether an exposure level of diesel particulate could be recommended andhow the diesel particulate could be controlled and monitored. The Committeeadopted the subcommittee's report and recommendations. In its final recommendations, the Committee emphasized the importance ofthe health implications of diesel exhaust relating to both the gaseousand particulate components. Based on available information that whole diesel exhaust represents a probablerisk for causing human lung cancer, the Committee recommended that MSHAregulate the use of diesels in underground coal mines to protect the healthof miners. The Committee recommended regulation by monitoring and controllingthe diesel particulate, but could not recommend a specific level of exposurebased on the existing data and current available technology for monitoringthe amount of diesel particulate in underground coal mines. Following theCommittee's decision not to provide a recommendation, MSHA is not proposinga standard to set a specific exposure level for the diesel particulateat this time. In August 1988 after the Committee's report was submitted to the Secretary,the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health issued its ``CurrentIntelligence Bulletin 50'' on the carcinogenic effects of exposure to dieselexhaust. NIOSH recommended that whole diesel exhaust be regarded as a potentialoccupational carcinogen in conformance with the cancer policy of the OccupationalSafety and Health Administration. Regulatory action to deal with diesel exhaust as a probable human carcinogenwould involve two primary components: quantification of its potential effecton workers and development of a means to determine the levels at whichdiesel exhaust is present in the workplace. Soon after receipt of the Committee'srecommendations, MSHA began to coordinate research efforts with NIOSH andthe Bureau of Mines (BOM) in order to determine at what diesel particulateexposure levels health effects occur, and how to develop a sampling strategyfor the diesel particulate. MSHA and BOM are testing and evaluating a samplingmethod for the detection of diesel particulate in underground coal mines.NIOSH is in the initial steps of conducting a risk assessment based uponanimal study data. These steps are being taken as a result of the Committee'srecommendations. MSHA believes that the NIOSH risk assessment is an important step in thedevelopment of a particulate standard for diesel emissions. Because therisk assessment could form the basis on which to develop a standard, MSHAwill make the risk assessment available for public comment soon after itis received from NIOSH. The risk assessment should be available from NIOSHby early 1990. The Committee recommended that control of the diesel particulate undergroundcould be accomplished by several means including fuel requirements, equipmentdesign, and in-mine controls such as the ventilation system and equipmentmaintenance. The Committee recommended that particulate emissions be evaluatedthrough the machine approval process by determining the appropriate airquantity for dilution of particulate emissions and reporting that quantityas an index of that necessary for dilution to one milligram of diesel particulateper cubic meter of air. That ventilation rate could then be used for minesystem design and as a basis for evaluating and approving minimum air quantitiesin mine ventilation plans. MSHA has implemented the Committee's recommendedapproach in the proposals for 30 CFR part 7, subpart E (approval schedulefor diesel engines) and 30 CFR part 75 (fuel, ventilating air requirementsand equipment maintenance requirements).MSHA believes that the proposed rule provisions that address diesel engineapproval, fuel, ventilating air, a particulate index, and better equipmentmaintenance will result in cleaner running diesel engines, lowering theamount of potentially harmful diesel emissions. These requirements wouldprovide a health benefit to miners. Discussions on those specific proposals are found elsewhere in this document.MSHA expects to address the question surrounding exposure levels of thediesel particulate in a later rulemaking after the available data are morefully evaluated. The Advisory Committee recommended that exposure limits for the gaseouscontaminants in diesel exhaust should not be unique from the exposure limitsset for the same contaminants generated by other mining sources such asblasting. In line with that recommendation, MSHA's air quality proposedrule published on August 29, 1989 (54 FR 35760), includes permissible exposurelimits for carbon dioxide, carbon monoxide, nitric oxide, nitrogen dioxide,and sulfur dioxide. The Agency intends that the permissible exposure limitsarrived at through the air quality rulemaking will address the hazardsto miners posed by such gases, regardless of their source. Because of theparticular importance of such standards to miners exposed to diesel exhaust,the Agency further intends that the air quality rulemaking will be finalby the time that this rulemaking on the approval of and monitoring requirementsfor diesel equipment is complete. Another recommendation made by the Committee concerns the approach thatMSHA should use in exposure monitoring for gaseous emissions. The Committeerecommended that mine operators should be required to periodically samplefor oxides of nitrogen (NO and NO<T2>2</T2>) and carbon monoxide (CO). In addition, sulfur dioxide (SO<T2>2</T2>) would be sampled when diesel fuel was in use that containedmore than 0.25 percent of sulfur. The Committee further recommended thatMSHA should develop a sampling strategy that uses return air sampling totrigger personal exposure monitoring. These recommendations would be implementedby MSHA's proposals for andSection;andSection; 70.1900 and 70.1901. The proposed requirements would follow the Committee's recommendation formine operators to take representative samples of carbon monoxide (CO),nitric oxide (NO) and nitrogen dioxide (NO<T2>2</T2>). Those samples would be taken in the ventilation return airwayson a weekly basis. The proposal to require sampling in the return airway is based on knowledgeof the specific operation of equipment underground and the behavior ofgaseous emissions generated by these machines. Because, for example, nitrogendioxide generated by the diesel equipment would be found in the immediatereturn airway of a section where diesel-powered equipment was in use, itis therefore logical to sample the immediate return airway on a consistentbasis as a trigger to personal exposure monitoring. If the sample takenin the immediate return was not high enough to trigger personal sampling,no personal exposure monitoring would be required at that time. Personalexposure monitoring would therefore be reduced in frequency provided thatthe weekly samples did not exceed 50 percent of the permissible exposurelimit (PEL) for any of the gases required. Samples exceeding 50 percentof the PEL, as referenced in proposed andSection; 72.100, would trigger personalexposure monitoring by the mine operator. It should be noted that the revisedair quality standards for coal and metal-nonmetal mines presently underdevelopment would update the threshold limit values (TLVs) currently foundin existing andSection; 75.301-2 and refer to those values as ``permissibleexposure limits'' (PELs). For consistency, MSHA incorporated the genericair monitoring proposal found in the proposed air quality standards withthe area and personal monitoring requirements found in proposed andSection;andSection;70.1900 and 70.1901 which are published today. Thus, proposed andSection;andSection;72.100 and 72.200, which are referenced in today's proposal can be foundat 54 FR 35829-35830 (August 29, 1989). MSHA specifically solicits commentsfrom interested persons on today's proposal and the appropriate interrelationshipof the area and personal exposure monitoring provisions to the proposedair quality rules. Once the personal monitoring requirements are triggered, mine operatorswould be required by andSection; 70.1901 to monitor the personal exposureof miners which would be representative of affected miners, exposure underandSection; 70.1901. Additionally, when 75 percent of the PEL concentrationis found, personal monitoring would be conducted on each operational shift.When personal exposure monitoring results indicate levels that are lessthan 100 percent of the PEL with 95 percent confidence, area sampling requirementsunder andSection; 70.1900 would be reestablished. The proposal would address the frequency and procedures for exposure monitoring.<T3>Frequency. </T3>The proposal would require that weekly representativesamples for carbon monoxide, nitric oxide, and nitrogen dioxide be taken.In addition, when an operator uses fuel which contains more than 0.25 percentof sulfur, the operator must take representative samples of sulfur dioxide.The proposal would require an operator to provide a certified statementto MSHA inspectors as to the fuel's sulfur content when fuel is used whichcontains 0.25 percent or less of sulfur. Operators who use fuel with 0.25percent or less of sulfur, and who provide a certified statement to theMSHA inspector as to the sulfur content, would not need to take representativesamples for sulfur dioxide. The purpose of the certified statement wouldbe to require verification of the sulfur content (percent by weight) ofthe fuel. In order to address the Committee's recommendation, MSHA is proposing thata minimum of weekly samples (that is, one concentration determination perweek per substance) be taken in the immediate return of any split of airin which diesel equipment is used. MSHA believes this will provide adequatescreening for the targeted contaminants and the triggering of the morecomprehensive personal monitoring requirement. The proposal intends theweekly samples to be a minimum requirement. It is not MSHA's intent torequire an alteration of a more frequent sampling program if one is alreadyestablished at the mine. <T3>Sampling Procedure. </T3>The proposal would require that weekly samplesbe taken in the immediate return airways of any split of air where dieselequipment is used in a mine. The immediate return would be interpretedas an accessible area of a mechanized mining unit at the interface betweenareas classified as intake and return air courses. Also the term couldinclude the area normally called the ``tailgate'' in a longwall operation,or an area immediately in by the last piece of operating diesel equipmentduring longwall moves where additional dilution of the air split has notoccurred. Other situations may provide different parameters for an immediatereturn area. Proposed andSection; 70.1900(b) would require that the weekly monitoringbe conducted according to the proposed air quality standards in andSection;72.200 (c), (d), (e), and (f), and that such samples shall be collectedduring periods when contaminant concentrations are representative of peakexposures to miners at risk, and when required by andSection; 72.200(a).Proposed andSection; 72.200 (c), (d), (e), and (f) provide the monitoringprocedures, recordkeeping, access to exposure records, and observationof monitoring requirements from the air quality proposed rules. Becausethese procedures are generic to any mine and any contaminant, MSHA hasproposed that they are applicable to the area exposure monitoring recommendedby the Advisory Committee. A full explanation of these paragraphs can befound in the preamble for the air quality proposal located at 54 FR 35777(August 29, 1989). Paragraph (b) of this section would require that samples shall be takenduring periods when contaminant concentrations are representative of peakexposure to miners at risk. This provision seeks to establish the necessityof taking samples during periods of maximum diesel activity. Maximum dieselactivity could occur when maximum numbers of equipment are operating ona section or when the diesel engines on a section are operating under amaximum load. This provision does not place its primary emphasis on anabsolute peak concentration but relies on an operator to determine whenmaximum diesel activity is likely to occur, and it requires sampling duringthat period. This paragraph also states that sampling is required under proposed andSection;72.200(a)(1) when the operator has reason to believe that there would bean increase in contaminant concentrations such as during a change in production,process, materials, equipment, engineering, or when administrative controlswould increase a contaminant's concentration above the PEL. This provisionrequires that the operator, through sample interpretation, determine themost appropriate sampling schedules which will give the best indicationof peak concentration periods. A full explanation of this provision canbe found at 54 FR 35777 (August 29, 1989).The proposal in paragraph (c) of this section would require personal exposuremonitoring according to andSection; 70.1901 when the results of the samplingconducted in accordance with andSection; 70.1900(b) exceed 50 percent ofthe PEL concentration listed in andSection; 72.100. The Advisory Committeerecommended area sampling requirements in order to create an appropriateand efficient means of determining when personal exposure monitoring wouldbe required to protect the health of miners. Personal monitoring wouldbe required only after area samples showed concentrations over 50 percentof the PEL concentration. This concept is referred to as an action level.The Advisory Committee considered a range of action levels which wouldtrigger personal monitoring, each with its own rationale and justification.However, the Committee came to no final recommendation on this issue. The proposal intends that an action level of 50 percent of the PEL concentrationis an appropriate trigger for establishing a personal monitoring program.MSHA believes there is risk of overexposure to miners when weekly immediatereturn air samples exceed 50 percent of the PEL concentration, given thevariability associated with such things as, but not limited to, samplingand analytical error, diesel activity level, ventilation rates, and dutycycles. In addition, the air in the immediate return would be a combinationof several air splits of lesser quantities and therefore would be a dilutedconcentration of possible personal exposures in other areas of the mineventilated by that air. MSHA believes this action level will not be burdensomeupon the operator since previous MSHA test results show the majority ofsamples fall below 50 percent of the PEL concentration. The Agency solicits comments on whether a trigger concentration differentthan that specified would be appropriate. For example, MSHA could allowa different concentration to be approved by the District Manager if samplingconducted in accordance with andSection; 75.390(b)(4) shows that a differenttrigger concentration would indicate the need for personal monitoring inaccordance with proposed andSection; 70.1901. In this way, MSHA could beassured that a return air area sample would be capable of indicating theneed for personal monitoring at a percentage of the PEL concentration differentfrom 50 percent. Such a provision could be used to prevent a cycle wherearea sampling indicates the need for personal monitoring, and subsequentpersonal monitoring results in the re-institution of area sampling whichthen indicates the need for personal monitoring. Provisions for the 50 percent action level concept have been suggestedby Nelson A. Leidel in NIOSH Publication No. 77-173 and is used by theOccupational Safety and Health Administration. Since the 50 percent actionlevel is normally applied to personal exposure monitoring, MSHA solicitscomments on the establishment of 50 percent of the PEL concentration asan action level and on its applicability to an area monitoring program.Action levels are instituted in order to minimize the risk that employeeswill be overexposed due to variability associated with monitoring programs.This concept is largely based on random statistical considerations, whichdo not take into account unpredicted trends or sudden disturbances causedby overt changes in ventilation rates, decreased efficiencies of engineperformance, or any other deviation in equipment performance which mayaffect either the output or control of diesel emissions. <T3>Personal exposure monitoring.</T3> Proposed andSection; 70.1901 wouldstate the personal exposure monitoring requirements which are triggeredwhen the action level set in andSection; 70.1900(c) is exceeded. Thus, whensamples from the immediate return airways indicate levels exceeding 50percent of the PEL concentration of the targeted substances, the operatorwould be required to begin a personal exposure monitoring program for eachapplicable substance. Section 70.1901(a) would provide that operators be required to maintainexposure of all miners at or below the appropriate PEL. It would also requirethat when work shifts are greater than 8 hours in duration, 8-hour timeweighted limits should be adjusted proportionally. The Advisory Committee considered establishing specific limits for thegaseous diesel exhaust components. However, the Committee determined throughits deliberations that suitable protection for miners would be achievedby the use of the coal mine air quality standards as they exist or maybe changed in the future. The Committee also determined that consistencywith established air quality standards was desirable. MSHA agrees withthis recommendation. It is important that the concepts of each limit valueand associated measurement strategy are used correctly. When personal exposuresof an 8 hour duration are determined, those measurements should be correlatedto the limits associated with 8 hour exposures. Section 70.1901(b) requires the mine operator to begin a personal monitoringprogram once a sample in the immediate return airway exceeds 50 percentof the PEL concentration. The proposal recommends no minimum time limitto determine when the personal exposure monitoring program would start.MSHA believes that a program may be initiated as early as the followingshift since most measurement methods which might be used for the returnair sampling could be adapted for personal exposure monitoring. It is notMSHA's intent to preclude the possibility of modification to a monitoringprogram. For instance, an operator may be using certified detector tubesfor its return airway sampling which on some occasions indicates a levelexceeding 50 percent of the PEL concentration. The operator may find itnecessary to use the same measurement tool; i.e., detector tubes, to establisha personal monitoring program on a subsequent shift. MSHA believes thatan operator which has monitoring capability for return air samples hascapability of establishing a personal monitoring program in a very shortperiod of time. However, once the monitoring program has been initiated,the operator may find that other sampling methods and strategies more adequatelyaddress exposures and therefore change those procedures and methods. Section 70.1901(b) also requires the mine operator to monitor personalexposures which shall be representative of the affected miners' exposures.MSHA's intent is not to require every miner in the affected air split tobe personally monitored. The proposal does intend that a monitoring programwould be established which will characterize the exposures of all the miners'most likely by sampling those whose duties put them at greatest risk ofexcessive exposure to diesel emissions. Therefore, a personal samplingprogram would not require separate sampling for each exposed miner butwould require enough sampling for the operator to determine each miner'sprobable exposure and establish an individual exposure record for eachminer who frequents an area requiring personal sampling. For example, ifa number of miners perform essentially the same job, under the same conditions,or are in comparable locations over the same periods of time, one personalsample may be sufficient to assess each miner's exposure and assign thatexposure to each miner's record. Sections 70.1901 (c) and (d) would require the operator to determine thepercentage of personal exposure in relation to the appropriate PEL. Ifthe sample indicates an exposure which exceeds 75 percent of the PEL, theoperator would be required to maintain an adequate monitoring program foreach shift during which miners are exposed in the area. If the samplesindicate an exposure below 100 percent of the PEL with 95 percent statisticalconfidence, the operator may revert back to the return air sampling provisionsdetailed in proposed andSection; 70.1900. MSHA intends that personal monitoring would continue until the concentrationwas below 100 percent of the PEL, as determined with 95 percent confidence.This would ensure that the operator has determined that the affected miners'exposures are below the PEL with statistical certainty. Specifying onlythe confidence level allows the operator to choose from a full range ofsampling and analytical options available. In choosing the sampling andanalytical methods, the operator would be able to identify the number ofsamples as well as the concentration range needed to ensure that the limitsare not exceeded at a 95 percent confidence level. Although an operatorusing detector tubes would have a different strategy than an operator usingan electrochemical analyzer, both methods could be used to determine whetherexposures were above or below 100 percent of the PEL at 95 percent confidence.C. 30 CFR Part 75 General Discussion The Advisory Committee also addressed the safe use of diesel-powered equipmentin such areas as fuel handling and storage, work practices, equipment maintenance,and qualification for maintenance personnel. Machine-related features providingprotection from possible hazards are separately addressed under the proposedapproval requirements in part 7, except for the scope and requirementsof the limited class of diesel-powered equipment.MSHA provided the Committee with a draft rule for part 75 safety standardsduring the Committee's deliberations. In addition to that initial draftrule, and other information and data supplied to the Committee, the CommitteeChairman and staff redeveloped the draft in order to address some of theconcerns raised by Committee review and discussion of the issues. One ofthe Committee members also redeveloped the draft and submitted his versionto the Committee for discussion and comment. Ultimately, the Committeerelied on the draft developed by the Chairman as the basis for many ofits recommendations. This draft is provided as an appendix to the Committee'sfinal report. Copies of the Committee report may be obtained from MSHAat the address listed above. The proposed rule would implement the Committee recommendations which wouldaffect various aspects of the safety and health of miners when using diesel-poweredequipment underground. Proper underground use and maintenance of dieselfuel and diesel-powered equipment would be necessary to protect againstmine explosions and fires. The proposed rule would be new in providingfor standards to control the use, handling, storage and transfer of dieselfuel; the type of diesel fuel for underground use; a time schedule forthe introduction of approved diesel-powered equipment underground; thedevelopment of a limited class of outby diesel-powered equipment whichdoes not need to meet newly proposed approval schedules; requirements forthe use of stationary diesel-powered equipment such as air compressors,fire suppression systems, diesel fuel starting aids; maintenance of diesel-poweredequipment; training and qualification for diesel mechanics; and trafficcontrols underground. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Other Issues Under 30 CFR Part 75 </ITAG><T3>Amendment of Equipment Standards and Other Revisions. </T3>At thisstage of the rulemaking process, the Agency anticipates that the finalrule would include a number of other amendments to existing part 75. Mostof these would require applicability to diesel-powered equipment. MSHAsolicits comments on whether these sections or other sections should bemade applicable to diesel-powered equipment: andSection;andSection; 75.313,75.400, 75.400-2, 75.523, 75.523-1, 75.523-2, 75.1107-1, 75.1710, and 75.1710-1.Section 75.313 would additionally require the use of a methane monitoron all diesel equipment used to load coal. Section 75.400 would prohibitthe accumulation of coal dust, including float coal dust, loose coal, andother combustible materials on diesel-powered equipment. Section 75.400-2would be applicable to diesel-powered equipment. Section 75.523 would additionallyrequire that diesel-powered face equipment be provided with devices thatwill permit the equipment to be deenergized quickly in the event of anemergency. Section 75.523-1 would include self-propelled diesel-poweredface equipment. Section 75.523-2 would include self-propelled diesel-poweredface equipment. Section 75.1107-1 would include unattended diesel-poweredequipment. Sections 75.1710 and 75.1710-1 would include diesel-poweredface equipment and diesel-powered shuttle cars. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Topic-by-Topic Discussion of 30 CFR Part 75 </ITAG><T3>Section 75.390 Ventilating Air Where Diesel-Powered Equipment is Operated.</T3>In its final recommendations, the Committee emphasized the need toestablish minimum ventilation requirements where diesel-powered equipmentis operated underground. The establishment and application of minimum ventilationrates were addressed by the Committee in all three major areas of concern:equipment approval, use, and health recommendations. The establishmentof minimum ventilation rates should provide a health benefit to miners.In addressing equipment specifications, the Committee recommended thatonly approved diesel engines be used underground and that these enginesbe evaluated for both gaseous and particulate emissions. Based upon theseevaluations, minimum ventilation rates should be determined and reportedas the approval plate air quantity and particulate index. The Committee's health recommendations also addressed minimum ventilationquantities by determining the appropriate air quantity for dilution ofemissions based upon the emission data considered during the engine approval.The particulate index would be reported as the quantity of air needed todilute the particulate emissions to one milligram per cubic meter of air.The Committee further recommended that both the approval plate air quantityand the particulate index be used for ventilation system design by themine operator and in the evaluation and approval of minimum air quantitiesin ventilation plans by MSHA. The Committee addressed the implementation of these recommendations intheir use recommendations for the establishment of minimum ventilationrates and making the minimum quantities part of the approved mine ventilationplan currently required by existing andSection; 75.316. They recommendedthat these minimum quantities should be based on the engine approval plateair quantities and particulate index and that provisions should be madefor multiple units operating in the same ventilation current or split.The Committee also recommended that provisions be made to allow an adjustedminimum ventilation requirement if operating experience and work placesampling so indicated. The concept of an adjusted minimum ventilation requirementwas included to allow for the requirement of a greater minimum quantityor a lesser minimum quantity than that based upon approval test data. Proposed andSection; 75.390 is based on the Committee recommendations addressingminimum ventilation requirements. Paragraph (a) of the proposal would requirethat the minimum quantity of air in any split of air where diesel equipmentis operated would be at least that which is specified in the approval plateair quantity. This provision is intended to apply to any individual unitof diesel-powered equipment. MSHA envisions applying this requirement toall equipment having an approval plate air quantity and would implementthis requirement as applicable in accordance with proposed andSection; 75.1907addressed elsewhere in this document. Proposed paragraph (b) addresses the inclusion of minimum ventilation quantitiesin the mine ventilation plan. Paragraph (b)(1) would require the mine operatorto specify the minimum air quantity on any split of air where multiplediesel units are operating in accordance with the formula included. Thisrequirement would also apply where face equipment was being installed orremoved. The formula is designed to account for the differences in dutycycles of diesel equipment in that the approval plate air quantity forgases is based upon the ``worst'' point of the operating range of the equipmentrelative to gaseous emissions. Under normal operating conditions, multipleunits would not all be operating in these points at the same time. Proposed paragraph (b)(2) would require a minimum ventilation rate as determinedby the particulate index if it were in excess of that determined in paragraph(b)(1) of this section. MSHA does not envision using a multiplication factorof less than one for multiple units since the particulate index is determinedin the approval process using a duty cycle. Therefore, it is proposed thatthe minimum quantities based upon the particulate index be additive formultiple units. MSHA envisions a two-phase application of the particulate index in approvingminimum ventilation quantities. In the first phase, MSHA would considerthe current particulate exposure to respirable coal mine dust comparedto the applicable standard such as 2.0 milligrams per cubic meter of air.For example, if a mine was currently using three pieces of diesel equipmentin a production cycle and the average respirable dust concentrations were1 milligram per cubic meter and the mine operator proposed the introductionof a fourth piece of equipment to the production cycle, MSHA would thenconsider the current respirable dust concentrations along with the particulateindex for the additional piece of equipment in approving a new minimumair quantity. Since the difference between normal and the allowable respirabledust concentrations in this example is 1 milligram per cubic meter, MSHAwould require at least the amount of air, based upon the particulate index,that would be expected to add no more than one milligram per cubic meter.In this example, this would be the particulate index air quantity. If thedifference explained in this example were half a milligram per cubic meter,MSHA would require twice the particulate index air quantity and so forth.MSHA would expect to apply this approach until a specific diesel particulatestandard is established and promulgated.Upon promulgation of a diesel particulate standard, phase two of this provisionwould become effective. Here MSHA intends to determine a minimum quantitybased on the particulate index to dilute to whatever standard is set fordiesel particulate. Since the particulate index is the amount of air neededto dilute particulate emissions to 1 milligram per cubic meter, for dieselparticulate standards of 0.1, 0.5, 1.0, or 2.0 the corresponding minimumair quantities would be 10, 2, 1, and 0.5 times the particulate index,respectively. Paragraph (b)(3) of the proposal would exclude certain equipment typesfrom the calculation of minimum quantities in paragraphs (b) (1) and (2)of this section. These exclusions would be equipment which intermittentlyoperates and therefore would not add significantly to exposures. Paragraph (b)(4) of the proposal specifies the information that would berequired to be submitted to MSHA to use an air quantity different thanthose determined in paragraphs (b) (1) or (2). The data submitted wouldbe collected under conditions meeting paragraphs (b) (1) or (2) and basedupon those results, MSHA would evaluate a proposed different air quantity.<T3>Section 75.1901 Diesel Fuel. </T3>The Committee made recommendationsconcerning the diesel fuel used to operate equipment underground. The proposalis based on the Committee recommendations and the general requirementsin the draft rule developed by the Committee Chairman. Proposed andSection;75.1901 would require the use of low volatile hydrocarbon fuel classifiedas ASTM D975 No. 2 diesel fuel having a flash point of 125 anddegrees;F orgreater. This classification would require fuel to have a sulfur contentof less than 0.5 percent by weight but in accordance with the Committeerecommendation, if fuel having a sulfur content greater than 0.25 percentby weight is used, andSection; 70.1900 of this proposal would require samplingfor sulfur dioxide. The use of lower sulfur fuel would provide a healthbenefit to miners. <T3>Sections 75.1902, 75.1903, 75.1904, 75.1905, and 75.1906 Fuel Handlingand Storage. </T3>The Committee recommended that fuel handling and storagebe addressed as a system including the storage facilities; the transferof fuel from storage tanks to transportation vehicles and ultimately intothe equipment; the design and construction of mobile storage facilities;and the transportation of fuel from one location to another. The Committeeconcluded that the general requirements as drafted by the Committee Chairmanshould be followed. These Committee recommendations are included in proposedandSection; 75.1902 which lists general requirements for diesel fuel storageunderground. Proposed andSection; 75.1903 specifies construction and safetyprecautions. Section 75.1904 of the proposal details requirements for dieselfuel storage tanks. Section 75.1905 of the proposal lists requirementsfor the transfer of diesel fuel including through pipelines, and proposedandSection; 75.1906 gives requirements for containers used to transport dieselfuel underground. MSHA specifically requests comments on whether manualpouring for transfer should be allowed, and under what conditions it canoccur. The proposed requirements in these sections are based on the Committee'srecommendations for providing fire protection for the storage and handlingof diesel fuel underground. Two areas of these proposed requirements weremodified from the Committee's recommendations. The Committee originallyrecommended that the electrical systems located in diesel fuel storageareas meet the requirements of the National Electric Code (NEC). Upon researchingthis recommendation, MSHA found that for areas where a Class II combustibleliquid is used, which includes diesel fuel, the NEC requires that electricalequipment meet the requirements for ``normal'' areas as specified by theNEC. Therefore, MSHA believes that the existing regulations in part 75would be applicable and no further requirements are being proposed. ThisNEC requirement would be applicable to combustible liquids having a flashpoint of 100 degrees Fahrenheit or above up to an elevation of approximately11,000 feet above sea level. Since proposed andSection; 75.1901 limits dieselfuel to No. 2 diesel fuel with flash points of 125 anddegrees;F or greater,elevation would not affect the provisions and the NEC requirements wouldnot be necessary. Another area where the Committee's recommendation was modified is in proposedandSection; 75.1903(b) which would require drain systems and sumps in fixedstorage facilities to be capable of handling 150 percent of the maximumcapacity of the fuel storage system. The Committee recommendation addresses100 percent of the fuel storage capacity; however, MSHA believes that sincewater would also tend to accumulate in these sumps, 150 percent would providea safeguard so that spilled fuel could be contained. <T3>Sections 75.1907 and 75.1910 Approved Diesel-Powered Equipment. </T3>Section75.1907 of the proposal would require, with certain exceptions, that diesel-poweredequipment used in underground coal mines be approved. This section wouldestablish equipment classes that would be exempt and time frames in whichequipment not specifically approved for use in coal mines would be requiredto have additional health and safety related features. Throughout this section, references are made to machine approval requirementsunder 30 CFR part 7, subparts H and I. In another part of today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>, the Agency has published an advance notice ofproposed rulemaking which describes the scope of the expected machine approvalrequirements pursuant to part 7 subparts H and I. Briefly, such requirementswould consist of an approved engine under proposed subpart E, an approvedpower package under proposed subparts F or G, and such other machine relatedfeatures as would be necessary to provide fire and explosion protection,and safety features appropriate to the area of the mine where the equipmentwould be used. MSHA expects to receive comments from interested partieson the scope of the machine approval. However, at this time, this terminologyhas been selected to convey the Agency's intent to require machine approval.Subpart H refers to machine approval requirements that provide fire andexplosion protection for use in areas of underground coal mines where permissibleelectric equipment is required, and subpart I refers to machine approvalrequirements that provide protection against hazards in areas of undergroundcoal mines where permissible electric equipment is not required. MSHA expects that subpart H machines would incorporate a power packageapproved under part 7 subpart F, an engine approved under proposed subpartE and include electrical systems that meet the requirements of 30 CFR Parts18 or 27. MSHA expects that subpart I machines would incorporate a powerpackage approved under proposed part 7, subpart G, electrical systems thatmeet the requirements of part 18 and could use an engine approved underproposed part 7, subpart E. Both subparts H and I would establish requirementsto address other machine related safety features specified in Parts 18,31, 32, 36 and 75. References to machine approval under subparts H or Iare retained to convey the manner in which the Agency would expect to implementthe Advisory Committee recommendations. Proposed paragraph (a) of andSection; 75.1907 would require that, with twoexceptions, all diesel-powered equipment used in an underground coal minemust be approved. One exception is found in proposed andSection; 75.1909which would establish requirements for a limited class of light duty equipment.The other exception is found in proposed andSection; 75.1910 which wouldestablish requirements for stationary unattended equipment. Thus, neitherlimited class light duty equipment nor stationary unattended equipmentwould be required to receive formal Agency approval. Compliance with thecited requirements would be established by MSHA inspectors. Time framesin which equipment needs to meet the requirements of andSection; 75.1909or andSection; 75.1910 would be specified in other paragraphs of this section.Proposed paragraph (a) is based on an Advisory Committee recommendationthat MSHA develop a time schedule to allow for conversion of outby equipmentpresently in use. The Committee recommended that the conversion be achievedby retrofits, replacement, or through the incorporation of additional safetyfeatures. The Committee also recommended that equipment newly introducedunderground after an established date meet the new standards. In establishing time frames incorporated in the section, the Agency hasaddressed the useful life of existing equipment. MSHA considered the availabilityof devices required to be added to existing equipment and the resourcesthat would be necessary to perform retrofits. The Agency has not requiredexisting equipment to be approved. Instead, the proposed standard has beenstructured to utilize the incorporation of additional features onto existingequipment to achieve the required level of protection. For example, certainoutby equipment would be required to have a fire suppression system installed,and modifications made to brake systems, fuel systems, electrical systems,and other machine systems. Mine operators may determine whether the usefullife of the equipment warrants the resource commitment. Proposed paragraph (a)(1) would require that, effective immediately uponpromulgation of the final rule, only diesel-powered equipment approvedunder 30 CFR part 7, subpart H or 30 CFR part 36 be used where permissibleelectric equipment is required. The technical requirements specified inpart 36, and that MSHA expects would be specified in part 7, subpart H,are intended to ensure that the machine can be operated without creatinga fire or explosion hazard. This paragraph follows the Advisory Committeerecommendation that permissible diesel-powered equipment be required inareas of coal mines where permissible electric equipment is required. Thesetechnical requirements would provide the same protections for diesel-poweredequipment as are presently provided by permissible electric equipment.The primary hazards in these areas would be explosive concentrations ofmethane gas and combustible quantities of coal dust. Proposed paragraph (a)(2) would establish a time schedule under which equipmentapproved under part 36 would be required to be provided with additionalsafety features. Paragraph (a)(2)(i) would require that, effective immediatelyupon promulgation of the final rule, power packages in such approved equipmentwould have a maximum surface temperature of less than 302 anddegrees;F (150anddegrees;C). Under existing part 36, the maximum surface temperature ofpower package components is limited to 400 anddegrees;F (204 anddegrees;C).The proposal would require that the diesel power packages in equipmentapproved under part 36 meet the same surface temperature requirement asequipment approved under part 7, subpart H and permissible electric equipment.To date, only one power package used in part 36 approved equipment hasa surface temperature between 302 anddegrees;F and 400 anddegrees;F. MSHA isnot aware of any power packages currently in use in underground coal mineswhich do not meet the proposed requirement. Consequently, MSHA believesthat this requirement poses no hardship on the industry. The intent ofthe requirement is to ensure that power packages with surface temperaturesabove 302 anddegrees;F are not subsequently introduced into underground coalmines. Paragraph (a)(2)(ii) would require that all equipment approved under part36 have a fire suppression system installed as of 6 months after the effectivedate of this section that meets the requirements of proposed andSection;75.1911. The Advisory Committee recommended that fire prevention featuresincluding surface temperature controls and fire suppression systems beinstalled on diesel-powered equipment used in outby areas. The fire suppressionsystems would be required in addition to surface temperature controls toaddress fire hazards created by other machine system malfunctions. Equipmentapproved under existing part 36 is of the same type as outby equipmentreferred to by the Advisory Committee and similar fire hazards are present.The Agency has determined that fire suppression systems should be installedto address these hazards. MSHA believes that 6 months is an appropriate amount of time to installfire suppression systems. Fire suppression systems that meet the requirementsof proposed andSection; 75.1911 are available and are presently installedon some diesel-powered mining equipment. Approximately 451 units of part36 approved equipment are in use in underground coal mines. A number ofthese units are already equipped with fire suppression systems which complyor can be easily made to comply with andSection; 75.1911. MSHA expects that1 to 3 worker-days would be necessary to install a system depending onmachine size and fire suppression system complexity. Approximately 73 mineshave from 1 to 5 diesel units and about 12 mines have from 6 to 10 units.In addition, about 5 mines have eleven to 20 units, and three mines haveat least 30 units each. Paragraph (a)(2)(iii) would require that equipment approved under existingpart 36 have a particulate index and dilution air quantity determined inaccordance with part 7, subpart E as of 24 months after the effective dateof this section. This requirement would implement a number of AdvisoryCommittee recommendations. The Committee recommended that a ventilationrate be established for each engine that would indicate the amount of airrequired to dilute CO, NO, or NO<T2>2</T2> to the 8-hour air quality standard level. The air quality standardlevel would be the current TLVs referred to in existing andSection; 75.301-2or as they may be revised in the future. Section 75.301-2 would be modifiedby the air quality standards currently under revision by MSHA. With thatrevision the values used for determining the dilution air quantity andallowable exposure levels would be the same. The Committee further recommended that particulate emissions be evaluatedand, based on that data, a particulate index be developed. The particulateindex would be the quantity of air required to dilute the particulate emissionsto one milligram per cubic meter of air. Although the gaseous emissions of diesel engines used in equipment approvedunder existing part 36 are evaluated during the approval process, thosetests are performed with 1.5 percent methane in the intake air insteadof the 1.0 percent required by part 7, subpart E. Furthermore, the dilutionair quantity computed under part 36 is based on allowable contaminant levelsthat are different than the values specified in andSection; 75.301-2. Itis expected that the dilution air quantity computed using part 7, subpartE procedures could be significantly different than the dilution air quantitycomputed for existing part 36. Six engine models manufactured by three companies constitute 90 percentof the engines currently in use in underground coal mines. The Agency believesthat some of these engine models will be submitted for approval under theseproposed regulations. Test data submitted as part of those applicationswill be considered applicable to existing engines. MSHA envisions developingprograms to establish dilution air quantities and particulate indices forexisting engines for which similar designs are not submitted for approvalunder these regulations. Proposed paragraph (a)(3) of this section would establish a two-phase programin which additional features would be required to be incorporated intocertain self-propelled and portable attended diesel-powered equipment usedin outby areas of underground coal mines. Equipment approved under existingpart 36 or proposed part 7, subpart H or I would already incorporate suchfeatures and not be subject to the requirements of this paragraph. Firesuppression systems, fire prevention features and equipment safety featureswould be required on all equipment in the first phase. During the secondphase, surface temperature controls would be required on heavier duty equipmentand approved engines would be required on all equipment. Proposed paragraph (a)(3)(i) would require that all self-propelled andportable attended diesel-powered equipment meet the requirements of andSection;75.1909 as of 12 months after the effective date of this section. Section75.1909 would require the incorporation of fire suppression systems, fireprevention features, and other equipment-related safety features. AlthoughandSection; 75.1909 would require the incorporation of an engine approvedin accordance with proposed part 7, subpart E, the Agency has determinedthat such engines may not be available for all equipment within the 12month time frame. Consequently, the Agency is proposing a longer periodof time for the incorporation of such engines. This section would implementa number of Advisory Committee recommendations pertaining to outby equipment.Proposed paragraph (a)(3)(ii) would require that self-propelled and portableattended diesel-powered equipment, except for equipment considered to bein the limited class of equipment as defined by proposed andSection; 75.1908would be required to have a power package approved in accordance with proposedpart 7, subpart F or G and installed as of 24 months after the effectivedate of this section. The requirements specified by this section are intended to ensure thatthe diesel machine can be operated without creating a fire hazard and thatengine gaseous and particulate emissions are addressed. This section followsthe Advisory Committee recommendation that diesel-powered equipment operatingin areas of coal mines where permissible electric equipment is not requiredshould be provided with fire prevention features including surface temperaturecontrols and fire suppression systems. The primary hazard in these areaswould be combustible quantities of coal dust. Power packages approved in accordance with proposed part 7, subpart F orG would utilize approved engines. Such engines would be tested and evaluatedto ensure that they are basically clean engines when properly adjustedand maintained. Dilution air quantities and particulate indices would bedetermined for these engines.The Agency has determined that there are approximately 367 units of diesel-poweredequipment located in approximately 56 mines that would be affected by thisparagraph.Proposed paragraph (a)(3)(iv) would establish procedures to be followedto obtain agency approval for the extended use of certain mine locomotivesused in outby areas. Locomotives would be subject to andSection; 75.1907(a)(3)(ii)which would require the use of an approved power package in 24 months.These locomotives would already be provided with fire suppression systems,fire protection features, and equipment safety features in accordance withproposed andSection; 75.1907(a)(3)(i).There are 64 locomotives located in 20 mines that are used for transportationof coal, supplies, and personnel. MSHA believes that suitable power packagesapproved under proposed part 7, subpart F or G may not be available forall of these locomotives as of 24 months after the effective date of thissection. Some locomotives are used in mines with low seam heights. Powerpackages may not be available with a sufficiently low profile to be incorporatedinto these locomotives. Power packages approved under proposed part 7,subpart F or G will generally be longer than engines presently in use inmany locomotives. Space may not be available to incorporate approved powerpackages in existing engine compartments. Gaining the necessary space bylengthening the engine compartment may change the locomotive wheelbaseto the extent that the locomotive may be unable to negotiate turns in somemines. This paragraph would establish a program that would allow the Agencyto consider, on a case by case basis, whether suitable power packages areavailable. Upon application by the mine operator, MSHA's Director of TechnicalSupport would conduct a study to identify and evaluate mine related factors,equipment considerations, and available approved power package designs.Depending upon the findings of the study, approval for the extended useof the locomotive may be granted. Such approval could include the incorporationof additional safety features, administrative procedures, and operatingpractices as necessary to achieve protection from fires and reduce miners'exposure to exhaust contamination. The Director of Technical Support wouldmonitor power package designs as they are approved. If it were determinedthat an approved power package would be suitable for use in a locomotivefor which extended use had been granted, the owner of that locomotive wouldbe notified and a time frame established for installation of the powerpackage. Proposed paragraph (a)(4) would require that only new diesel-powered equipmentapproved under proposed part 7, subpart H or I, or the limited class ofequipment which meets the requirements of proposed andSection; 75.1909, orstationary unattended equipment which meets the requirements of proposedandSection; 75.1910 can be introduced into underground coal mines. This provisionwould take effect 60 months after the effective date of this section. Limited class equipment and stationary equipment do not require formalmachine approval by the Agency. However, this equipment is required toutilize approved engines and stationary equipment would also be requiredto utilize approved power packages. These approval programs would be implementedunder the provisions of 30 CFR part 7 which would accelerate the availabilityof these products. Equipment required to be approved under proposed part 7, subpart H or Iwould also utilize approved engines and power packages. As discussed earlier,the final form of the administrative procedures for the approval of equipmenthas not been determined. Based on comments received from the advance noticeof proposed rulemaking, MSHA would intend to develop administrative proceduresthat will make approved equipment available in a timely manner. By establishing 60 months as the period of time after which only equipmentapproved under proposed part 7, subpart H or I may be used, the Agencybelieves it will achieve two important goals. The mining equipment manufacturingindustry will be able to focus its efforts on developing approved powerpackages for existing equipment and for future use in approved equipment.Sixty months will allow sufficient time to design, develop, and approvethe variety of equipment types required by the mining industry. The Agency has developed these time schedules based on what it believeswill be the availability of the equipment. Based on MSHA's experience withother rules, and manufacturers' estimates of time needed to produce theequipment, the Agency believes that these time limits are reasonable. MSHAspecifically solicits comments or other information on the practicabilityof these time frames.Proposed paragraph (b) would establish diesel-powered ambulances and firefightingequipment as a special equipment class. Such equipment would be permittedfor use underground without approval under proposed part 7 subpart H orI or existing part 36, and without meeting the requirements of proposedandSection;andSection; 75.1908 and 1909. The use of such equipment would besubject to the existing requirements of andSection; 75.1101-23. That sectionestablishes requirements for the development of a specific firefightingand mine evacuation plan. The mine operator would include the proposeduse of ambulances and firefighting equipment in the plan submitted to theDistrict Manager as required by andSection; 75.1101-23. Use of the equipmentwould be limited to emergency situations and drills as defined in the plan.Proposed paragraph (c) would require that stationary unattended diesel-poweredequipment comply with the requirements defined in proposed andSection; 75.1910as of 12 months after the effective date of this section. That sectionwould provide for the installation of fire suppression systems; the incorporationof fire protection features; specific additional control requirements necessitatedby unattended operation; and would establish requirements for stationaryequipment installations. This paragraph would implement all of the AdvisoryCommittee recommendations for the use of such equipment. The Agency doesnot believe that power packages approved under proposed part 7, subpartsH or I would be available for all stationary equipment within 12 monthsof the effective date of this section and proposes to delay the requirementfor such approved power packages.Proposed paragraph (d) would require that all stationary diesel-poweredequipment meet the requirements of proposed andSection; 75.1910 includingthe utilization of an approved power package as of 24 months after theeffective date of this section. This paragraph would fully implement theAdvisory Committee recommendations for the use of stationary equipment.<T3>Sections 75.1908 and 75.1909 Limited Class Equipment_Scope, Designand Performance Requirements.</T3> Proposed andSection; 75.1908 would establishequipment characteristics to define a limited class of diesel-powered equipment.Proposed paragraph (a) would establish certain equipment characteristicsthat would implement Advisory Committee recommendations. Equipment as definedby this section would be light duty type rather than typical productionequipment. Engines would not be turbocharged and would be limited to lessthan 90 horsepower. MSHA has determined that 90 percent of the equipmentpresently in use and considered to be light duty has engines of less than90 horsepower.Equipment utilizing turbocharged engines and hydraulic systems were specificallyexcluded from the limited class by the Committee recommendation. Hydraulicsystems referred to in this paragraph are those systems which operate atrelatively high pressures with large quantities of fluid. Such systemsare presently used in articulated steering systems, hydraulic wheel units,and bucket lift cylinders. Automotive style power steering units and brakeunits are not considered hydraulic systems for purposes of this paragraph.The Advisory Committee recommended that the potential fire hazards associatedwith diesel-powered equipment be addressed through fire prevention featuresthat include the limitation of surface temperatures to prevent ignitionof diesel fuel, hydraulic fluids, or accumulations of loose coal and coaldust. However, the Committee recognized the difficulties of obtaining equipmentwith surface temperature controls on small light duty equipment such asutility vehicles, personnel carriers, tractors, and ambulances which tendto utilize very low horsepower engines. Because of the duty cycle and relativelysmall horsepower, the fire hazards on this equipment are fewer than onheavy duty equipment. In addition, heavy duty equipment also has significantquantities of hydraulic fluids adding to the fire hazard. Therefore, the Advisory Committee recommended that, rather than settingrequirements to prevent hot surface temperatures, fire protection featuresbe required. These features include fire suppression devices, reductionof the potential for fuels to contact hot surfaces, and reduction of potentialignition sources. The Advisory Committee recommended that this equipmentnot be required to have a formal MSHA approval. The specific Advisory Committeerecommendations for fire protection features are included in proposed andSection;75.1909. Advisory Committee discussions suggested that equipment characteristicsother than horsepower be considered in defining the light duty class. TheEnvironmental Protection Agency (EPA) has utilized vehicle weight to establishclasses of over the road trucks for purposes of regulating diesel engineemissions. Trucks that weigh less than 6,000 pounds are considered to belight duty by the EPA. MSHA has determined that most self-propelled diesel-poweredmining equipment presently in use would be considered to be light dutyequipment and weighs less than 6,000 pounds. The only portable equipmentwhich would be considered as part of the limited class are air compressorsand welders. This equipment would only be considered portable equipmentif someone were in the immediate area to take action in the event of anequipment problem. Proposed paragraph (b) would allow the use of altitude compensation devices.Although these devices operate on the same principle as turbochargers,the surface temperature of the engine components is no greater than normallyaspirated engines permitted in the limited class. Altitude compensationdevices allow engine performance to be maintained at high altitudes withoutadverse effects on emissions. Because improperly adjusted fuel injectionrates can cause increased surface temperatures, the Agency would requirethe mine operator to certify that the engine fuel injection system is properlyadjusted whenever the altitude compensation device is first installed orwhen maintenance or adjustments are made on the injection pump. Proposed andSection; 75.1909 would establish design and performance requirementsto be met by limited class equipment. Compliance with these requirementswould be determined by MSHA inspectors. The section would implement AdvisoryCommittee recommendations that such equipment be provided with fire suppressionsystems and fire prevention features including fuel system protection,and an engine compartment air temperature sensor with engine shutdown capability.Other equipment fire prevention features and safety features were specifiedby the Advisory Committee for both self-propelled and portable attendedequipment and are included in this section. Limited class equipment wouldalso be required to utilize an approved engine. MSHA has determined that a parking brake would be adequate for limitedclass equipment and that an automatic emergency parking brake would notbe necessary on this equipment. The Agency has determined that there isno fatality accident history to support the addition of such a requirement.MSHA believes that limited class equipment is primarily used for transportationor as light duty equipment. The potential hazard of an unexpected stopon a limited class piece of equipment with passengers on board does notjustify the use of an automatic emergency parking brake on this type ofequipment. Paragraph (a)(1) would require the use of an approved engine to provideprotection from the exhaust. The approval would include evaluation of dieselparticulate through determination of the particulate index. Paragraph (a)(2)would require a fire suppression system to put out a fire should fuelscome in contact with hot surfaces or be ignited by a faulty electricalsystem. Hazards associated with the fuel tank and fuel lines are addressed by paragraph(a)(3). These precautions include venting the fuel tank to prevent spillageor blow out of fuels and routing of the fuel lines to prevent leakage offuel on hot surfaces of the engine or exhaust. Proposed paragraphs (a) (4) and (5) address the installation of sensorsin the engine cooling system and in the engine compartment. These safetyfeatures would detect an overheating engine and would sense a fire in theengine compartment and give warning to the operator of this equipment.While these features do not eliminate the hazards of hot surface temperatures,MSHA believes that proposed precautions would provide adequate protectionbecause of the light duty cycles of this equipment. Electrical systems frequently have caused fires on diesel equipment. Paragraph(a)(6) addresses the hazards associated with the electrical systems onthis equipment. These requirements are consistent with other MSHA electricalstandards but are tailored for this type of diesel equipment. <T3>Sections 75.1911 and 75.1912 Fire Suppression Systems.</T3> ProposedandSection; 75.1911 would establish requirements for fire suppression systemson mobile diesel-powered equipment and fuel transportation units. Theserequirements would be applicable to approved equipment, limited class equipment,and to fuel transportation units, both self-propelled and towed. ProposedandSection; 75.1912 would establish requirements for fire suppression systemsto be installed at diesel fuel storage areas and stationary diesel-poweredequipment sites. These requirements would implement a number of Advisory Committee recommendationsregarding fire suppression systems. The recommendations were directed towardsspecific applications such as limited class equipment or stationary equipment.The standards would require that only fire suppression systems listed orapproved by a nationally recognized independent testing laboratory be used.The requirements would include design features, installation requirements,and inspection, testing and recordkeeping requirements. <T3>Starting Aids.</T3> The Committee addressed the use of cold startingaids and recommended that the MSHA proposal should indicate requirementsfor the storage and use of cold starting aids. Normally, ether is usedto assist starting of diesel engines in cold weather. The MSHA proposaladdresses volatile starting aids to provide protection from fire and explosionhazards associated with the use of these substances. The proposal includesthe prohibition of such substances in the presence of 1.0 percent or moreof methane since permissible equipment may not prevent a flashback of firewhich could ignite a methane atmosphere. <T3>Maintenance of Diesel-Powered Equipment.</T3> The Committee recommendedthat diesel equipment be examined on the same basis as electric equipmentand that the checklist developed during the approval process under proposedpart 7, subparts E through G and subparts H and I of the advance noticeof proposed rulemaking be used as part of this evaluation. They also recommendedthat equipment be maintained in approved condition and that filters andscrubber water be changed on a regular basis. Proposed andSection; 75.1914 specifies the requirements for maintaining equipmentin safe and approved condition, changing filters when dirty or the intakepressure device so indicates, weekly examination of approved safety featuresand the certification of required examinations. The proposal would alsorequire that maintenance and repair of approved features be made only bypersons qualified in accordance with proposed andSection; 75.1915. This wouldnot include maintenance such as flushing water scrubbers or changing airfilters. The proposal would require that the water scrubber system be drained andflushed at least once on each shift that diesel-powered equipment is operated.Scrubber maintenance problems, frequency and modes of failure were identifiedand reported by the Bureau of Mines Report of Investigations ``FailureAnalysis of Diesel Exhaust-Gas Water Scrubbers'' (RI 8682). In this study,the Bureau of Mines contacted 29 mine maintenance departments and equipmentmanufacturers concerning service experience and construction of water scrubberson mobile diesel-powered equipment. Because these scrubbers cool exhaustgas and act as flame arresters, their failure would compromise safety inunderground mines. In this study, mine water and scrubber water solutionsamples were also analyzed chemically to determine their corrosive properties.In order to properly act as a flame arrester and adequately cool the exhaustgases, minimum water levels in scrubbers are usually ensured by float devicesconnected to a reservoir or a low water shutdown device. Scrubbers aredesigned to maintain enough water for an 8 hour shift operation at a one-thirdload factor. This ensures against any flame propagation caused by enginebackfire or discharge of incandescent particles into a gassy atmosphere.If a scrubber fails to maintain the necessary water level while in operation,built-in devices detect the low water level and shut down the engine ina fail-safe manner. Due to the harsh mining environment, it is not uncommonfor these devices to become inoperable on mine equipment. Adherence torigid flushing and cleaning schedules is critical since solid particlesand sludge are trapped in the scrubber. If allowed to remain, these materialswill accumulate and eventually block internal passages of the scrubber.As a result, scrubber effectiveness as an exhaust-gas cooler and a flamearrester becomes impaired. Furthermore, once permitted to accumulate inthe scrubber and safety shutdown floats, this material cannot be removedby subsequent flushing. Therefore, this material must be prevented fromaccumulating in order to provide adequate safety. The proposal would requiremaintenance of scrubbers at least once each shift to remove material accumulation.This maintenance would be normally performed as part of refilling the scrubberwith water. This proposal would also require the testing and evaluation of the undilutedexhaust on a weekly basis as part of the mine's maintenance program. Thisprovision is based on the Committee's recommendation for conducting suchtests and should provide a health benefit to miners. <T3>Sections 75.1915 and 75.1916 Qualifications and Training of DieselMechanics.</T3> The Committee recommended that MSHA require that personsperforming maintenance on approved features of diesel-powered equipmentbe trained and tested for competency and that such training and testingbe approved by MSHA. This recommendation addresses concerns that maintenanceis a vital step in ensuring safe and healthful use of diesel equipment,and therefore only trained persons should be permitted to work on dieselequipment to be used underground. Proposed andSection; 75.1915 would address the training, testing and qualificationrequirements for diesel mechanics performing work on approved featuresof diesel-powered equipment. The requirements would include a demonstrationof competency through a test approved by MSHA and administered by the mineoperator. It would also require annual retraining and include a provisionfor revocation of a diesel mechanic's qualifications for cause. Followingthe Committee recommendation, MSHA would approve the program developedby the operator, including the qualification test. Each program would beindividually geared to the different equipment types at a particular mineand the machine specific methods of testing, evaluating, and repairingthe various features of the equipment. The MSHA-approved checklist wouldbe used for the specific equipment at each individual mine site to ensurethat testing was appropriate for the various types of equipment in use.Proposed andSection; 75.1916 addresses the procedures for developing andadministering training and retraining programs for diesel mechanics.<T3>Operating Speeds of Diesel-Powered Equipment (Section 75.1917). </T3>ProposedandSection; 75.1917 addresses roadway conditions, operator control of diesel-poweredequipment and traffic rules including standardizing warning signs. Thisproposal is based on the Committee recommendation which recognized themine related conditions that affect the operation of diesel equipment.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Drafting Information </ITAG>The principal persons responsible for preparing these proposed rules arePeter M. Turcic, George J. Dvorznak, Steve Engleman, and Steve Gigliotti,Office of Technical Support; Jerry O. D. Lemon, Coal Mine Safety and Health;Tony Turyn, Office of Standards, Regulations and Variances; and Heidi W.Strassler, Office of the Solicitor, Department of Labor. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Executive Order 12291 and Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG>A. Summary of Costs and Benefits The Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) is proposing standardsand regulations for diesel-powered equipment in underground coal mines.These standards address the approval of diesel-powered equipment, the safeuse of the equipment, and the protection of miners' health. Executive Order 12291 requires that a regulatory impact analysis be performedfor any regulations that would have a major impact on the economy. MSHAhas determined that these standards and regulations would not result inmajor cost increases nor have a major effect of $l00 million or more onthe economy. MSHA data shows that this rulemaking will affect approximately 13,100 employeesat 116 underground coal mines. About 89 large mines and 27 small mines(of which 20 were operating during the past year) will be affected. Diesel-powered equipment has been used for many years in underground metaland nonmetal mines and has been increasingly used in coal mines duringthe past 10 years. The use of diesel-powered equipment in underground coalmines has increased from 175 units in 30 mines in 1977 to over 1,500 unitsin about 120 mines in September 1989. Given the current state of the industryand assuming no change in existing regulations, about 2,720 pieces of diesel-poweredequipment may be used in about 220 mines by the year 2000. The benefits of the proposed rule are the fatalities, injuries, and illnessesthat would be prevented at these underground coal mines. These benefitscan be divided between those injuries and fatalities resulting from firesand other sources, and illnesses and deaths resulting from various respiratoryeffects including lung cancer. The primary safety hazards associated withthe use of diesel-powered equipment are fires and explosions. Althoughthere have been fires involving diesel-powered equipment in surface andunderground coal and metal and nonmetal mines, there have been few in undergroundcoal mines. MSHA believes that diesel-powered equipment usage is increasingand the resulting likelihood of fires related to diesel-powered equipmentis increasing. Other types of accidents that can be reduced may resultfrom heat, noise, and operating speeds. The Agency believes that increasedbenefits will result after promulgation of these rules. Finally, thereexist a potential hazards to employee health resulting from the exhaustof diesel-powered equipment in underground coal mines. These include respiratoryimpairment, the increased risk of lung cancer and other adverse healtheffects such as increased susceptibility to airway infection. The promulgationof these proposed rules will reduce these adverse health effects. Lack of data prevents MSHA from conducting a quantitative benefits analysisof the hazardous health effects associated with exposure to diesel emissions.MSHA requests data to determine current exposure levels by job category,number of workers exposed, and the risk associated with each exposure level.Data is also lacking to calculate the potential benefits resulting fromimproved safety. MSHA requests data to determine the potential benefitsresulting from improved safety and the use of diesel-powered equipment.The compliance costs associated with the proposed standards directly impacttwo industry groups: manufacturers of diesel-powered mining equipment andoperators of underground coal mines. The total annual and annualized costfor equipment manufacturers is about $267,000. Most, if not all, of thiscompliance cost, however, will be passed on to purchasers in the form ofincreased equipment costs. The total initial cost for underground coal mines is about $2,110,300 orabout $18,300 per mine. About $278,900 or over 13 percent of this initialcost is incurred by small mines. The average initial cost is $10,300 persmall mine and $20,600 per large mine. The total annual operating and annualizedcost is about $8,233,400 or about $71,000 per mine. About $141,300 or lessthan 2 percent of the annual cost is incurred by small mines. The annualcompliance cost is about $5,200 per small mine and $91,000 per large mine.The mine operator's choice to use diesel-powered equipment, therefore,reflects a consideration of compliance costs as they relate to increasedproductivity resulting from using diesel- powered equipment. MSHA concludesthat the proposed rule will not present a significant economic impact onunderground coal mines. Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980, MSHA has analyzed the impactof the proposal upon small businesses. Several standards impact small minesdisproportionately because they contain the same requirements irrespectiveof the numbers of pieces of diesel-powered equipment in use at the mine.The most costly standards, however, impose costs in direct proportion tothe number of pieces of equipment affected. MSHA preliminarily determinesthat the proposed standards and regulations for diesel-powered equipmentin underground coal mines will not have a significant adverse impact upona substantial number of small coal mines. B. Request for Additional Information MSHA requests additional information to form a better basis for its finalregulatory impact analysis. All information received will be carefullyevaluated in developing the final rule. Of particular interest to MSHAis information concerning the following: 1. How many cases of worker illness due to diesel exhaust exposures havebeen reported at your mine? What types of illnesses? What were the circumstancesof exposure? What steps were taken to lower the exposure? 2. What is being done to measure exposure to diesel exhaust? What kindof equipment is used to determine worker exposure? How often are measurementstaken? 3. What are your current exposure levels of diesel exhaust by job category?How many workers are exposed? How often do exposures occur (hourly, daily,weekly)? What is the duration of these exposures (hours per day, days perweek)? 4. What measures are being taken to reduce general worker exposures todiesel exhaust? 5. How many incidents of worker injury unique to diesel equipment (forexample, unsafe operating speeds, noise, burns from fuel) have occurredin your mine? What types of diesel equipment have been associated withthese incidents? How many pieces of diesel equipment are used in your mine?6. What would be the impact of the engineering controls identified in theproposed rule? What would be the quantitative effect of these controlsupon the productivity of diesel equipment? What would be the quantitativeeffect of the work practices required in the proposed rule upon the productivityof diesel equipment? If possible, provide estimates by general type ofequipment. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>The proposed rule contains information collection requirements in andSection;andSection;70.1900 (a), (b), and (d); 70.1900(a)(1); 70.1901(g); 75.390(b); 75.1907(a)(3)(iv);75.1911 (i), (j), and (k) and 75.1912 (g), (h), and (i); 75.1914(d); 75.1915and 75.1916; and part 7, subparts E, F, and G. These paperwork requirementshave been submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for reviewunder Section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The respondents in each of the paperwork provisions would be mine operators.Each of the following public reporting burden hour estimates includes thetime for reviewing instructions, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing the review of the collection information. The resultantinformation collection would be used by MSHA to assess compliance withthe proposed requirements. <T3>Exposure monitoring records.</T3> These records are necessary for themine operator to assess exposure trends and whether the exposures are belowthe permissible limits. Recording and reviewing the weekly data would alertoperators and MSHA to exposure and equipment problems. The public reportingburden for this collection of information is estimated to average 3 minutesper weekly sample of the average 7 splits per large mine and 2 splits persmall mine for a total annual burden of 5,281 hours. <T3>Statement of low sulfur content in diesel fuel.</T3> These recordsare necessary in order for mine operators to justify to MSHA that it isunnecessary to test for potential sulfur dioxide emissions because thesulfur content of the diesel fuel is less than 0.25 percent. The publicreporting burden for this collection of information is estimated to bezero hours because it will be less costly for operators to use high sulfurfuel and perform air monitoring than for operators to pay the low sulfurfuel premium and to pay the costs of obtaining such certification fromthe fuel supplier. <T3>Personal exposure monitoring records.</T3> These records are necessaryin order for the mine operator to determine which employees have been exposedabove the permissible exposure limits and the extent of the potential overexposure.Recording the data and informing the employee would alert both mine operatorsand employees to the exposure problem. The public reporting burden forthis collection of information is estimated to be zero hours because compliancewith the proposed requirements for engineering controls and work practiceswill ensure that personal exposure monitoring will not be necessary. <T3>Mine ventilation plan records.</T3> These records are necessary inorder for MSHA to determine whether the required mine ventilation planis sufficient to ensure acceptable air quantity. The public reporting burdenfor this collection of information is estimated to be negligible becauselisting the air quantity requirements of diesel-powered equipment wouldadd little time to the ventilation plan submission. Any future modificationsof the ventilation plan due to the addition of diesel-powered equipmentwould be performed as part of the routine biannual ventilation plan submissionand would not require an additional application. <T3>Approval for locomotive use.</T3> These records are necessary in orderfor MSHA to ensure that the use of locomotives that do not have approvedpower packages would be limited until such time as approved power packagessuitable for mine conditions and locomotive design are available. The publicreporting burden for this collection of information is estimated to benegligible because there are relatively few locomotives that do not haveapproved power packages. <T3>Fire suppression system inspection.</T3> These records are necessaryin order for the mine operators to ensure that the systems are examinedroutinely and, thus, kept in operating order. The mine operator would usethis weekly record to determine if needed repairs were conducted. The publicreporting burden for this collection of information is estimated to average20 minutes per weekly inspection and test of each of the 1,439 pieces ofdiesel-powered equipment for a total annual burden of 24,943 hours. Thepublic reporting burden is also estimated to average 20 minutes per weeklyinspection and test of each of the 319 diesel-fuel storage areas for atotal annual burden of 5,529 hours. <T3>Development of standard operating procedures for evaluating exhaustemissions.</T3> These written procedures are necessary in order for MSHAto ensure that the procedures used to measure diesel exhaust emissionsare valid. The public reporting burden for this collection of informationwould be a one-time effort of 4 hours for each type of diesel-powered equipmentfound in this mine. At an average of 2 types of equipment in the 27 smallmines and 3 types of equipment in the 89 large mines, the total one-timeburden hours would be 1,284 hours.<T3>Testing and evaluating exhaust emissions.</T3> These records are necessaryin order for the mine operator to ensure that the equipment exhaust continuesto meet the required air quality. Recording and reviewing the weekly datawould alert operators when the equipment's emissions are deteriorating,thus signifying a need for equipment maintenance or repair. The publicreporting burden for this collection of information is estimated to average20 minutes per week for each of the 1,439 pieces of diesel-powered equipment.The total annual burden hours would be 24,943 hours.<T3>Underground diesel mechanic certification.</T3> These records are necessaryin order to ensure that only appropriately trained and certified dieselmechanics are allowed to maintain and repair diesel-powered equipment inunderground coal mines. The average public reporting burden for this collectionof information would be: 2 hours to develop the examination; 9 hours toprepare and submit for approval a training program; 5 hours to prepareand submit for approval a retraining program; 4 hours at small mines and6 hours at large mines to administer the examination; 10 hours of initialtraining (5 for the instructor and 5 for the trainee) for each type ofequipment upon which the mechanic may work; and 5 hours of retraining (2.5for the instructor and 2.5 for the trainee) for each type of equipmentupon which the mechanic may work. The total first-year burden would be19,080 hours and the annual burden would be 10,242 hours. <T3>MSHA approvals of engines and power packages.</T3> These applicationsare necessary for MSHA to ensure that only approved nonpermissible enginesand power packages are used on diesel-powered equipment. The public reportingburden for this collection of information is estimated to average 4 hoursper application. At 33 existing engines and 113 existing power packages,the first-year initial burden hours would be 584 hours. At 6 new enginesand 15 new power packages every year, the total annual burden hours wouldbe 84 hours. Send comments regarding these burden estimates or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burdento Patricia W. Silvey; Director, Office of Standards, Regulations, andVariances; MSHA; Room 631; Ballston Tower andplusmin;3; 4015 Wilson Boulevard;Arlington, Virginia 22203 and to the Office of Information and RegulatoryAffairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503; Attention:Desk Officer for MSHA. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Executive Order 12612 </ITAG>The Agency has reviewed the final rule in accordance with Executive Order12612 regarding federalism and has determined that the rule does not havesufficient federalism implications to warrant the preparation of a FederalismAssessment under this Executive Order. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 30 CFR Parts 7, 70, 75</ITAG>Mine safety and health, Underground coal mines, Diesel-powered equipment.Accordingly, it is proposed to amend chapter I of title 30, Code of FederalRegulations as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 26, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David C. O'Neal,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Mine Safety and Health.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 7_[AMENDED] </ITAG>A. It is proposed to amend 30 CFR part 7 as follows: 1. The authority citation for part 7 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 30 U.S.C. 957.</ITAG>2. New subparts E, F, G are added to part 7 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart E_Diesel Engines Intended for Use in Underground Coal Mines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.81 Purpose and effective date. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.82 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.83 Application requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.84 Technical requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.85 Critical characteristics. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.86 Test equipment and specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.87 Test for determination of maximum fuel-air ratio. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.88 Test for determination of ventilation rate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.89 Test for determination of particulate index. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.90 Approval marking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.91 Post-approval product audit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.92 New technology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart F_Diesel Power Packages Intended for Use in Areas of UndergroundCoal Mines Where Permissible Electric Equipment is Required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.95 Purpose and effective date. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.96 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.97 Application requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.98 Technical requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.99 Critical characteristics. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.100 Explosion tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.101 Surface temperature tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.102 Exhaust gas cooling efficiency test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.103 Safety system control tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.104 Internal static pressure test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.105 Approval marking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.106 Post-approval product audit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.107 New technology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.108 Power package checklist. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart G_Diesel Power Packages Intended for Use in Areas of UndergroundCoal Mines Where Permissible Electric Equipment is Not Required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.111 Purpose and effective date. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.112 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.113 Application requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.114 Technical requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.115 Critical characteristics. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.116 Surface temperature tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.117 Exhaust gas cooling efficiency tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.118 Safety system control tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.119 Approval marking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.120 Post-approval product audit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.121 New technology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">7.122 Power package checklist. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart E_Diesel Engines Intended for Use in Underground Coal Mines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.81</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and effective date. </ITAG>This subpart establishes the specific engine performance and exhaust emissionrequirements for MSHA approval of diesel engines for use in areas of undergroundcoal mines where permissible electric equipment is required and areas wherenon-permissible electric equipment is allowed. Any engine approved underthis subpart may be incorporated with a power package which shall meetthe appropriate requirements of subpart F or G of this part. It is effective[60 days after date of final publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>].<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.82</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>The following definitions apply in this subpart.<T3>Category A engines.</T3> Diesel engines intended for use in areas ofunderground coal mines where permissible electric equipment is required.<T3>Category B engines.</T3> Diesel engines intended for use in areas ofunderground coal mines where nonpermissible electric equipment is permitted.<T3>Corrosion-resistant material.</T3> Material that has at least the corrosion-resistantproperties of type 304 stainless steel.<T3>Diesel engine.</T3> Any compression ignition internal combustion engineusing the basic diesel cycle where combustion results from the sprayingof fuel into air heated by compression.<T3>Diesel particulate matter (part).</T3> Any material, with the exceptionof water, which is collected on a filter passed by an air diluted exhauststream. <T3>Exhaust emission.</T3> Any substance emitted to the atmosphere fromthe exhaust port of the combustion chamber of a diesel engine. <T3>Intermediate speed.</T3> Peak torque speed as specified by the manufactureror 60 percent of rated speed, whichever is higher. <T3>Peak torque speed.</T3> The speed at which an engine develops maximumtorque. <T3>Percent load.</T3> The fraction of the maximum available torque atan engine speed. <T3>Rated horsepower (HP).</T3> The maximum horsepower output of a dieselengine as stated by the manufacturer. <T3>Rated speed.</T3> The engine speed at which the rated HP is obtained.<T3>Steady-state condition.</T3> Diesel engine operating condition whichis at a constant speed and load and at stabilized temperatures and pressures.<T3>Total oxides of nitrogen (NO</T3><T2>x</T2>). The sum total of the measured parts per millions (ppm) ofnitric oxide (NO) plus the measured ppm of nitrogen dioxide (NO<T2>2</T2>). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.83</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application requirements. </ITAG>(a) An application for approval of a diesel engine shall contain sufficientinformation to document compliance with the technical requirements of thissubpart and specify whether the application is for a category A engineor category B engine. (b) The application shall include the following engine specifications:(1) Model number.(2) Number of cylinders, cylinder bore diameter, piston stroke, enginedisplacement. (3) Maximum intake vacuum and exhaust backpressure. (4) Rated speeds, rated horsepowers at rated speeds, peak torque speed,maximum rated torque, high idle, minimum permitted engine speed at fullload, low idle. (5) Fuel consumption at rated horsepowers and at the maximum rated torque.(6) Performance specifications of turbocharger, if applicable. (c) The application shall include drawings of the following componentsspecifying all details affecting the technical requirements of this subpart.Composite drawings specifying the required construction details may besubmitted instead of individual drawings: (1) Cylinder head. (2) Piston. (3) Inlet valve. (4) Exhaust valve. (5) Cam shaft_profile. (6) Fuel cam shaft, if applicable. (7) Injector body. (8) Injector nozzle. (9) Injection fuel pump. (10) Governor. (11) Turbocharger_water-cooled, if applicable. (12) Aftercooler, if applicable. (13) Valve guide. (14) Intake manifold. (15) Water-cooled exhaust manifold, if applicable. (16) Cylinder head gasket. (I7) Precombustion chamber, if applicable. (d) The application shall include a drawing showing the general arrangementof the engine. (e) All drawings shall be titled, dated, numbered, and include the latestrevision number. (f) When all necessary testing has been completed, the following informationshall be submitted: (1) The gaseous ventilation rate for the rated speed and horsepower. (2) The particulate index for each rated speed and horsepower. (3) A fuel deration chart for altitudes for each rated speed and horsepower.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.84 Technical requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Fuel injection adjustment. </T3>The fuel injection system of the engineshall be constructed so that the quantity of fuel injected can be controlledat a desired maximum value. This adjustment shall be changeable only afterbreaking a seal or by altering the design. (b) <T3>Maximum fuel-air ratio. </T3>At the maximum fuel-air ratio determinedby andSection; 7.87 of this subpart, the concentrations (by volume, dry basis)of carbon monoxide (CO) and oxides of nitrogen (NO<T2>X</T2>) in the undiluted exhaust gas shall not exceed the following:(1) For category A engines: CO no more than 0.30 percent; NO<T2>X</T2> no more than 0.20 percent. (2) For category B engines: CO no more than 0.25 percent; NO<T2>X</T2> no more than 0.20 percent. (c) <T3>Gaseous emissions ventilation rate. </T3>For each rated speed and horsepowerrequested, the ventilation rate necessary to dilute gaseous exhaust emissionsto the following permissible exposure levels shall be determined underandSection; 7.88 of this subpart: TWA<T2>CO2</T2>; TWA<T2>CO</T2>; TWA<T2>NO</T2>; TWA<T2>NO2</T2>. Each rate shall be determined using the maximum f/a ratioestablished by paragraph (b) of this section. (d) <T3>Fuel deration. </T3>The fuel rates specified in the fuel deration chartshall be based on the tests conducted under paragraphs (b) and (c) of thissection and shall ensure that the maximum f/a ratio determined under paragraph(b) is not exceeded at the altitudes specified in the fuel deration chart.(e) <T3>Particulate index. </T3>For each rated speed and horsepower requested,the particulate index necessary to dilute the exhaust particulate emissionsto</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">1 mg./m\3\ shall be determined under andSection; 7.89 of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.85 Critical characteristics. </ITAG>The following critical characteristics shall be inspected or tested oneach diesel engine to which an approval marking is affixed: (a) Fuel rate is set to altitude.(b) Fuel injection pump adjustment is sealed, if applicable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.86 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Test equipment and specifications. </ITAG>The principal components of a dynamometer test cell and emissions samplingsystem to test for determination of maximum f/a ratio, ventilation rates,and the particulate index shall be as follows: (a) <T3>Dynamometer test cell. </T3>(1) An apparatus for measuring torque shallbe provided and accurate to andplusmin;0.5 percent of the indicated fullload reading. (2) An apparatus for measuring revolutions per minute (rpm) shall be providedand accurate to andplusmin;0.5 percent of the indicated rpm reading. (3) An apparatus for measuring temperatures shall be provided and accurateto andplusmin;0.75 percent of the indicated reading. (4) An apparatus for measuring pressure shall be provided and accurateto andplusmin;3 percent of the indicated reading. (5) An apparatus for measuring fuel flow shall be provided and accurateto andplusmin;1 percent of full scale reading. An accuracy of andplusmin;2percent of full scale reading is permitted at an idle power point. (6) An apparatus for measuring the inlet air flow rate of the diesel engineshall be provided and accurate to andplusmin;2 percent of the indicated reading.(7) For testing category A engines, an apparatus for metering in 1.0andplusmin;0.1percent, by volume, of methane (CH<T2>4</T2>) into the intake air system shall be provided. (8) The test fuel shall be a low volatile hydrocarbon fuel classified asASTM D975, No. 2D, diesel fuel and which has a flash point of 125 anddegrees;F(52 anddegrees;C) or greater at standard temperature and pressure. The sulfurcontent shall be a minimum of 0.25 percent, by weight. The test fuel temperatureat the inlet to the diesel engine's fuel injection pump shall be controlledto 104 anddegrees;F andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (40 anddegrees;C andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C).(9) The engine coolant outlet temperature (if applicable) shall be controlledto within andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (3 anddegrees;C) of the nominal thermostatvalue specified by the manufacturer. (b) <T3>Gaseous emission sampling system. </T3>(1) A schematic of the gaseoussampling system which is to be used for testing category A engines underthis subpart is shown in Figure E-1. Since other sampling or analyticalsystems can produce equivalent results, exact conformance with Figure E-1is not required. The following list of components is shown: (i) Filters_F1, F2, F3, and F4. (ii) Flowmeters_FL1, FL2, FL3, FL4, FL5, FL6, and FL7. (iii) Upstream Gauges_G1, G2, and G5. (iv) Downstream Gauges_G3, G4, and G6. (v) Pressure Gauges_P1, P2, P3, P4, P5, and P6. (vi) Water traps WT1 and WT2 shall remove water from the sample by condensation.The sample gas temperature within the water trap shall be monitored andshall not exceed 45 anddegrees;F (7 anddegrees;C). Chemical dryers are notan acceptable method of removing the water. (vii) Regulators_R1, R2, R3, R4, R5, R6, and R7. (viii) Selector Valves_V1, V2, V3, V4, V6, V7, V8, V15, and V19. (ix) Heated Selector Valves_V5, V13, V16, and V17. (x) Flow Control Valves_V9, V10, V11, and V12. (xi) Heated Flow Control Valves_V14 and V18. (xii) Pump_Sample Transfer Pump.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-M 001 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42"> Insert illustration 2 104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-C   </ITAG>(xiii) Temperature Sensor_(T1). (xiv) Dryer_D1 and D2. (2) A schematic of the gaseous sampling system which is to be used fortesting category B engines under this subpart is shown in Figure E-2. Sinceother sampling or analytical systems can produce equivalent results, exactconformance with Figure E-2 is not required. The following list of componentsis shown: (i) Filters, F1, F2, F3, and F4. (ii) Flowmeters_FL1, FL2, FL3, and FL4. (iii) Upstream Gauges_G1, and G2. (iv) Downstream Gauges_G3, and G4. (v) Pressure Gauges_P1, P2, P3, and P4. (vi) Water traps WT1 and WT2 shall remove water from the sample by condensation.The sample gas temperature within the water trap shall be monitored andshall not exceed 45 anddegrees;F (7 anddegrees;C). Chemical dryers are notan acceptable method of removing the water. (vii) Regulators_R1, R2, R3, and R4. (viii) Selector Valves_V1, V2, V3, V4, V6, and V7. (ix) Heated Selector Valves_V5, V8, and V12. (x) Flow Control Valves_V9, V10, V11. (xi) Heated Flow Control Valves_V13. (xii) Pump_Sample Transfer Pump. (xiii) Temperature Sensor_(T1). (3) All components or parts of components that are in contact with thesample gas or corrosive calibration gases shall be corrosion-resistantmaterial.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-M 001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 2 106</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-C  </ITAG>(4) All analyzers shall obtain the sample to be analyzed from the samesample probe. (5) CO and CO<T2>2</T2> measurements shall be made on a dry basis. (6) Calibration or span gases for the NO<T2>X</T2> measurement system shall pass through the NO<T2>2</T2> to NO converter. (7) The sample probe shall be straight, closed-end, multiholed, and shallbe placed inside the exhaust pipe. The probe length shall be at least 80percent of the diameter of the pipe. The total open area of the samplingholes shall not exceed the total cross-sectional area of the probe. Theangular spacing of any 2 holes around the same circumference shall notbe 160anddegrees; to 200anddegrees;. (8) The sample probe shall be located in the exhaust pipe at a distanceof 3-10 feet (1-3 meters) from the exhaust manifold outlet flange or theoutlet of the turbocharger. (9) Within 20 seconds after introduction of span gases at the sample probeor valve V5, all analyzers shall respond with a reading of 90 percent ofthe span gas concentration. (10) <T3>General analyzer specifications. </T3>(i) The analyzer shall respondto an instantaneous change at the entrance to the analyzer with a responseequal to 95 percent of that change in 6.0 seconds or less on all analyzerranges. The change shall be at least 60 percent of full scale reading forthe analysis range. (ii) The precision of the analyzer shall be andplusmin;1 percent or lessof full scale readings for each range used. The precision is defined as2.5 times the standard deviations of 10 repetitive responses to a givencalibration or span gas.(iii) The analyzer peak to peak response to zero and calibration of spangases over any 10 second period shall not exceed 2 percent of full scalereading within the analysis range. (iv) The analyzer zero-response drift during a 1-hour period shall be lessthan 2 percent of full scale reading on the lowest range used. The zero-responseis defined as the mean response including noise to a zero gas during a30-second time interval. (v) The analyzer span drift during a 1-hour period shall be less than 2percent of full scale reading on the lowest range used. The analyzer spanis defined as the difference between the span response and the zero response.The span response is defined as the mean response including noise to aspan gas during a 30 second time interval. (11) <T3>CO and CO</T3><T2>2</T2> <T3>analyzer specifications. </T3>(i) Measurements shall be made with nondispersiveinfrared (NDIR) analyzers. (ii) The minimum water rejection ratio (maximum H<T2>2</T2>O interference) shall be as follows: (A) For CO analyzers: 1000:1. (B) For CO<T2>2</T2> analyzers: 100:1. (iii) The minimum CO<T2>2</T2> rejection ratio (maximum CO<T2>2</T2> interference) for CO analyzers shall be 5000:1. (12) When NO<T2>x</T2> analyzer specifications use a chemiluminescence (CL) analyzerthe following shall apply: (i) From the sample point to the NO<T2>2</T2> to NO converter, the NO<T2>x</T2> sample shall be maintained between 203 anddegrees;F (95 anddegrees;C)and 446 anddegrees;F (230 anddegrees;C). (ii) For high vacuum CL analyzers with heated capillary modules, supplyinga heated sample from the probe to the capillary module is sufficient. (iii) The NO<T2>2</T2> to NO converter efficiency shall be at least 90 percent. (iv) The quench interference must be less than 3.0 percent. (13) When NO<T2>x</T2> analyzer specifications use an NDIR analyzer system the followingshall apply: (i) The system shall include a NO<T2>2</T2> to NO converter, a water trap, and a NDIR analyzer. (ii) From the sample point to the NO<T2>2</T2> to NO converter, the NO<T2>x</T2> sample shall be maintained between 203 anddegrees;F (95 anddegrees;C)and 446 anddegrees;F (230 anddegrees;C). (iii) The minimum water rejection ratio (maximum water interference) forthe NO<T2>x</T2> NDIR analyzer shall be 5000:1. (iv) The minimum CO<T2>2</T2> rejection ratio (maximum CO<T2>2</T2> interference) for the NO<T2>x</T2> NDIR analyzer shall be 30,000:1. (14) When CH<T2>4</T2> analyzer specifications use a heated flame ionization detector(HFID) the following shall apply: (i) The analyzer shall be fitted with a constant temperature oven housingthe detector and sample-handling components. The detector, oven, and sample-handlingcomponents within the oven shall be suitable for continuous operation attemperatures from 347 anddegrees;F (175 anddegrees;C) to 392 anddegrees;F (200anddegrees;C) andplusmin;4 anddegrees;F (2 anddegrees;C). (ii) The analyzer fuel shall contain 40 andplusmin;2 percent hydrogen. Thebalance shall be helium. The mixture shall contain less than 2 parts permillion carbon (ppmC) hydrocarbon. (iii) The burner air shall contain less than 2 ppmC hydrocarbon. (iv) The percent of oxygen interference shall be less than 3 percent. (15) An NDIR analyzer for measuring CH<T2>4</T2> may be used in place of the HFID specified in paragraph (b)(14)of this section and shall conform to the requirements of andSection; 7.86(b)(l0)of this subpart. Methane measurements shall be made on a dry basis. (16) Calibration gas values shall be traceable to the National Bureau ofStandards (NBS), ``Standard Reference Materials'' (SRM's). The analyticalaccuracy of the calibration gas values shall be within 2.0 percent of theassigned values. (17) Span gas values shall be traceable to NBS SRM's. The analytical accuracyof the span gas values shall be within 3.0 percent of the assigned values.(18) Calibration or span gases for the CO and CO<T2>2</T2> analyzers shall have zero-grade nitrogen as a diluent. Calibrationor span gases for the CH<T2>4</T2> analyzer shall be CH<T2>4</T2> with zero-grade air or nitrogen as diluent. (19) Calibration or span gases for the NO<T2>x</T2> analyzer shall be NO<T2>x</T2> with a maximum NO<T2>2</T2> concentration of 5 percent of the nominal NO value. Zero-gradenitrogen shall be the diluent. (20) Zero-grade gases for the CO, CO<T2>2</T2>, and NO<T2>x</T2> analyzers shall be either zero-grade air or zero-grade nitrogen.Zero-grade gas for CH<T2>4</T2> analyzer shall be zero-grade air or nitrogen. (21) The allowable zero-grade gas (air or nitrogen) impurity concentrationsshall not exceed 10 ppm CO, 400 ppm CO<T2>2</T2>, and 1 ppm NO. (c) <T3>Particulate sampling system. </T3>(1) A schematic of a particulatesampling system for testing under this subpart is shown in Figures E-3and E-4. The system consists of a dilution air filter, dilution tunnel,heat exchanger, pumps, mass measurement device, particulate probe, filters,and associated temperature sensors. A double dilution method or a partialdilution system may also be used in conformance with the specificationsrequired in this paragraph. (2) The mass of particulate in the exhaust is determined via filtration.The exhaust temperature shall not exceed 125 anddegrees;F (51.7 anddegrees;C)at the primary filter. (3) Exhaust system backpressure shall not be artificially lowered by theparticulate sampling system or dilution air inlet. (4) The gas mixture temperature shall be measured at a point immediatelyahead of the pump or mass measurement device and after the heat exchangerand shall be maintained within andplusmin;10 anddegrees;F (5.6 anddegrees;C)of the average operating temperature observed during the test. (5) The flow capacity of the system shall be large enough to eliminatewater condensation.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-M 002</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illustration(s) 2 112-113</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-C </ITAG>(6) The flow capacity of the system shall maintain the diluted exhauststream at a temperature of 125 anddegrees;F (51.7 anddegrees;C) or less atthe particulate sample probe inlet. (7) The mass flow measurement device of the sample system shall be accurateto andplusmin;5 percent of the indicated reading. (8) The dilution air shall have a temperature of 77 anddegrees;F andplusmin;9anddegrees;F (25 anddegrees;C andplusmin;5 anddegrees;C), and be_(i) Filtered at the air inlet; or (ii) Sampled to determine background particulate levels, which can thenbe subtracted from the values measured in the exhaust stream. (9) The dilution tunnel shall_(i) Be small enough in diameter to cause turbulent flow (Reynolds numbergreater than 4,000) and of sufficient length to cause mixing of the exhaustand dilution air; (ii) Be constructed of electrically conductive material which does notreact with the exhaust component; (iii) Be electrically grounded; (iv) Have the engine exhaust directed downstream at the point where itis introduced into the dilution tunnel; and (v) Have a total length of the tubing from the exit of the engine exhaustmanifold or turbocharger outlet to the dilution tunnel not to exceed 32feet. When the total length exceeds 12 feet, then all tubing in excessof 12 feet shall be insulated. The radial thickness of the insulation shallbe at least R inches, where R=16(k)^(2)r, where k=Thermal conductivityof the insulating material (Btu/hr-ft-anddegrees;F), and r=Outer radius ofuninsulated tubing (inches). (10) The particulate sample probe shall_(i) Be installed in the dilution tunnel facing upstream, on the dilutiontunnel centerline, and approximately 10 dilution tunnel diameters downstreamof the point where the engine's exhaust enters the dilution tunnel; (ii) Have 0.5 inches (1.27 cm) minimum inside diameter; (iii) Have a distance from the probe's sample tip to the filter holderof at least 5 probe diameters for filters located inside the dilution tunnel,and not more than 40 inches (102 cm) for filters located outside the dilutiontunnel; (iv) Be designed to minimize the deposit of particulate in the probe; and(v) Be constructed of electrically conductive material which does not reactwith the exhaust components. (11) The inlet gas temperature to the particulate sample pump or mass measurementdevice shall remain a constant temperature of andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (2.8anddegrees;C) if flow compensation is not used. (12) The particulate sampling filters shall_(i) Be fluorocarbon-coated glass fiber filters or fluorocarbon-based (membrane)filters; (ii) Have a minimum diameter of 2.75 inches (70 mm), 2.36 inches (60 mm)stain diameter; (iii) Have a recommended minimum loading on a primary 2.75 inch (70 mm)filter of 0.0019 ounces (5.3 milligrams); and (iv) Simultaneously sample the diluted exhaust by a pair of filters (oneprimary and one backup filter). The backup filter holder shall be locatedno more than 4 inches (10.2 cm) downstream of the primary filter holder.The primary and backup filters shall not be in contact with each other.(13) <T3>Weighing chamber specifications. </T3>(i) The temperature of the chamberin which the particulate filters are conditioned and weighed shall be maintainedto within andplusmin;10 anddegrees;F (6 anddegrees;C) of a set point between68 anddegrees;F (20 anddegrees;C) and 86 anddegrees;F (30 anddegrees;C) duringall filter conditioning and weighing. (ii) The relative humidity of the chamber (room) in which the particulatefilters are conditioned and weighed shall be maintained to within andplusmin;10percent (relative humidity) of a set point between 30 and 70 percent duringall filter conditioning and weighing. (iii) The chamber environment shall be free of any ambient contaminants(such as dust) that would settle on the particulate filters during theirstabilization. This shall be determined as follows: (A) Two unused reference filters remain in the weighing room at all times.(B) The filters are weighed once each 24-hour period. (C) If the weight of either or both filters changes by more than andplusmin;1.0percent of the nominal filter loading (a recommended minimum of 5.3 mg)during the conditioning period, then all filters in the process of beingstabilized should be discarded and any tests repeated. (D) The reference filters shall be changed at least once per month. (14) The microgram balance used to determine the weights of all filtersshall have a precision (standard deviation) of 20 micrograms and readabilityof 10 micrograms. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.87</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Test for determination of maximum fuel-air ratio. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedure.</T3> (1) Couple the diesel engine to the dynamometerand connect the sampling and measurement devices specified in andSection;7.86 of this subpart. (2) Install sample probe as specified in andSection; 7.86(b) (7) and (8)of this subpart. (3) Prior to testing, zero and span the CO and NO<T2>x</T2> analyzers to the lowest analyzer range that will be used duringthis test. (4) Run the engine. (i) For maximum CO determination test, the intake and exhaust restrictionson the engine shall be set as follows: (A) Inlet vacuum (inch H<T2>2</T2>O)=(P<T2>b</T2>andmultiply;13.6)^(400^R<T2>i</T2>). (B) Exhaust backpressure (inch H<T2>2</T2>O)=(400+R<T2>e</T2>)^(P<T2>b</T2>andmultiply;13.6). (C) P<T2>b</T2>=barometric pressure (inch mercury, Hg). (D) R<T2>i</T2>=manufacturers recommended maximum inlet restriction (inch H<T2>2</T2>O). (E) R<T2>e</T2>=manufacturers recommended maximum exhaust restriction (inchH<T2>2</T2>O). (F) The inlet and exhaust restrictions shall be set at high idle for anaturally aspirated engine, and at rated speed and horsepower for a turbochargedengine. These restrictions shall be set within 0.2 inch Hg. (ii) For maximum NO<T2>x</T2> determination, the intake and exhaust restrictions on the engineshall be set as specified in paragraph (a)(4)(i) of this section exceptthat R<T2>i</T2>-manufacturers recommended clean air filter restriction (inchH<T2>2</T2>O). (5) During the test, the engine shall be at a steady-state condition beforethe exhaust gas samples are collected and other test data is measured.For category A engines, 1.0%andplusmin;0.1 CH<T2>4</T2> shall be injected into the engine's intake air. (6) Operate the engine at several speed/torque conditions to determinethe concentrations of CO and NO<T2>x</T2>, dry basis, in the raw exhaust. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance.</T3> The CO and NO<T2>x</T2> concentrations in the raw exhaust shall not exceed the limitsspecified in andSection; 7.84(b) of this subpart throughout the specifiedoperational range of the engine. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.88</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Test for determination of ventilation rate. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedure.</T3> (1) Couple the diesel engine to the dynamometerand attach the sampling and measurement devices specified in andSection;7.86 of this subpart. (2) Prior to testing, zero and span the CO, CO<T2>2</T2>, NO<T2>x</T2>, and CH<T2>4</T2> analyzers to the lowest analyzer range that will be used duringthis test. (3) Run the engine. For this test, the intake and exhaust restrictionson the engine shall be set as specified in andSection; 7.87(a)(4)(ii) ofthis subpart.(4) During the test, the engine shall be at a steady-state condition beforethe exhaust gas samples are collected and other data is measured. For categoryA engines, 1.0%andplusmin;0.1 CH<T2>4</T2>, by volume, shall be injected into the engine's intake air.(5) Operate the engine at the speed and load combinations listed belowto measure the raw exhaust gas concentration, dry basis, of CO, CO<T2>2</T2>, NO, and NO<T2>2</T2>. For category A engines, the concentration of CH<T2>4</T2> shall also be measured. (i) Test speeds shall be at_ (A) Each rated speed for which approval is requested. (B) The speed at which peak torque occurs. (C) The two speeds between the maximum rated speed requested and peak torquespeed. (D) Governor overrun speeds. (ii) At each of the test speeds listed in paragraph (a)(5)(i) of this section,the following percent loads shall be run: 100 percent, 90 percent, 80 percent,70 percent, 60 percent, 50 percent, 25 percent, 2 percent (andplusmin;2 percent).(6) The gaseous ventilation rate for each exhaust gas contaminant shallbe calculated as follows_(i) The following abbreviations shall apply to both category A and categoryB engine calculations as appropriate_<ITAG tagnum="16">cfm_Cubic feet per min (ft\3\/min) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Exh_Exhaust </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">A_Air (lbs/hr) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">H_Grains of water per lb. of dry intake air </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">J_Conversion factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">m_Mass flow rate (mass/hr) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">TI_Intake air temperature (anddegrees;F) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">PCAir_Percent Air </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">PCCH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>_Percent CH<T2>4</T2> (intake air) <ITAG tagnum="16">UCH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>_Unburned CH<T2>4</T2> <ITAG tagnum="16">PCECH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>_Percent Exhaust CH<T2>4</T2> <ITAG tagnum="16">TWA_Time Weighted Average</ITAG>(ii) Exhaust gas flow calculation for category B engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(m Exh)=(m air)+(m fuel)</ITAG>(iii) Fuel/air ratio for category B engines_ <ITAG tagnum="16">(f/a)=(m fuel)^(m air)</ITAG>(iv) For category A engines the methane flow through the engine is determinedby_<ITAG tagnum="16">PCAir=100^PCCH</ITAG><T2>4</T2> <ITAG tagnum="16">Y=(PCAir)(0.289)+(PCCH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>)(0.16) <ITAG tagnum="16">Z=(0.16)(PCCH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>)andCx.1;Y <ITAG tagnum="16">CH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>=(A)(Z)andCx.1;(1^Z)(v) Exhaust gas flow calculation for category A engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(m Exh)=(m air)+(m fuel)+(m CH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>)(vi) Unburned CH<T2>4</T2> (lbs/hr) calculation for category A engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">UCH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>=(m Exh)(0.00552)(PCECH<T2>4</T2>)(vii) Fuel/air ratio for category A engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(f/a)=(m fuel)+(m CH</ITAG><T2>4</T2>) ^(m UCH<T2>4</T2>)andCx.1;(m air)(viii) Conversion from dry to wet basis for both category A and categoryB engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(NO wet basis)=(NO dry basis)(J)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">(NO</ITAG><T2>2</T2> wet basis)=(NO<T2>2</T2> dry basis)(J) <ITAG tagnum="16">(CO</ITAG><T2>2</T2> wet basis)=(CO<T2>2</T2> dry basis)(J) <ITAG tagnum="16">(CO wet basis)=(CO dry basis)(10</ITAG>^4)(J) <ITAG tagnum="16">Where J=(f/a)(^1.87) +(1^(0.00022)(H))</ITAG>(ix) NO and NO<T2>2</T2> correction for humidity and temperature for category A and categoryB engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(NO corr)=(NO wet basis)andCx.1;(E) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">(NO</ITAG><T2>2</T2> corr)=(NO<T2>2</T2> wet basis)andCx.1;(E) <ITAG tagnum="16">Where E=1.0+(R)(H^75)+(G)(TI^85) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Where R=(f/a)(0.044)^(0.0038) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Where G=(f/a)(^0.116)+(0.0053)</ITAG>(x) The calculations for determining the m of each exhaust gas contaminantin grams per hour at each test point shall be as follows for category Aand category B engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(m NO)=(NO corr)(0.000470)(m Exh) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">(m NO</ITAG><T2>2</T2>)=(NO<T2>2</T2> corr)(0.000720)(m Exh) <ITAG tagnum="16">(m CO</ITAG><T2>2</T2>)=(CO<T2>2</T2> wet basis)(6.89)(m Exh) <ITAG tagnum="16">(m CO)=(CO wet basis)(4.38)(m Exh)</ITAG>(xi) The calculations for determining the ventilation rate for each exhaustgas contaminant at each test point shall be as follows for category A andcategory B engines_<ITAG tagnum="16">(cfm NO)=(m NO)(K) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">(cfm NO</ITAG><T2>2</T2>)=(m NO<T2>2</T2>)(K) <ITAG tagnum="16">(cfm CO</ITAG><T2>2</T2>)=(m CO<T2>2</T2>)(K) <ITAG tagnum="16">(cfm CO)=(m CO)(K)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,12,r10</C>  <H1>Where K = </H1><H1>13,913.4 </H1><H2>(pollutant grams/mole) (pollutant TWA)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1"> </ITAG></ITAG> (b) A gaseous ventilation rate for each requested rated speed and horsepowershall be selected as follows: (1) If there is only one rated speed and horsepower requested, the highestgaseous ventilation rate calculated in paragraph (a)(6)(xi) of this sectionshall be the gaseous ventilation rate. (2) If there are several rated speeds and horsepowers requested, the highestgaseous ventilation rate calculated in paragraph (a)(6)(xi) of this sectionfor each operating range shall be the gaseous ventilation rate. (3) All ventilation rates shall be rounded up according to the rates listed:(i) Ventilation rates less than 20,000 cfm shall be rounded up to the next500 cfm.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Example: 10,432 cfm shall be listed 10,500 cfm. (ii) Ventilation rates greater than 20,000 cfm shall be rounded up to thenext 1,000 cfm.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Example: 26,382 cfm shall be listed 27,000 cfm. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.89</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Test for determination of particulate index. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedure.</T3> (1) Couple the diesel engine to the dynamometerand connect the sampling and measurement devices specified in andSection;7.86(a) and andSection; 7.86(c) of this subpart. (2) Prior to testing, condition and weigh the particulate filters as follows:(i) At least 1 hour, but not more than 80 hours, before the test, placeeach filter in an open petri dish and place in a weighing chamber (room)for stabilization.(ii) At the end of the stabilization period, weigh each filter on a balance.The reading is the tare weight. (iii) The filter shall then be stored in a covered petri dish or a sealedfilter holder, either of which shall remain in the weighing chamber untilneeded for testing. (iv) If the filter is not used within 1 hour of its removal from the weighingchamber, it must be re-weighed before use. This limit of 1 hour may bereplaced by an 8-hour limit if any of the following three conditions aremet_ (A) A stabilized filter is placed and kept in a sealed filter holder assemblywith the ends plugged; or, (B) A stabilized filter is placed in a sealed filter holder assembly, whichis then immediately placed in a sample line through which there is no flow;or, (C) A combination of the conditions specified in paragraph (a)(2)(iv) ofthis section. (3) Run the engine. For this test, the intake and exhaust restrictionson the engine shall be set as specified in andSection; 7.87(a)(4)(ii) ofthis subpart. (4) During the test, the engine shall be at a steady state condition beforethe particulate sample is collected and other test data is measured. Forcategory A engines, 1.0%andplusmin;0.1 CH<T2>4</T2>, by volume, shall be injected into the engine's intake air.(5) Operate the engine at the speed and load conditions listed below tocollect particulate on the primary filter to a minimum loading of 0.0019ounces (5.3 mg). One composite filter may be collected or ten individualfilters may be collected at the specified speed and load conditions. (i) Test speeds shall be_ (A) Rated speeds for which approval is requested. (B) Intermediate speed. (ii) Test load shall be at 10 percent, 75 percent, 50 percent, 25 percent,2 percent (andplusmin;2 percent) for each test speed. (6) After completion of the test, condition and weigh the particulate filtersin the weighing chamber as follows_ (i) Condition the filters for at least 1 hour, but not more than 80 hours,in an open petri dish. (ii) At the end of the stabilization period, weigh each filter on a balance.The reading is the gross weight. (iii) The net weight of each filter is its gross weight minus its tareweight. If the sample on the filter contacts the petri dish or any othersurface, the test is void and must be rerun. (iv) A ratio of net weights will be determined by the following formula_<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Ratio of net weights </H1><H1>= </H1><H1>(Net Weight) Primary Filter (P</H1><T2>F</T2>) <H2>(Net Weight) Primary Filter + (Net Weight) Backup Filter. </H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG>If the ratio of weights is greater than 0.95, then P<T2>F</T2> is the net weight of the primary filter only. If the ratio of net weights is less than or equal to 0.95, then P<T2>F</T2> is the sum of the net weights of the primary filter and thebackup filter. (v) The following optional weighing procedure is permitted_ (A) At the end of the stabilization period, weigh both the primary andbackup filters as a pair on the balance. This reading is the tare weight.(B) After the test, in removing the filters from the filter holder, thebackup filter is inverted on top of the primary filter. They must thenbe conditioned in the weighing chamber for at least 1 hour, but not morethan 80 hours. The filters are then weighed as a pair. This reading isthe gross weight of the filters. (7) The particulate index for the mass particulate shall be calculatedfrom the equations listed below_ (i) Abbreviations used_<ITAG tagnum="16">cfm_Cubic feet per min (ft</ITAG>3/min) <ITAG tagnum="16">Part_Particulate (mg/min)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">m mix_Mass flow rate of total diluted exhaust volume (mass/min) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">m sample_Mass flow rate of total sample removed from dilution tunnel(mass/min) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">P</ITAG><T2>F</T2> part_Mass particulate on filter measured at test point (mg)as determined in paragraph (a)(6)(iv) of this section. (ii) Mass of particulate emitted per minute (grams/min) <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1(0,0,0),tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,s50,r25 </C>  <H1>Part mg/min=(m mix mass/min+m sample mass/min) </H1><H1>(P</H1><T2>F</T2> part mg) <H2>(m sample mass/min). </H2><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG> (iii) Determination of particulate index for the mass particulate at eachtest point shall be as follows: cfm Part=(Part mg/min)(35.31 ft\3\/m\3\)andmin16;(1mg/m\3\) (b) A particulate index for each requested rated speed and horsepower shallbe selected as follows_ (1) If there is only one rated speed and horsepower requested, the particulateindex shall be the average of the ten filters or the composite filter collectedas calculated in paragraph (a)(7)(iii) of this section. (2) If there are several rated speeds and horsepowers requested, a separateparticulate index will be determined for each requested rating as calculatedin paragraph (a)(7)(iii) of this section. (3) The particulate index shall be rounded up according to the rates listed_(i) Particulate indices less than 20,000 cfm shall be rounded up to thenext 500 cfm. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Example: 10,432 cfm shall be listed 10,500 cfm. (ii) Particulate indices greater than 20,000 cfm shall be rounded up tothe nearest thousand (1,000) cfm. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Example: 26,382 cfm shall be listed 27,000 cfm. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval marking.</ITAG>Each approved diesel engine shall be identified by a legible and permanentapproval marking inscribed with the assigned MSHA approval number and securelyattached to the diesel engine. The marking shall also contain the followinginformation: (a) Ventilation rate. (b) Rated power. (c) Rated speed. (d) High idle. (e) Maximum altitude before deration. (f) Engine model number. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.91 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Post-approval product audit. </ITAG>Upon request by MSHA, but not more than once a year except for cause, theapproval holder shall make a diesel engine available for audit at no cost.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">New technology. </ITAG>MSHA may approve a diesel engine that incorporates technology for whichthe requirements of this subpart are not applicable if MSHA determinesthat the diesel engine is as safe as those which meet the requirementsof this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart F_Diesel Power Packages Intended for Use in Areas of UndergroundCoal Mines Where Permissible Electric Equipment is Required </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.95 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and effective date. </ITAG>This subpart establishes the specific requirements for approval of dieselpower packages intended for use in areas of underground mines where permissibleelectric equipment is required. It is effective (60 days after the dateof publication of the final rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.96 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>The following definitions apply in this subpart. <T3>Corrosion-resistant material. </T3>Material that has at least the corrosion-resistantproperties of type 304 stainless steel. <T3>Cylindrical joint. </T3>A joint composed of two contiguous, concentric,cylindrical surfaces. <T3>Diesel power package. </T3>A diesel engine with an intake system, exhaustsystem, and a safety shutdown system installed. <T3>Exhaust conditioner. </T3>A corrosion-resistant enclosure, containinga cooling system, through which the exhaust gases pass. Exhaust system. A system connected to the outlet of the diesel engine whichincludes the exhaust manifold, the exhaust pipe, the exhaust conditioner,the exhaust flame arrester, and any adapters between the exhaust manifoldand exhaust flame arrester. <T3>Explosive mixture. </T3>A mixture of methane or natural gas with normalair, that will propagate flame or explode violently when ignited. <T3>Fastening. </T3>A device such as a bolt, screw, or stud used to secureadjoining parts to prevent the escape of flame from the diesel power package.<T3>Flame arrester. </T3>A device which allows the passage of gases, butwhich prevents the passage of flame. <T3>Flame arresting path (explosion-proof joint). </T3>Two or more adjoiningor adjacent surfaces between which the escape of flame is prevented. <T3>Grade. </T3>The slope of an incline expressed as a percent. <T3>High idle speed/no load. </T3>The maximum no load speed specified bythe engine manufacturer. <T3>Idle speed/no load. </T3>The minimum no load speed specified by theengine manufacturer. <T3>Intake system. </T3>A system connected to the inlet of the diesel enginewhich includes the intake manifold, the intake flame arrester, the emergencyintake air shutoff device, the air cleaner, and all piping and adaptersbetween the intake manifold and air cleaner. <T3>Plane joint. </T3>A joint comprised of two adjoining surfaces in parallelplanes. <T3>Rated speed. </T3>The speed at which the engine manufacturer specifiesthe rated brake horsepower of the engine. <T3>Safety shutdown system. </T3>A system which, in response to signalsfrom various safety sensors, recognizes the existence of a potential hazardouscondition and automatically shuts off the fuel supply to the engine. <T3>Step (rabbet) joint. </T3>A joint comprised of two adjoining surfaceswith a change in direction between its inner and outer edges. A step jointmay be composed of a cylindrical portion and a plane portion or of twoor more plane portions. <T3>Threaded joint. </T3>A joint consisting of a male and female threadedmember, both of which are the same type and thread gauge. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.97 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application requirements. </ITAG>(a) An application for approval of a diesel power package shall containsufficient information to document compliance with the technical requirementsof this subpart and include the following information_ (1) Drawings, specifications, and descriptions with dimensions (includingtolerances) demonstrating compliance with the technical requirements ofthis subpart. The specifications and descriptions shall include the materialsof construction and quantity. (2) A general arrangement drawing showing the diesel power package andthe location and identification of the intake system, exhaust system, safetyshutdown system sensors, flame arresters, exhaust conditioner, emergencyintake air shutoff device, automatic fuel shutoff device and the engine.(3) Diesel engine specifications including the MSHA approval number, andspeed, horsepower, and fuel flow if different than the maximum rated conditionin the engine approval. (4) A schematic which includes the location and identification of all water-cooledcomponents, coolant lines, radiator, surge tank, temperature sensors, andorifices; arrows indicating proper flow direction; the height relationshipof water-cooled components to the surge tank; and the proper procedurefor filling the cooling system. (5) A schematic showing the relative location and identification of componentsin the safety shutdown system. (6) Specific component identification, or specific information includingdetail drawings that identify the characteristics of the cooling systemand safety shutdown system that ensures compliance with the technical requirements.(7) Detail drawings of gaskets used to form explosion-proof joints. (8) An assembly drawing showing the location and identification of allintake system components from the air cleaner to the engine head. (9) An assembly drawing showing the location and identification of allexhaust system components from the engine head (excluding the dilutionsystem). (10) Detail drawings of those intake and exhaust system components identifiedin andSection;andSection; 7.97(a)(1)(vii) and 7.97(a)(1)(viii) of this subpartthat ensure compliance with the technical requirements. If an exhaust conditioneris used, an exhaust conditioner assembly drawing shall be provided showingthe location, dimensions, and identification of all internal parts, exhaustinlet and outlet, sensors, fill port, drain port, low water check port;high or normal operating water level; minimum allowable low water level;maximum allowable grade to maintain explosion-proof operations; and exhaustgas path through the exhaust conditioner. (11) A power package checklist which shall consist of a list of specificfeatures that must be checked and tests that must be performed to determineif a previously approved diesel power package is in approved condition.Test procedures shall be specified in sufficient detail to allow the evaluationto be made without reference to other documents. Illustrations shall beused to fully identify the approved configuration of the diesel power package.(12) Information showing that the electrical systems and components meetthe requirements of andSection; 7.98 of this subpart. (13) A drawing list consisting of a complete list of those drawings andspecifications which show the details of the construction and design ofthe diesel power package. (b) Composite drawings specifying the required details of constructionare acceptable instead of the individual detailed drawings in paragraph(a) of this section. (c) All documents shall be titled, dated, numbered, and include the latestrevision number. (d) When all testing has been completed, the following information shallbe submitted and become part of the approval documentation: (1) The settings of any adjustable devices used to meet the performancerequirements of this subpart.(2) The coolant temperature sensor setting and exhaust gas temperaturesensor setting used to meet the performance requirements of this subpart.(3) The minimum allowable low water level and the low water sensor settingused to meet the performance requirements of this subpart. (4) The maximum grade on which the exhaust conditioner can be operatedretaining the flame arresting characteristics. (5) A finalized version of the power package checklist. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.98 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Technical requirements. </ITAG>(a) The diesel power package shall use a category A diesel engine approvedunder subpart E of part 7 of this chapter with the following additionalrequirements: (1) A hydraulic, pneumatic, or other mechanically actuated starting mechanism.Other means of starting shall be evaluated in accordance with the provisionsof andSection; 7.107. (2) If an air compressor is provided, the intake air line shall be connectedto the engine intake system between the air cleaner and the flame arresteror the air compressor shall have an integral air filter. (b) The temperature of any external surface of the diesel power packageshall not exceed 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C). Diesel power packagedesigns using water jacketing to meet this requirement shall be testedin accordance with andSection; 7.101 of this subpart. Diesel power packagesusing other techniques will be evaluated under the provisions of andSection;7.107 of this subpart. When using water-jacketed components, provisionsshall be made for positive circulation of coolant, venting of the systemto prevent the accumulation of air pockets, and effective activation ofthe safety shutdown system before the temperature of the coolant in thejackets exceeds the manufacturer's specifications or 212 anddegrees;F (100anddegrees;C), whichever is lower. (c) External rotating parts shall not be constructed of aluminum alloyscontaining more than 0.6 percent magnesium. (d) If nonmetallic fans are used, they shall prevent an accumulation ofstatic electricity. Static conducting materials shall have a total resistanceof 1 megohm or less, measured with an applied potential of 500 volts ormore. Static conducting materials having a total resistance greater thanl megohm will be evaluated under the provisions of andSection; 7.107 of thissubpart. (e) All V-belts shall be static conducting and have a resistance not exceeding6 megohms, when measured with a direct current potential of 500 volts ormore. (f) The engine crankcase breather shall not be connected to the air intakesystem of the engine. The discharge from the breather shall be directedaway from hot surfaces of the engine and exhaust system. (g) Electrical components on diesel power packages shall be certified orapproved by MSHA under Parts 7, 18, 20, and 27 of this chapter. (h) Electrical systems on diesel power packages consisting of electricalcomponents, interconnecting wiring, and mechanical and electrical protectionshall meet the requirements of Parts 7, 18, and 27 of this chapter as applicable.(i) The diesel power package shall be equipped with a safety shutdown systemwhich will automatically shut off the fuel supply and stop the engine inresponse to signals from sensors indicating_ (1) The coolant temperature limit specified in andSection; 7.98(b) of thissubpart; (2) The exhaust gas temperature limit specified in andSection; 7.98(s)(4)of this subpart; or (3) The minimum allowable low water level as established by tests of andSection;7.100 of this subpart. Restarting of the engine shall be prevented untilthe water level in the exhaust conditioner has been replenished above theminimum allowable low water level. (j) The safety shutdown system shall have the following features: (1) A means to automatically disable the starting circuit and prevent engagementof the starting mechanism while the engine is running, or a starting mechanismconstructed of nonsparking materials. (2) If the design of the safety shutdown system requires that the lackof engine oil pressure must be overridden to start the engine, the overrideshall not be capable of overriding any of the safety shutdown sensors specifiedin paragraph (i) of this section. (k) The diesel power package shall be explosion-proof when tested in accordancewith the explosion tests of andSection; 7.100 of this subpart. (l) Engine joints that directly or indirectly connect the combustion chamberto the surrounding atmosphere shall be explosion-proof in accordance withparagraphs (m) through (q) of this section and andSection; 7.100 of thissubpart. This paragraph does not apply to the following: (i) Pistons and piston rings. (ii) Pistons and cylinder walls. (iii) Piston rings and cylinder walls. (iv) Cylinder head to cylinder block. (v) Valve stem to valve guide. (vi) Injector body to cylinder head. (m) Each segment of the intake system and exhaust system required to provideexplosion-proof features shall be constructed of metal and designed towithstand an internal pressure equal to four times the maximum pressureobserved in that segment in tests of andSection; 7.100 of this subpart ora pressure of 150 psig, whichever is less. Castings shall be free fromblowholes. (n) Welded joints forming the explosion-proof intake and exhaust systemsshall be continuous and gas-tight. At a minimum, they shall be made inaccordance with American Welding Society Standard D14.4-77 or meet thetest requirements of andSection; 7.104 of this subpart with the internalpressure equal to four times the maximum pressure observed in tests ofandSection; 7.100 of this subpart or a pressure of 150 psig, whichever isless. (o) Flexible connections shall be permitted in segments of the intake andexhaust systems required to provide explosionproof features, provided thatfailure of the connection activates the safety shutdown system before theexplosion-proof characteristics are lost. (p) Explosion-proof joints in the intake and exhaust systems shall be formedeither by_ (1) Flanged metal to metal joints meeting the requirements of paragraph(q) of this section; or (2) Metal flanges fitted with metal gaskets and meeting the following requirements:(i) Flat surfaces between bolt holes that form any part of a flame-arrestingpath shall be plane to within a maximum deviation of one-half the maximumclearance specified in paragraph (q)(7) of this section. All metal surfacesforming a flame-arresting path shall be finished in manufacture to notmore than 250 microinches. (ii) A means shall be provided to ensure that fastenings maintain the tightnessof joints. The means provided shall not lose its effectiveness throughrepeated assembly and disassembly. (iii) Fastenings shall be uniform in size to preclude improper assembly.(iv) Holes for fastenings shall not penetrate to the interior of an intakeor exhaust system and shall be threaded to ensure that all specified boltsor screws will not bottom even if the washers are omitted. (v) Fastenings used for joints of flame-arresting paths on intake or exhaustsystems shall be used only for attaching parts that are essential in maintainingthe explosion-proof integrity. They shall not be used for attaching bracketsor other parts.(vi) The minimum thickness of material for flanges shall be \1/2\-inch,except that a final thickness of \7/16\-inch is allowed after machiningrolled plate. (vii) The maximum fastening spacing shall be 6 inches. (viii) The minimum diameter of fastenings shall be \3/8\-inch, except smallerdiameter fastenings may be used if the joint first meets the requirementsof the static pressure test in andSection; 7.104 of this subpart, and theexplosion test in andSection; 7.100 of this subpart. (ix) The minimum thread engagement of fastenings shall be equal to or greaterthan the nominal diameter of the fastenings specified, or the intake orexhaust system must meet the test requirements of the static pressure testin andSection; 7.104 of this subpart. (x) The minimum contact surface of gaskets forming flamearresting pathsshall be \3/8\-inch, and the thickness of the gaskets shall be no greaterthan \1/16\-inch. The minimum distance from the interior edge of a gasketto the edge of a fastening hole shall be \3/8\-inch. The gaskets shallbe positively positioned, and a means shall be provided to preclude improperinstallation. When the joint is completely assembled, it shall be impossibleto insert a 0.0015-inch thickness gauge to a depth exceeding \1/8\-inchbetween the gasket and mating flanges. (q) The following construction requirements shall apply to explosion-proofjoints: (1) Flat surfaces between bolt holes that form any part of a flame-arrestingpath shall be plane to within a maximum deviation of one-half the maximumclearance specified in paragraph (q)(7) of this section. All metal surfacesforming a flame-arresting path shall be finished in manufacture to notmore than 250 microinches. When a thin film of nonhardening preparationto inhibit rusting is applied to these finished metal surfaces, it shallnot promote the adherence of foreign materials. (2) A means shall be provided to ensure that fastenings maintain the tightnessof joints. The means provided shall not lose its effectiveness throughrepeated assembly and disassembly. (3) Fastenings shall be uniform in size to preclude improper assembly.(4) Holes for fastenings shall not penetrate to the interior of an intakeor exhaust system and shall be threaded to ensure that all specified boltsor screws will not bottom even if the washers are omitted. (5) Fastenings used for joints of flame-arresting paths on intake or exhaustsystems shall be used only for attaching parts that are essential in maintainingthe explosion-proof integrity. They shall not be used for attaching bracketsor other parts. (6) The flame-arresting path of threaded joints shall conform to the requirementsof paragraph (q)(7) of this section. (7) Intake and exhaust systems joints shall meet the following specifications:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,8</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Minimum thickness of material for flanges <D>\1\ \1/2\andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minimum width of joint-all in one plane <D>1andmin16;andmin16;   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum clearance-joint all in one plane <D>\2\ 0.004andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minimum width of joint, portions of which are different planes-cylindersor equivalent <D>\3\ \3/4\andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG>Maximum clearances-joint in two or more planes, cylinders or equivalent:<ITAG tagnum="3">Portion perpendicular to plane </ITAG><D>\4\ 0.008andmin16;andmin16; </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Plane portion </ITAG><D>0.006andmin16;andmin16; </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum fastening \5\ spacing-joints all in one plane \6\ with minimumof 4 fastenings <D>6andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum fastening spacing-joints, portions of which are in differentplanes with minimum of 4 fastenings <D>8andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minimum diameter of fastening (without regard to type of joint) \7\<D>\3/8\andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minimum thread engagement of fastenings \8\ <D>\3/8\andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum diametrical clearance between fastening body and unthreadedholes through which it passes \9\ <D>\1/16\andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minimum distance from interior of the intake or exhaust system to theedge of a fastening hole:\10\ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Joint-minimum width 1andmin16;andmin16; <D>\11\ \12\ \7/16\andmin16;andmin16; </D></ITAG>Shafts centered by ball or roller bearings: <ITAG tagnum="3">Minimum length of flame-arresting path </ITAG><D>1andmin16;andmin16; </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Maximum diametrical clearance </ITAG><D>0.010andmin16;andmin16; </D>Shafts through journal bearings: <ITAG tagnum="3">Minimum length of flame-arresting path </ITAG><D>1andmin16;andmin16; </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Maximum diametrical clearance </ITAG><D>0.010andmin16;andmin16; </D><F>\1\ \1/16\-inch less is allowable for machining rolled plate.  </F><F>\2\ 0.006-inch for cylindrical joints. </F><F>\3\ If only two planes are involved, neither portion of a joint shallbe less than \1/8\-inch wide, unless the wider portion conforms to thesame requirements as those for a joint that is all in one plane. If morethan two planes are involved, the combined lengths of those portions havingprescribed clearances are considered. </F><F>\4\ The allowable diametrical clearance is 0.008-inch when the portionperpendicular to the plane portion is \1/4\-inch or greater in length.If the perpendicular portion is more than \1/8\-inch but less than \1/4\-inchwide, the diametrical clearance shall not exceed 0.006-inch. </F><F>\5\ When studs are provided, they shall bottom in blind holes, be completelywelded in place, or the bottom of the hole shall be closed with a plugsecured by weld or braze. Fastenings shall be provided at all corners.</F><F>\6\ The requirements as to diametrical clearance around the fasteningand minimum distance from the fastening hole to the inside of the intakeor exhaust system apply to steel dowel pins. In addition, when such pinsare used, the spacing between centers of the fastenings on either sideof the pin shall not exceed 5 inches. </F><F>\7\ Fastening diameters smaller than specified may be used if the jointor assembly meets the test requirements of first andSection; 7.104 and thenandSection; 7.100 of this subpart.  </F><F>\8\ Minimum thread engagement shall be equal to or greater than thenominal diameter of the fastening specified, or the intake or exhaust systemmust meet the test requirements of andSection; 7.104 of this subpart. </F><F>\9\ The requirements as to diametrical clearance around the fasteningand minimum distance from the fastening hole to the inside of the intakeor exhaust system apply to steel dowel pins. In addition, when such pinsare used, the spacing between centers of the fastenings on either sideof the pin shall not exceed 5 inches. </F><F>\10\ Edge of the fastening hole shall include any edge of any machiningdone to the fastening hole, such as chamfering. </F><F>\11\ The requirements as to diametrical clearance around the fasteningand minimum distance from the fastening hole to the inside of the intakeor exhaust system apply to steel dowel pins. In addition, when such pinsare used, the spacing between centers of the fastenings on either sideof the pin shall not exceed 5 inches. </F><F>\12\ If the diametrical clearance for fastenings does not exceed \1/32\-inch,then the minimum distance shall be \1/4\-inch.</F></ITAG>(r) <T3>Intake system. </T3>(1) The intake system shall include a device betweenthe air cleaner and intake flame arrester, operable from the equipmentoperator's compartment, to shut off the air supply to the engine for emergencypurposes. Upon activation, the device must operate immediately and theengine shall stop within 15 seconds. (2) The intake system shall include a flame arrester that will preventan explosion within the system from propagating to a surrounding atmospherewhen tested in accordance with the explosion tests in andSection; 7.100 ofthis subpart. The flame arrester shall be located between the air cleanerand the intake manifold and shall be attached so that it can be removedfor inspection or cleaning. The flame arrester shall be constructed ofcorrosion-resistant metal and meet the following requirements: (i) Two intake flame arrester designs, the spaced-plate type and the crimpedribbon type, will be tested in accordance with the requirements of andSection;7.100 of this subpart. Variations to these designs or other intake flamearrester designs will be evaluated under the provisions of andSection; 7.107of this subpart. (ii) In flame arresters of the spaced-plate type, the thickness of theplates shall be at least 0.125-inch; spacing between the plates shall notexceed 0.018-inch; and the flame-arresting path formed by the plates shallbe at least 1 inch wide. The unsupported length of the plates shall beshort enough that permanent deformation resulting from explosion testsshall not exceed 0.002-inch. The plates and flame arrester housing shallbe an integral unit which cannot be disassembled. (iii) In flame arresters of the crimped ribbon type, the dimensions ofthe core openings shall be such that a plug gauge 0.018-inch in diametershall not pass through, and the flame-arresting path core thickness shallbe at least 1 inch. The core and flame arrester housing shall be an integralunit which cannot be disassembled. (3) The intake system shall be designed so that improper installation ofthe flame arrester is impossible. (4) The intake system shall include an air cleaner service indicator. Theair cleaner shall be installed so that only filtered air will enter theflame arrester. The air cleaner shall be sized and the service indicatorset in accordance with the engine manufacturer's recommendations. Unlessthe service indicator is explosion-proof, it shall be located between theair cleaner and flame arrester, and the service indicator setting shallbe reduced to account for the additional restriction imposed by the flamearrester.(5) The intake system shall include a connection between the intake flamearrester and the engine head for temporary attachment of a device to indicatethe total vacuum in the system.(s) <T3>Exhaust system. </T3>(1) The exhaust system shall include a flame arresterthat will prevent an explosion within the system from propagating to asurrounding atmosphere. The flame arrester shall be constructed of corrosion-resistantmetal.(i) If a mechanical flame arrester is used, it shall be positioned so thatonly cooled exhaust gas at a maximum temperature of 302 anddegrees;F (150anddegrees;C) will be discharged through it.(ii) If a spaced-plate flame arrester is used, it must meet the requirementsof paragraph (r)(2)(ii) of this section and be used in conjunction withexhaust conditioners meeting the test requirements of andSection; 7.100 ofthis subpart. Variations to the spaced-plate flame arrester design andother flame arrester designs used in conjunction with exhaust conditionersshall be evaluated under the provisions of andSection; 7.107 of this subpart.The flame arrester shall be designed and attached so that it can be removedfor inspection and cleaning. (2) The exhaust system shall allow an exhaust conditioner to be used asthe exhaust flame arrester provided that the explosion tests of andSection;7.100 of this subpart demonstrate that the exhaust conditioner will arrestflame. When used as a flame arrester, the exhaust conditioner shall beequipped with a sensor to automatically activate the safety shutdown systemat or above the minimum allowable low water level established by andSection;7.100 of this subpart. Restarting of the engine shall be prevented untilthe water supply in the exhaust conditioner has been replenished abovethe minimum allowable low water level. All parts of the exhaust conditionerand associated components that come in contact with contaminated exhaustconditioner water shall be constructed of corrosion-resistant material.The exhaust conditioner shall include a means for verifying that the safetyshutdown system operates at the proper water level. A means shall be providedfor draining and cleaning the exhaust conditioner. The final exhaust gastemperature as discharge from the exhaust conditioner shall not exceed170 anddegrees;F (76 anddegrees;C) under test conditions specified in andSection;7.102 of this subpart. A sensor shall be provided that activates the safetyshutdown system before the exhaust gas temperature at discharge from theexhaust conditioner exceeds 185 anddegrees;F (85 anddegrees;C) under test conditionsspecified in andSection; 7.103(a)(4) of this subpart. (3) The exhaust system shall be designed so that improper installationof the flame arrester is impossible. (4) The exhaust system shall provide a means to cool the exhaust gas andprevent discharge of glowing particles. (i) The temperature of the exhaust gas at discharge from the diesel powerpackage shall not exceed 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C) when tested inaccordance with the surface temperature test of andSection; 7.101 of thissubpart. A sensor shall be provided that activates the safety shutdownsystem before the exhaust gas exceeds 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C) whentested in accordance with the safety system control test in andSection; 7.103of this subpart. (ii) When an exhaust conditioner is used to cool the exhaust gas and preventthe discharge of glowing particles, the temperature of the exhaust gasat discharge from the exhaust conditioner shall not exceed 170 anddegrees;F(76 anddegrees;C) when tested in accordance with the exhaust gas coolingefficiency test in andSection; 7.102 of this subpart. A sensor shall be providedthat activates the safety shutdown system before the exhaust gas temperatureat discharge from the exhaust conditioner exceeds 185 anddegrees;F (85 anddegrees;C)when tested in accordance with the safety system controls test in andSection;7.103 of this subpart. All parts of the exhaust conditioner and associatedcomponents that come in contact with contaminated exhaust conditioner watershall be constructed of corrosion-resistant material. (5) Other means for cooling the exhaust gas and preventing the propagationof flame or discharge of glowing particles shall be evaluated under theprovisions of andSection; 7.107 of this subpart. (6) There shall be a connection in the exhaust system for temporary attachmentof a device to indicate the total backpressure in the system. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.99</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Critical characteristics. </ITAG>The following critical characteristics shall be inspected or tested oneach diesel power package to which an approval marking is affixed: (a) Finish, width, planarity, and clearances of surfaces that form anypart of a flame-arresting path. (b) Thickness of walls and flanges that are essential in maintaining theexplosion-proof integrity of the diesel power package. (c) Size, spacing, and tightness of fastenings. (d) The means provided to maintain tightness of fastenings. (e) Length of thread engagement on fastenings and threaded parts that ensurethe explosion-proof integrity of the diesel power package. (f) Diesel engine approval marking. (g) Fuel rate setting to ensure that it is appropriate for the intendedapplication, or a warning tag shall be affixed to the fuel system notifyingthe purchaser of the need to make proper adjustments. (h) Material and dimensions of gaskets that are essential in maintainingthe explosion-proof integrity of the diesel power package. (i) Dimensions and assembly of flame arresters.(j) Materials of construction to ensure that the intake system, exhaustsystem, cooling fans, and belts have been fabricated from the requiredmaterial. (k) Proper interconnection of the coolant system components and use ofspecified components. (l) Proper interconnection of the safety shutdown system components anduse of specified components. (m) All plugs and covers to ensure that they are tightly installed. (n) The inspections and tests described in the diesel power package checklistshall be performed and all requirements shall be met. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Explosion tests. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures.</T3> (1) Prepare for diesel power package testingas follows: (i) Perform a detailed check of parts against the drawings and specificationssubmitted under andSection; 7.97 of this subpart to determine that the partsand drawings coincide. (ii) Remove all parts that do not contribute to the operation or ensurethe explosion-proof integrity of the diesel power package such as the aircleaner and exhaust gas dilution system. (iii) Fill coolant system fluid and engine oil to the engine manufacturer'srecommended levels. (iv) Remove all liquid fuel from the lines, filter, fuel pump, and engine.(v) Establish a preliminary exhaust conditioner low water level. (2) Perform static and dynamic tests of the intake system as follows: (i) Install the diesel power package in an explosion test chamber whichis large enough to contain the complete diesel power package and has ameans to observe all side of the diesel power package. Couple the dieselpower package to an auxiliary drive mechanism. Attach a pressure measuringdevice, a temperature measuring device, and an ignition source to the intakesystem. The pressure measuring device shall be capable of indicating thepeak pressure accurate to andplusmin;1 pound-per-square inch gauge (psig)at l00 psig static pressure and shall have a frequency response of 40 Hertzor greater. The ignition source shall be an electric spark with a minimumenergy of 100 millijoules. The ignition source shall be located immediatelyadjacent to the intake manifold and the pressure and temperature devicesshall be located immediately adjacent to the flame arrester. (ii) Fill the exhaust conditioner to the specified high or normal operatingwater level. (iii) Fill the test chamber with a mixture of natural gas and air or methaneand air. If natural gas is used, the content of methane and ethane shalltotal at least 98.0 percent, by volume, with nitrogen and propane the remainder.For all tests, the methane concentration shall be 7andplusmin;0.1 to 10andplusmin;0.1percent, by volume, and the oxygen concentration shall be 18 to 21 percent,by volume. If the concentrations fall below the specified values, the testchamber shall be purged and refilled. (iv) Using the auxiliary drive mechanism, motor the engine to fill theintake and exhaust systems with the explosive mixture. The intake system,exhaust system, and test chamber gas concentration shall not differ bymore than andplusmin;0.3 percent, by volume, at the time of ignition. (v) For static tests, stop the engine, actuate the ignition source, andobserve the peak pressure. The peak pressure shall not exceed 125 psig.lf the peak pressure exceeds 125 psig, construction changes shall be madethat result in a reduction of pressure to 125 psig or less, or the systemshall be tested in accordance with the static pressure test of andSection;7.104 of this subpart with the pressure parameter replaced with a staticpressure of twice the highest value recorded. (vi) If the peak pressure does not exceed 125 psig or if the system meetsthe static pressure test requirements of this section and there is no dischargeof visible flames or glowing particles or ignition of the explosive mixturein the chamber, a total of 20 tests shall be conducted in accordance withthe explosion test specified above. (vii) For dynamic tests, follow the same procedures for static tests, exceptactuate the ignition source while motoring the engine. A total of 40 dynamictests shall be conducted, twenty at rated speed and twenty at 50 percentof rated speed. Under some circumstances, during dynamic testing the explosivemixture may continue to burn within the diesel power package after ignition.This condition can be recognized by the presence of a rumbling noise anda rapid increase in temperature. Ignition of the explosive mixture in thetest chamber under these circumstances does not constitute failure of theflame arrester. (3) Perform static and dynamic tests of the exhaust system as follows:(i) Prepare the diesel power package for explosion tests according to andSection;7.100(a)(2)(i) of this subpart, with the ignition source located immediatelyadjacent to the exhaust manifold. Pressure measuring devices shall be locatedin each segment as follows: immediately adjacent to the exhaust conditionerinlet; in the exhaust conditioner; and immediately adjacent to the flamearrester, if applicable. A temperature device shall be located immediatelyadjacent to the exhaust conditioner inlet. (ii) If the exhaust system is provided with a spaced-plate flame arresterin addition to an exhaust conditioner, explosion tests of the exhaust systemshall be performed as described for the intake system in accordance withthis section. Water shall not be present in the exhaust conditioner forthe tests. (iii) If the exhaust conditioner is used as the flame arrester, explosiontesting of this type of system shall be performed as described for theintake system in accordance with this section with the following modifications:(A) Twenty static tests, twenty dynamic tests at rated speed, and twentydynamic tests at 50 percent of rated speed shall be conducted at 2 inchesbelow the minimum allowable low water level with all entrances in the exhaustconditioner which do not contribute to the explosion-proof characteristicsof the exhaust system, including lines which connect the reserve watersupply to the exhaust conditioner, opened. (B) Twenty static tests, twenty dynamic tests at rated speed, and twentydynamic tests at 50 percent of rated speed shall be conducted at 2 inchesbelow the minimum allowable low water level with all entrances in the exhaustconditioner (except the exhaust conditioner outlet) which do not contributeto the explosion-proof characteristics of the exhaust system, includinglines which connect the reserve water supply to the exhaust conditioner,closed. (C) Twenty static tests, twenty dynamic tests at rated speed, and twentydynamic tests at 50 percent of rated speed shall be conducted at the specifiedhigh or normal operating water level with all entrances in the exhaustconditioner which do not contribute to the explosion-proof characteristicsof the exhaust system, including lines which connect the reserve watersupply to the exhaust conditioner, opened. (D) Twenty static tests, twenty dynamic tests at rated speed, and twentydynamic tests at 50 percent of rated speed shall be conducted at the specifiedhigh or normal operating water level with all entrances in the exhaustconditioner (except the exhaust conditioner outlet) which do not contributeto the explosion-proof characteristics of the exhaust system, includinglines which connect the reserve water supply to the exhaust conditioner,closed.(iv) After successful completion of the explosion tests of the exhaustsystem, the minimum allowable low water level shall be determined by addingtwo inches to the lowest water level that passed the explosion tests. (v) A determination shall be made of the maximum grade on which the exhaustconditioner can be operated retaining the flame arresting characteristics.(b) <T3>Acceptable performance. </T3>The explosion tests shall not result inany of the following_ (1) Discharge of flame or glowing particles. (2) Visible discharge of gas through gasketed joints. (3) Ignition of the explosive mixture in the test chamber. (4) Rupture of any part that affects the explosion-proof integrity. (5) Excessive clearances along flame-arresting paths. (6) Pressure exceeding 125 psig, unless the intake system or exhaust systemhas withstood a static pressure of twice the highest value recorded inthe tests. (7) Permanent distortion of any planar surface of the diesel power packageexceeding 0.04-inch/linear foot. (8) Permanent deformation exceeding 0.002-inch between the plates of spaced-plateflame arrester designs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Surface temperature tests. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures. </T3>(1) Prepare for diesel power package testingas follows: (i) Perform a detailed check of parts against the drawings and specificationssubmitted to MSHA under compliance with andSection; 7.97 of this subpartto determine that the parts and drawings coincide. (ii) Fill the coolant system with a mixture of equal parts of antifreezeand water, following the procedures specified in the application, andSection;7.97(a)(4) of this subpart. (iii) Fill the exhaust conditioner to the high or normal operating waterlevel and having a reserve water supply available, if applicable. (2) Tests shall be conducted as follows: (i) Adjust the liquid fuel rate of the injector pump of the diesel engineas specified in andSection; 7.97(a)(3) of this subpart. (ii) Install sufficient temperature measuring devices to determine thelocation of the highest coolant temperature. The temperature measuringdevice shall be accurate to +1 percent of the indicated reading or andplusmin;5anddegrees;F (andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C), whichever is greater. (iii) Operate the engine at rated speed and maximum fuel delivery and with0.5andplusmin;0.1 percent, by volume, of natural gas or methane in the intakeair mixture until all parts of the engine, exhaust coolant system, andother components reach their respective equilibrium temperatures. The liquidfuel temperature into the engine shall be maintained at 100 anddegrees;F(38 anddegrees;C)andplusmin;10 anddegrees;F (5.5 anddegrees;C) and the intake airtemperature shall be maintained at 70 anddegrees;F (21 anddegrees;C)andplusmin;5anddegrees;F (2.7 anddegrees;C). If natural gas is used in the intake air,the content of methane and ethane shall total at least 98.0 percent, byvolume, with nitrogen and propane the remainder. (iv) Increase the coolant system temperatures until the highest coolanttemperature is 205 anddegrees;F to 212 anddegrees;F (96 anddegrees;C to 100 anddegrees;C),or to the maximum temperature specified by the applicant, if lower. (v) After all coolant system temperatures stabilize, operate the enginefor 1 hour. (vi) The ambient temperature shall be between 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C)and 104 anddegrees;F (40 anddegrees;C) throughout the tests. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance. </T3>The surface temperature of any externalsurface of the diesel power package shall not exceed 302 anddegrees;F (150anddegrees;C) during the test. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exhaust gas cooling efficiency test. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures. </T3>(1) Follow the procedures specified in andSection;7.101(a) of this subpart. (2) Install a temperature measuring device to measure the exhaust gas temperatureat discharge from the exhaust conditioner. The temperature measuring deviceshall be accurate to andplusmin;1 percent of the indicated reading or andplusmin;5anddegrees;F (andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C), whichever is greater. (3) Determine the exhaust gas temperature at discharge from the exhaustconditioner before the exhaust gas is diluted with air. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance. </T3>The exhaust gas temperature at dischargefrom the exhaust conditioner before the exhaust gas is diluted with airshall not exceed 170 anddegrees;F (76 anddegrees;C). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safety system control test. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures. </T3>(1) Prior to testing, perform the tasks specifiedin andSection; 7.101(a)(1) of this subpart and install sufficient temperaturemeasuring devices to measure the highest coolant temperature and exhaustgas temperature at discharge from the exhaust conditioner. The temperaturemeasuring device shall be accurate to andplusmin;1 percent of the indicatedreading or andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C), whichever isgreater. (2) Determine the effectiveness of the coolant system temperature shutdownsensors which will automatically activate the safety shutdown system andstop the engine before the water temperature in the cooling jackets exceedsmanufacturer's specifications or 212 anddegrees;F (100 anddegrees;C), whicheveris lower, by operating the engine and causing the water in the coolingjackets to exceed the specified temperature. (3) Determine the effectiveness of the temperature sensor in the exhaustgas stream which will automatically activate the safety shutdown systemand stop the engine before the cooled exhaust gas temperature exceeds 302anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C), by operating the engine and causing the cooledexhaust gas to exceed the specified temperature. (4) For systems using exhaust conditioners where the exhaust gas temperatureat discharge does not exceed 170 anddegrees;F (76 anddegrees;C) under testconditions of andSection; 7.100(a)(2) of this subpart, determine the effectivenessof the temperature sensor in the exhaust gas stream which will automaticallyactivate the safety shutdown system and stop the engine before the cooledexhaust gas temperature exceeds 185 anddegrees;F (85 anddegrees;C), with theengine operating at a high idle speed/no load condition. Temporarily disablethe reserve water supply, if applicable, and any safety shutdown systemcontrol that might interfere with the evaluation of the operation of theexhaust gas temperature sensor. Prior to testing, set the water level inthe exhaust conditioner to a level just above the minimum allowable lowwater level. Run the engine until the exhaust gas temperature sensor activatesthe safety shutdown system and stops the engine. (5) Determine the effectiveness of the low water sensor which will automaticallyactivate the safety shutdown system and stop the engine at or above theminimum allowable low water level established from results of the explosiontests in andSection; 7.100 of this subpart with the engine operating at ahigh idle speed/no load condition. Temporarily disable the reserve watersupply, if applicable, and any safety shutdown system control that mightinterfere with the evaluation of the operation of the low water sensor.Prior to testing, set the water level in the exhaust conditioner to a leveljust above the minimum allowable low water level. Run the engine untilthe low water sensor activates the safety shutdown system and stops theengine. Measure the low water level. Attempt to restart the engine. (6) Determine the effectiveness of the device in the intake system whichis designed to shut off the air supply and stop the engine for emergencypurposes with the engine operating at both a high idle speed/no load conditionand an idle speed/no load condition. Run the engine and activate the emergencyintake air shutoff device. (7) Determine the total vacuum of the complete intake system, includingthe air cleaner, as measured between the intake flame arrester and theengine head with the engine operating as follows: (i) At high idle speed/no load condition for normally aspirated engines.(ii) At rated speed and maximum fuel delivery for turbocharged engines.(8) Determine the total exhaust backpressure with the exhaust conditionerfilled to the high or normal operating water level and with the engineoperating as specified in andSection; 7.103(a)(7) of this subpart. (9) The starting mechanism shall be tested to ensure that engagement isnot possible while the engine is running. Operate the engine and attemptto engage the starting mechanism. (10) Where the lack of engine oil pressure must be overridden in orderto start the engine, test the override to ensure that it does not overrideany of the safety shutdown sensors specified in andSection; 7.98(i) of thissubpart. After each safety shutdown sensor test specified in paragraphs(a)(2) through (a)(5) of this section, immediately override the engineoil pressure and attempt to restart the engine. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance. </T3>Tests of the safety system controls shallresult in the following: (1) The coolant system temperature shutdown sensor shall automaticallyactivate the safety shutdown system and stop the engine before the watertemperature in the cooling jackets exceeds manufacturer's specificationsor 212 anddegrees;F (100 anddegrees;C), whichever is lower.(2) The temperature sensor in the exhaust gas stream shall automaticallyactivate the safety shutdown system and stop the engine before the cooledexhaust gas exceeds 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C). (3) The temperature sensor in the exhaust gas stream of the exhaust conditionershall automatically activate the safety shutdown system and stop the enginebefore the cooled exhaust gas exceeds 185 anddegrees;F (85 anddegrees;C). (4) The low water sensor shall automatically activate the safety shutdownsystem and stop the engine at or above the minimum allowable low waterlevel and prevent restarting of the engine. (5) The emergency intake air shutoff device shall operate immediately whenactivated and stop the engine within 15 seconds. (6) The total intake vacuum and the total exhaust backpressure shall notexceed the engine manufacturer's specifications. (7) It shall not be possible to engage the starting mechanism while theengine is running. (8) The engine oil pressure override shall not override any of the shutdownsensors. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Internal static pressure test. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures.</T3> (1) Isolate and seal each segment of the intakesystem or exhaust system to allow pressurization. (2) Internally pressurize each segment of the intake system or exhaustsystem to four times the maximum pressure observed in each segment duringthe tests of andSection; 7.100 of this subpart, or 150 psig andplusmin; 5 psig,whichever is less. Maintain the pressure for a minimum of 10 seconds. (3) Following the pressure hold, the pressure shall be removed and thepressurizing agent removed from the intake system or exhaust system. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance.</T3> (1) The intake system or exhaust system,during pressurization, shall not exhibit_ (i) Leakage through welds and gasketed joints; or (ii) Leakage other than along joints meeting the explosion-proof requirementsof andSection; 7.98(q) of this subpart. (2) Following removal of the pressurizing agent, the intake system or exhaustsystem shall not exhibit any_ (i) Changes in fastening torque; (ii) Visible cracks in welds; (iii) Permanent deformation affecting the length or gap of any flame-arrestingpaths; (iv) Stretched or bent fastenings; or (v) Damaged threads of parts affecting the explosion-proof integrity ofthe intake system or exhaust system. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval marking. </ITAG>Each approved diesel power package shall be identified by a legible andpermanent approval plate inscribed with the assigned MSHA approval numberand securely attached to the diesel power package in a manner that doesnot impair any explosion-proof characteristics. The grade limitation ofthe exhaust conditioner shall be included on the approval marking. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.106</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Post-approval product audit. </ITAG>Upon request by MSHA, but not more than once a year except for cause, theapproval-holder shall make an approved diesel power package available foraudit at no cost. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">New technology. </ITAG>MSHA may approve a diesel power package that incorporates technology forwhich the requirements of this subpart are not applicable if MSHA determinesthat the diesel power package is as safe as those which meet the requirementsof this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.108</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Power package checklist. </ITAG>Each diesel power package bearing an MSHA approval plate shall be accompaniedby a power package checklist. The power package checklist shall consistof a list of specific features that must be checked and tests that mustbe performed to determine if a previously approved diesel power packageis in approved condition. Test procedures shall be specified in sufficientdetail to allow evaluation to be made without reference to other documents.Illustrations shall be used to fully identify the approved configurationof the diesel power package. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Diesel Power Packages Intended for Use in Areas of UndergroundCoal Mines Where Permissible Electric Equipment is Not Required  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.111</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and effective date. </ITAG>This subpart establishes the specific requirements for approval of dieselpower packages intended for use in areas of underground mines where permissibleelectric equipment is not required. It is effective (60 days after thedate of publication of the final rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.112</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>The following definitions apply to this subpart. <T3>Corrosion-resistant material.</T3> Material that has at least the corrosion-resistantproperties of type 304 stainless steel. <T3>Diesel power package.</T3> A diesel engine with an intake system, exhaustsystem, and a safety shutdown system installed. <T3>Exhaust conditioner.</T3> A corrosion-resistant enclosure containinga cooling system, through which the exhaust gases pass. <T3>Exhaust system.</T3> A system connected to the outlet of the dieselengine which includes the exhaust manifold, the exhaust pipe, the exhaustconditioner, the exhaust flame arrester, and any adapters between the exhaustmanifold and exhaust flame arrester. <T3>High idle speed/no load.</T3> The maximum no load speed specified bythe engine manufacturer. <T3>Idle speed/no load.</T3> The minimum no load speed specified by theengine manufacturer. <T3>Intake system.</T3> A system connected to the inlet of the diesel enginewhich includes the intake manifold, the intake flame arrester, the emergencyintake air shutoff device, the air cleaner, and all piping and adaptersbetween the intake manifold and air cleaner. <T3>Rated speed.</T3> The speed at which the engine manufacturer specifiesthe rated brake horsepower of the engine. <T3>Safety shutdown system.</T3> A system which, in response to signalsfrom various safety sensors, recognizes the existence of a potential hazardouscondition and automatically shuts off the fuel supply to the engine. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.113</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application requirements. </ITAG>(a) An application for approval of a diesel power package shall containsufficient information to document compliance with the technical requirementsof this subpart and include the following information: (1) Drawings, specifications, and descriptions with dimensions (includingtolerances) demonstrating compliance with the technical requirements ofthis subpart. The specifications and descriptions shall include the materialsof construction and quantity. (2) A general arrangement drawing showing the diesel power package andthe location and identification of the intake system components, exhaustsystem components, safety shutdown system sensors, emergency intake airshutoff device, automatic fuel shutoff device, and the engine.(3) Diesel engine specifications stating the MSHA approval number. Speed,horsepower, and fuel flow shall also be included if different from themaximum rated condition in the engine approval. (4) A schematic which includes: the location and identification of allwater-cooled components, coolant lines, radiator, surge tank, temperaturesensors, and orifices; arrows indicating proper flow direction; the heightrelationship of water-cooled components to the surge tank; and the properprocedure for filling the cooling system. (5) A schematic showing the relative location and identification of componentsin the safety shutdown system. (6) Specific component identification, or specific information includingdetail drawings that identify the characteristics of the cooling system,safety shutdown system and emergency intake air shutoff device that ensurescompliance with the technical requirements. (7) An assembly drawing showing the location and identification of allintake system components from the air cleaner to the engine head. (8) An assembly drawing showing the location and identification of allexhaust system components from the engine head (excluding the dilutionsystem). (9) Detail drawings of the exhaust system components identified in paragraph(a)(8) of this section. (10) A power package checklist which shall consist of a list of specificfeatures that must be checked and tests that must be performed to determineif a previously approved diesel power package is in approved condition.Test procedures shall be specified in sufficient detail to allow the evaluationto be made without reference to other documents. Illustrations shall beused to fully identify the approved configuration of the diesel power package.(11) A drawing list consisting of a complete list of those drawings andspecifications which show the details of the construction and design ofthe diesel power package.(b) Composite drawings specifying the required details of constructionare acceptable instead of the individual detailed drawings listed in paragraph(a) of this section.(c) All documents shall be titled, dated, numbered, and include the latestrevision number.(d) When all testing has been completed, the following information shallbe submitted and become part of the approval documentation:(1) The settings of any adjustable devices that are used to meet the performancerequirements of this subpart.(2) The coolant temperature sensor setting and exhaust gas temperaturesensor setting that are used to meet the performance requirements of thissubpart.(3) A finalized version of the power package checklist.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.114</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Technical requirements.</ITAG>(a) The diesel power package shall use an engine approved under subpartE of part 7 of this chapter. (b) The temperature of any external surface of the diesel power packageshall not exceed 302 anddegrees;F (l50 anddegrees;C) when tested in accordancewith the surface temperature test in andSection; 7.116 of this subpart. Dieselpower package designs that use water jacketing to meet this requirementshall be tested in accordance with andSection; 7.116. Diesel power packagesusing other techniques will be evaluated under the provisions of andSection;7.121 of this subpart. When using water-jacketed components, provisionsshall be made for positive circulation of coolant; venting of the systemto prevent the accumulation of air pockets, and effective activation ofthe safety shutdown system before the temperature of the coolant in thejackets exceeds the manufacturer's specifications or 212 anddegrees;F (100anddegrees;C), whichever is lower. (c) A means shall be provided to cool the exhaust gas such that the temperatureof the exhaust gas at discharge from the diesel power package shall notexceed 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C) when tested in accordance with theexhaust gas cooling efficiency test in andSection; 7.117 of this subpart.A sensor shall be provided that activates the safety shutdown system beforethe exhaust gas exceeds 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C) under test conditionsspecified in andSection; 7.118(a)(3) of this subpart. (d) The diesel power package shall be equipped with a safety shutdown systemwhich will automatically shut off the fuel supply and stop the engine inresponse to signals from sensors indicating_ (1) The coolant temperature limit specified in andSection; 7.114(b) of thissubpart; or (2) The exhaust gas temperature limit specified in andSection; 7.114(c) ofthis subpart. (e) The intake system shall be provided with the following features: (1) The intake system shall include a device, operable from the equipmentoperator's compartment, to shut off the air supply to the engine for emergencypurposes. Upon activation, the device must operate immediately and theengine shall stop within 15 seconds. (2) The intake system shall include an air cleaner and service indicator.The air cleaner shall be sized and the service indicator set in accordancewith the engine manufacturer's recommendations. (3) A connection shall be provided in the intake system for temporary attachmentof a device to indicate the total vacuum in the system. (f) The discharge from the engine crankcase breather shall be directedaway from hot surfaces of the engine and exhaust system. (g) A connection shall be provided in the exhaust system for temporaryattachment of a device to indicate the total backpressure in the system.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.115</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Critical characteristics. </ITAG>The following critical characteristics shall be inspected or tested oneach diesel power package to which an approval marking is affixed: (a) Diesel engine approval marking. (b) Fuel rate setting to ensure that it is appropriate for the intendedapplication, or a warning tag shall be affixed to the fuel system notifyingthe purchaser of the need to make proper adjustments. (c) Proper interconnection of the coolant system components and use ofspecified components. (d) Proper interconnection of the safety shutdown system components anduse of specified components. (e) The inspections and tests described in the diesel power package checklistshall be performed and all requirements shall be met. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.116</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Surface temperature tests. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures.</T3> (1) Prepare for testing the diesel power packagetesting as follows: (i) Perform a detailed check of parts against the drawings and specificationssubmitted under andSection; 7.113 of this subpart to determine that the partsand drawings coincide. (ii) Fill the coolant system with a mixture of equal parts of antifreezeand water, following the procedures specified in the application, andSection;7.113(a)(4) of this subpart. (iii) Fill the exhaust conditioner to the high or normal operating waterlevel and having a reserve water supply available, if applicable. (2) Conduct the tests as follows: (i) Adjust the liquid fuel rate of the injector pump of the diesel engineas specified in andSection; 7.113(a)(3) of this subpart.(ii) Install sufficient temperature measuring devices to determine thelocation of the highest coolant temperature. The temperature measuringdevice shall be accurate to andplusmin;1 percent of the indicated readingor andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C), whichever is greater.(iii) Operate the engine at rated speed and maximum fuel delivery untilall parts of the engine, exhaust coolant system, and other components reachtheir respective equilibrium temperatures. The liquid fuel temperatureinto the engine shall be maintained at 100 anddegrees;F (38 anddegrees;C)andplusmin;10anddegrees;F (5.5 anddegrees;C) and the intake air temperature shall be maintainedat 70 anddegrees;F (21 anddegrees;C)andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (2.7 anddegrees;C).(iv) Increase the coolant system temperatures until the highest coolanttemperature is 205 anddegrees;F to 212 anddegrees;F (96 anddegrees;C to 100 anddegrees;C),or to the maximum temperature specified by the applicant, if lower. (v) After all coolant system temperatures stabilize, operate the enginefor 1 hour. (vi) The ambient temperature shall be between 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C)and 104 anddegrees;F (40 anddegrees;C) throughout the tests. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance.</T3> The surface temperature of any externalsurface of the diesel power package shall not exceed 302 anddegrees;F (150anddegrees;C) during the test. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.117</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exhaust gas cooling efficiency tests. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures.</T3> (1) Follow the procedures specified in andSection;7.116(a) of this subpart. (2) Install a temperature measuring device to measure the exhaust gas temperatureat discharge from the exhaust system. The temperature measuring deviceshall be accurate to andplusmin;1 percent of the indicated reading or andplusmin;5anddegrees;F (andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C), whichever is greater. (3) Determine the exhaust gas temperature at discharge from the exhaustsystem. (b) <T3>Acceptable performance.</T3> The exhaust gas temperature at dischargefrom the exhaust system shall not exceed 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.118</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safety system controls tests. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Test procedures.</T3> (1) Prior to testing, perform the tasks specifiedin andSection; 7.116(a)(1) of this subpart and install sufficient temperaturemeasuring devices to measure the highest coolant temperature and exhaustgas temperature at discharge from the exhaust system. The temperature measuringdevice shall be accurate to andplusmin;1 percent of the indicated readingor andplusmin;5 anddegrees;F (andplusmin;3 anddegrees;C), whichever is greater.(2) Determine the effectiveness of the coolant system temperature shutdownsensors which will automatically activate the safety shutdown system andstop the engine before the water temperature in the cooling jackets exceedsmanufacturer's specifications or 212 anddegrees;F (100 anddegrees;C), whicheveris lower, by operating the engine and causing the water in the coolingjackets to exceed the specified temperature. (3) Determine the effectiveness of the temperature sensor in the exhaustgas stream which will automatically activate the safety shutdown systemand stop the engine before the cooled exhaust gas temperature exceeds 302anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C) shall be determined by operating the engineand causing the cooled exhaust gas to exceed the specified temperature.(4) Determine the effectiveness of the device in the intake system whichis designed to shut off the air supply and stop the engine for emergencypurposes with the engine operating at both a high idle speed/no load conditionand an idle speed/no load condition. Run the engine and activate the emergencyintake air shutoff device. (5) Determine the total vacuum of the complete intake system, includingthe air cleaner, with the engine operating as follows: (i) At high idle speed/no load condition for normally aspirated engines.(ii) At rated speed and maximum fuel delivery for turbocharged engines.(6) Determine the total exhaust backpressure with the exhaust conditionerfilled to the high or normal operating water level, if applicable, andwith the engine operating as specified in paragraph (a)(5) of this section.(b) <T3>Acceptable performance.</T3> Tests of the safety system controls shallresult in the following: (1) The coolant system temperature shutdown sensor shall automaticallyactivate the safety shutdown system and stop the engine before the watertemperature in the cooling jackets exceeds manufacturer's specificationsor 212 anddegrees;F (100 anddegrees;C), whichever is lower. (2) The temperature sensor in the exhaust gas stream shall automaticallyactivate the safety shutdown system and stop the engine before the cooledexhaust gas exceeds 302 anddegrees;F (150 anddegrees;C). (3) The emergency intake air shutoff device shall operate immediately whenactivated and stop the engine within 15 seconds. (4) The total intake vacuum and the total exhaust backpressure shall notexceed the engine manufacturer's specifications. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.119</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval marking. </ITAG>Each approved diesel power package shall be identified by a legible andpermanent approval plate inscribed with the assigned MSHA approval numberand securely attached to the diesel power package. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.120</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Post-approval product audit. </ITAG>Upon request by MSHA, but not more than once a year except for cause, theapproval-holder shall make an approved diesel power package available foraudit at no cost. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.121</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">New technology. </ITAG>MSHA may approve a diesel power package that incorporates technology forwhich the requirements of this subpart are not applicable if MSHA determinesthat the diesel power package is as safe as those which meet the requirementsof this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 7.122</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Power package checklist. </ITAG>Each diesel power package bearing an MSHA approval plate shall be accompaniedby a power package checklist. The power package checklist shall consistof a list of specific features that must be checked and tests that mustbe performed to determine if a previously approved diesel power packageis in approved condition. Test procedures shall be specified in sufficientdetail to allow evaluation to be made without reference to other documents.Illustrations shall be used to fully identify the approved configurationof the diesel power package. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 70_[AMENDED] </ITAG>B. It is proposed to amend 30 CFR part 70 as follows: The heading of part 70 is revised to read as follows: ``HEALTH STANDARDS_UNDERGROUNDCOAL MINES.'' 2. The authority citation for part 70 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 30 U.S.C. 811, 813(h), 957 and 961.</ITAG>3. Subparts G_S are reserved and a new subpart T is added to part 70 toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart T_Diesel-Powered Equipment Exposure Monitoring </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">70.1900 Exposure monitoring_general requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">70.1901 Personal exposure monitoring_general requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart T_Diesel-Powered Equipment Exposure Monitoring </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 70.1900</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exposure monitoring_general requirements. </ITAG>(a) Weekly area samples of CO, NO, and NO<T2>2</T2> shall be taken in the immediate return airways of each splitof air where diesel equipment is used in a mine. (1) When fuel is used which contains 0.25 percent sulfur or less, the mineoperator shall provide a certified statement as to the sulfur content ofthe fuel.(2) When fuel is used which contains more than 0.25 percent of sulfur,weekly area samples of SO<T2>2</T2> shall be taken. (b) Weekly exposure monitoring of the gases listed in paragraph (a) ofthis section shall be conducted pursuant to andSection; 72.200(c), (d), (e),and (f) \1\<NOTE/> of this title and shall be collected during periods whencontaminant concentrations are representative of peak exposures to minersat risk, and when required under andSection; 72.200(a)(1) of this title.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Proposed exposure monitoring requirements under andSection;72.200 and permissible exposure limits under andSection; 72.100 have beenpreviously published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on August 29, 1989 (54 FR 35760) under MSHA'sair quality proposed rule. (c) When the results of sampling conducted under this section exceed 50percent of the permissible exposure limit concentration listed in TableB-1, andSection; 72.100 of this title, personal exposure monitoring shallbe conducted according to andSection; 70.1901 of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 70.1901 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personal exposure monitoring_general requirements. </ITAG>(a) The exposure of all miners shall be maintained at or below the appropriatepermissible exposure limit. When work shifts are greater than 8 hours induration, 8-hour time weighted averages shall be adjusted proportionatelyin accordance with andSection;  72.100(b) of this title. (b) When the results of area sampling conducted in accordance with andSection;70.1900 of the part exceed 50 percent of the specified permissible exposurelimit listed in Table B-1, andSection; 72.100 of this title, the personalexposure of miners that are representative of the affected miners' exposuresshall be   monitored. This monitoring shall be conducted according to andSection;72.200 (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this title. (c) When personal monitoring results indicate levels greater than 75 percentof the appropriate permissible exposure limit, personal monitoring shallbe conducted on each operational shift of the area affected. Monitoringshall be conducted according to andSection; 72.200 (c), (d), (e), (f) and(g) of this title. (d) When personal exposure monitoring results indicate levels less than100 percent of the appropriate permissible exposure limit with 95 percentconfidence, the area sampling required under andSection; 70.1900 of thispart shall be reinstituted. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 75_[AMENDED] </ITAG>C. It is proposed to amend 30 CFR part 75 as follows: 1. The authority citation for part 75 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>30 U.S.C. 811, 957, and 961.</ITAG>2. A new andSection; 75.390 is added to subpart D as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Ventilation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.390 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ventilating air where diesel-powered equipment is operated. </ITAG>(a) The minimum quantities of air in any split where any individual unitof diesel-powered equipment is being operated shall be at least that specifiedon the approval plate for that equipment. (b) The minimum quantities of air in any split where any diesel-poweredequipment is operated shall be specified in the mine ventilation plan asfollows: (1) Where multiple diesel units are regularly operated, the minimum quantityshall be at least 100 percent of the highest approval plate air quantityplus 75 percent of the next highest quantity plus 50 percent of the approvalplate quantity of each additional unit operating in that split. Such airquantity shall be maintained in the last open crosscut of each workingsection or in the intake splits of longwall sections. These quantitiesshall also be maintained when face equipment is being installed or removed.(2) If the particulate index indicates that air quantities in excess ofthose required in paragraph (b)(1) of this section are required to maintainparticulate levels below applicable standards, minimum quantities shallbe determined considering the particulate index with particulate indicesfor multiple units being additive. (3) The following equipment may be excluded in the calculations requiredby paragraph (b) (1) or (2) of this section: (i) Equipment meeting the requirements of andSection; 75.1908 of this part,except diesel-powered air compressors which are regularly used. (ii) Equipment that discharges its exhaust directly into a return air course.(iii) Other equipment having duty cycles such that the emissions wouldnot significantly affect the exposure of miners in that split if such equipmentexclusion is approved by the District Manager. (4) Modification of the required ventilation quantities, except those specifiedin paragraph (a) of this section, may be approved if the results of a comprehensivepersonal monitoring program which represents the affected area of the mineindicate that exposure levels are below 75 percent of the applicable contaminantstandards with 95 percent confidence. The following information shall besubmitted to the District Manager for consideration of approval of themodified air quantity: (i) The minimum quantity being proposed. (ii) The equipment operating limitations and conditions and area of themine for which the modification applies. (iii) The sampling plan including the occupations sampled, actual air quantitiesduring the monitoring, contaminants sampled, and the sampling and analyticalmethods used including the accuracies and precisions. (iv) An evaluation of the results, including actual data collected, demonstratingthe exposure levels with 95 percent confidence. (v) The records required by andSection; 70.1901 of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>3. A new subpart T is added to part 75 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart T_Diesel-Powered Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1900 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1901 Diesel fuel requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1902 Underground diesel fuel storage facilities_general requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1903 Diesel fuel storage facilities; construction and safety precautions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1904 Underground diesel fuel storage tanks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1905 Transfer of diesel fuel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1906 Containers for the transport of diesel fuel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1907 Approved diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1908 Limited class equipment_scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1909 Limited class equipment design and performance requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1910 Stationary diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1911 Fire suppression systems for mobile diesel-powered equipmentand fuel transportation units. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1912 Fire suppression systems for diesel fuel storage areas andstationary diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1913 Starting aids. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1914 Maintenance of diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1915 Training and qualification of diesel mechanics. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.19l6 Procedures for approval and administration of diesel mechanictraining and qualification programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.1917 Operating speed of diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart T_Diesel-Powered Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1900 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>The following definitions apply in this subpart. <T3>Fixed underground diesel fuel storage facility. </T3>A facility designedand constructed to remain at one location for an extended period of timefor the storage or dispensing of diesel fuel, and which does not move asmining progresses. <T3>Mobile underground diesel fuel storage facility. </T3>A facility designedand constructed to provide for the short-term storage or dispensing ofdiesel fuel and which moves as mining progresses. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1901 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diesel fuel requirements. </ITAG>Diesel-powered equipment shall be used underground only with low volatilehydrocarbon fuel classified as ASTM D975 No. 2D diesel fuel and which hasa flash point of 125 anddegrees;F or greater at standard temperature andpressure. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1902 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Underground diesel fuel storage facilities_general requirements. </ITAG>(a) No more than 1000 gallons of diesel fuel shall be stored in a fixedunderground diesel fuel storage facility. (b) No more than 500 gallons of diesel fuel shall be stored in a mobileunderground diesel fuel storage facility. (c) Fixed and mobile underground diesel fuel storage facilities shall belocated_ (1) At least 100 feet from shafts, slopes, shops, explosives magazines;(2) At least 25 feet from trolley wires, haulageways, power cables, andelectric equipment not necessary for the operation of the storage facilities;and, (3) In an area as dry as practicable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1903 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diesel fuel storage facilities; construction and safety precautions.</ITAG>(a) Fixed and mobile underground diesel fuel storage facilities shall be_(1) Constructed of noncombustible materials and provided with a means forautomatic enclosure; (2) Ventilated directly into the return air course using noncombustiblematerials; (3) Equipped with an automatic fire suppression system complying with andSection;75.1912 of this part; (4) Equipped with at least two portable 20 pound multipurpose dry chemicaltype fire extinguishers; (5) Marked with conspicuous signs designating combustible liquid storage.(b) Fixed diesel fuel underground storage facilities shall be providedwith a drain system and a sump capable of holding 150 percent of the maximumcapacity of the fuel storage system. (c) Welding or cutting other than that performed in accordance with paragraph(d) of this section shall not be done within 50 feet of a diesel fuel storagefacility. (d) When it is necessary to weld, cut, or solder pipelines, cylinders,tanks, or containers that may have contained diesel fuel, these practicesshall be followed: (1) Cutting or welding shall not be performed on or within containers ortanks that have contained combustible or flammable materials until suchcontainers or tanks have been thoroughly purged and cleaned or inertedand a vent or opening is provided to allow for sufficient release of anybuildup pressure before heat is applied.(2) Diesel fuel shall not be allowed to enter pipelines or containers thathave been welded, soldered, brazed, or cut until the metal has cooled toambient temperature. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1904</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Underground diesel fuel storage tanks. </ITAG>(a) Unless located in dry areas, underground diesel fuel storage facilitytanks shall be_(1) Placed on noncombustible supports so that the tanks are at least 6inches above water or wet bottom, or(2) Constructed of noncorrosive material.(b) Underground diesel fuel storage tanks shall have the following: (1) Devices for venting. (2) Self-closing caps. (3) Vent pipes at least as large as the fill or withdrawal connection,whichever is larger, but not less than l\1/4\ inch nominal inside diameter.(4) Liquid tight connections for all tank openings that are_ (i) Identified by conspicuous markings; and (ii) Closed when not in use. (5) Vent pipes that drain toward the tank without sagging and that arehigher than the fill pipe opening. (6) Shutoff valves located within 1 inch of the tank shell on each connectionthrough which liquid can normally flow. (c) When tanks are provided with openings for manual gauging, liquid tightcaps or covers shall be provided and shall be kept closed when not openfor gauging. (d) Tanks located in fixed underground diesel fuel storage facilities shallbe supported by concrete, masonry, protected steel, or equivalent supports,and except for steel saddles less than 12 inches from the floor, steelsupports shall be protected by materials having a fire resistance ratingof not less than two hours. (e) Before being placed in service, tanks shall be tested for strengthand leakage at a pressure equal to the static head. (f) Tanks located in fixed underground diesel fuel storage facilities shallbe provided with an automatic closing, heat-actuated valve on each withdrawalconnection below the liquid level, except for connections used for emergencydisposal. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1905</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transfer of diesel fuel. </ITAG>(a) When diesel fuel is transferred by means of a pump and a hose equippedwith a nozzle containing a self-closing valve, a powered pump may be usedonly if_(1) The hose is equipped with a nozzle containing a self-closing valvewithout a latch-open device; and (2) The pump is equipped with an accessible emergency shutoff switch. (b) Diesel fuel shall not be transferred using compressed gas. (c) Diesel fuel shall not be transferred to the fuel tank of diesel-poweredequipment while its engine is running. (d) Diesel fuel piping systems shall be designed and operated as dry systemsunless an automatic shutdown is incorporated that activates an alarm systemand prevents accidental loss or spillage of fuel. (e) All piping, valves and fittings shall be_(1) Capable of withstanding working pressures and stresses; (2) Capable of withstanding four times the static pressures; (3) Compatible with diesel fuel; and (4) Maintained in a manner which prevents leakage. (f) Vertical pipelines shall have manual shutoff valves installed at thesurface filling point, and at the underground discharge point. (g) If fuel lines are not buried in the ground, shutoff valves shall belocated every 300 feet. (h) Shutoff valves shall be installed at each branch line where the branchline joins the main line. (i) Diesel fuel piping systems shall be used only to transport fuel fromthe surface directly to a fixed underground diesel fuel storage facility.(j) When boreholes are used, the diesel fuel piping system shall not belocated in a borehole with electric power cables. (k) Diesel fuel piping systems located in entries shall not be locatedon the same side of the entry as electric cables or powerlines. (l) Diesel fuel piping systems shall be protected and located to preventphysical damage. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1906</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Containers for the transport of diesel fuel. </ITAG>(a) Diesel fuel shall be transported only in containers specifically designedfor the transport of diesel fuel.(b) No more than one safety can, conspicuously marked, shall be transportedon a vehicle at any time. (c) Containers other than safety cans used to transport diesel fuel shallbe provided with the following: (1) Devices for venting. (2) Self-closing caps. (3) Vent pipes at least as large as the fill or withdrawal connection,whichever is larger, but not less than l\1/4\ inch nominal inside diameter.(4) Liquid tight connections for all container openings that are_(i) Identified by conspicuous markings; and (ii) Closed when not in use. (5) Shutoff valves located within l inch of the tank shell on each connectionthrough which liquid can normally flow. (d) When tanks are provided with openings for manual gauging, liquid tightcaps or covers shall be provided and shall be kept closed when not openfor gauging. (e) Containers used for the transport of diesel fuel shall not exceed acapacity of 500 gallons. (f) Containers, other than safety cans, used for the transport of dieselfuel shall be permanently fixed to the transportation unit. (g) Diesel fuel shall not be transported on conveyor belts. (h) When transporting diesel fuel in containers other than safety cansa fire extinguisher shall be provided on each end of the transportationunit. The fire extinguishers shall be multipurpose type dry chemical fireextinguishers containing a nominal weight of 20 pounds. (i) Diesel fuel transportation units shall have a fire suppression systemwhich meets the requirements of andSection; 75.1911 of this part. (j) When the distance between a diesel fuel transportation unit and anenergized trolley wire at any location is less than 12 inches, the requirementsof andSection; 75.1003-2 of this part shall be followed. (k) Unattended diesel fuel transportation units shall be parked only infixed or mobile underground diesel fuel storage facilities. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1907</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Approved diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG>(a) All diesel-powered equipment taken underground, except equipment meetingthe requirements of andSection;andSection; 75.1909 or 75.1910 of this part,shall be approved under subparts H and I \1\<NOTE/> of part 7 of this title or meet the alternative requirementsset forth below.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Approval requirements for diesel equipment, as a unit,are currently under development. Public comments and suggestions on theapproach to be taken are solicited in an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking,published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. MSHA intends that when promulgated, as SubpartsI and J, these approval requirements would be made applicable to dieselpowered equipment in accordance with andSection; 75.1907. (1) Only diesel-powered equipment approved under subpart H of part 7 orpart 36 of this title shall be used where permissible electric equipmentis required. (2) Any diesel-powered equipment approved under part 36 of this title shallbe provided with additional safety features in accordance with the followingtime schedules:  (i) Upon the effective date of this section, this equipment shall havea power package that limits surface temperatures to those specified insubpart F of part 7 of this title. (ii) As of six months after the effective date of this section, this equipmentshall have a fire suppression system installed which meets the requirementsof andSection; 75.1910 of this part. (iii) As of 24 months after the effective date of this section, this equipmentshall have a particulate index and dilution air quantity determined inaccordance with subpart E of part 7 of this title. (3) Self-propelled and portable attended diesel-powered equipment usedwhere nonpermissible electric equipment is permitted which is not approvedin accordance with subparts H or I of part 7 or part 36 of this title shallbe used in accordance with the following time schedules: (i) As of 12 months after the effective date of this section, this equipmentmust meet the requirements of andSection; 75.1909 of this part, except thatsuch equipment does not need an engine approved in accordance with subpartE of part 7 of this title. (ii) As of 24 months after the effective date of this section, diesel-poweredequipment except that equipment meeting the requirements of andSection; 75.1908of this part, shall use a power package meeting the requirements of subpartsF or G of part 7 of this title. (iii) As of 24 months after the effective date of this section, equipmentmeeting the requirements of andSection; 75.1908 of this part must have anengine approved in accordance with subpart E of part 7 of this title. (iv) An operator may apply to the Director of Technical Support, MSHA,4015 Wilson Boulevard, Arlington, Virginia 22203 for approval of the extendeduse of locomotives which do not have a power package approved pursuantto subpart F or G of part 7 of this title. The Director of Technical Supportmay approve such extended use if approved power packages suitable for themine conditions and locomotive design are not available. The approval willbe limited to the time until such technology is available. The approvalmay include such additional safety features, administrative procedures,and operating practices as necessary to achieve protection from fires andreduce exposure to exhaust contaminants. (4) As of 60 months after the effective date of this section, only newdiesel-powered equipment approved pursuant to subparts H or I of part 7of this title or meeting the requirements of andSection;andSection; 75.1909or 75.1910 of this part shall be introduced in underground coal mines.(b) Diesel-powered ambulances and firefighting equipment shall constitutea special class of equipment that shall only be permitted for use undergroundaccording to the mine evacuation plan required under andSection; 75.1101-23of this part. (c) As of 12 months after the effective date of this section, all stationarydiesel-powered equipment shall meet the requirements specified in andSection;75.1910 of this part with the exception of the requirement for a certifiedpower package pursuant to subpart F or G of part 7 of this title. (d) As of 24 months after the effective date of this section, all stationarydiesel-powered equipment shall meet the requirements specified in andSection;75.1910 of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1908</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Limited class equipment_scope. </ITAG>(a) Only diesel-powered equipment meeting the requirements of this sectionshall be considered limited class equipment which may be used in accordancewith andSection; 75.1907(a)(2) of this part. This equipment shall_(1) Use engines of less than 90 horsepower and not be turbocharged; (2) Not use hydraulic systems; (3) If self-propelled, have a vehicle weight of less than 6,000 pounds;(4) If portable, be limited to compressors and welders. (b) Altitude compensation devices may be used. For limited class equipmentusing altitude compensating devices, fuel injection rates shall be testedand certified by the operator as to approval compliance upon installationof the altitude compensation device or when maintenance of the fuel injectionpump is performed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1909</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Limited class equipment design and performance requirements. </ITAG>(a) Limited class equipment shall have the following: (1) An engine approved under subpart E of part 7 of this title. (2) A fire suppression system designed and installed pursuant to andSection;75.1911 of this part.(3) A fuel system specifically designed for diesel fuel meeting the followingrequirements: (i) A fuel tank that is substantially constructed and protected from collisiondamages. The fuel tank shall be of leakproof construction. A drain plugshall be provided. A vent opening shall be provided that maintains atmosphericpressure in the tank. The size of the vent shall prevent fuel from splashingout of the vent opening. A self-closing or tethered filler cap shall beused. The tank, filler and vent shall be located so that any spillage duringrefueling, or leaks, will not contact hot engine surfaces. (ii) Fuel line piping shall be metal and clamped. Location of the primaryfuel lines shall be such that leaks do not contact hot surfaces. The fuellines shall be separated from electrical wiring and protected from damagein ordinary use. (iii) A manual shutoff valve shall be installed in the fuel system nearthe tank. (iv) Fuel filters and a water strainer shall be provided. (4) A sensor to monitor the temperature and provide a visual warning ofan overheated cylinder head on air cooled engines. (5) A temperature sensor located in the engine compartment that automaticallyactivates an intake air shutdown device to stop the engine before the enginecompartment temperature exceeds the activation temperature of the firesuppression system. (6) Electrical circuits and components on equipment with storage batteriesand integral charging systems shall conform to the following: (i) Each electric conductor from the battery to the starting motor shallbe protected against short circuit by fuses or other circuit interruptingdevices placed as near as practicable to the battery terminals.(ii) Fuses or other automatic circuit-interrupting devices shall be insertedin each conductor of all branch circuits that are connected to the maincircuit between the battery and charging generator. Headlight circuitsand circuits for instruments and instrument panel lights are consideredas being branch circuits.(iii) The electrical system shall be equipped with a circuit-interruptingdevice by means of which all power conductors can be deenergized. The deviceshall be located as close as practicable to the battery terminals. A manuallyoperated controller will not be acceptable as a service switch. Circuit-interruptingdevices and other controls shall be so designed that they can be operatedwithout opening any compartment in which they may be enclosed. These devicesshall not automatically reset after being actuated and shall meet the applicablerequirements of andSection; 75.520 of this part. All magnetic circuit-interruptingdevices shall be mounted in a manner to preclude the possibility of theirclosing by gravity.(iv) Each motor and charging generator shall be protected by an automaticovercurrent device. One protective device will be acceptable when two motorsof the same rating operate simultaneously and perform virtually the sameduty. (v) Overload and short circuit protection shall be provided for electriccircuits and components in accordance with andSection;andSection; 75.518 and75.518-1 of this part. (vi) Electric conductors shall meet the applicable requirements of andSection;andSection;75.513 and 75.513-1 of this part. Each ungrounded conductor shall haveinsulation compatible with the impressed voltage. Insulation shall be selectedwith special reference to its ability to resist deterioration from engineheat and oil. Conductors for equipment or accessories added to a vehicle'selectrical system, after manufacture, shall not be smaller than No. 14AWG in size. (vii) All wiring shall have adequate mechanical and electrical protectionto minimize damage to the cable that might result in short circuits. (viii) Sharp edges and corners shall be removed at all points where thereis a possibility of damaging wires, cables, or conduits by cutting or abrasion.Cables within a battery box shall be protected against abrasion of theinsulation. In addition, wiring shall be installed in accordance with andSection;75.515 of this part, as applicable. (ix) All electrical connections and splices shall meet the applicable requirementsof andSection; 75.514 of this part. Only bolted connectors may be used onbattery terminals. (x) The battery shall be secured to prevent movement and shall be protectedfrom external damage by position, or be enclosed in a box. Insulation shallbe provided to prevent battery terminals from contacting conducting surfaces.Batteries that are not protected from external damage by position shallbe enclosed in a box. (xi) A battery box, including the cover, shall be constructed of steelwith a minimum thickness of \3/16\-inch. Materials other than steel thatprovide equivalent strength will be considered. (xii) Battery-box covers shall be lined with a flame-resistant insulatingmaterial, permanently attached to the underside of the cover, unless equivalentprotection is provided. Battery-box covers shall be provided with a meansfor securing them in closed position. At least \1/2\ inch of airspace shallbe provided between the underside of the cover and the top of the battery,including terminals. (xiii) Battery boxes shall be provided with ventilation openings to preventthe accumulation of flammable or toxic gases or vapors within the batterybox. The size and locations of openings for ventilation shall prevent directaccess to battery terminals. (xiv) The battery shall be insulated from the battery-box walls and supportedon insulating materials. Insulating materials that may be subject to chemicalreaction with electrolyte shall be treated to resist such action. (xv) Drainage holes shall be provided in the bottom of each battery box.(7) Adequate guarding to protect fuel and electric lines when such linespass near rotating parts. (8) Reflectors or warning lights mounted on the equipment which can bereadily seen in all directions. (b) Self-propelled limited class equipment shall have the following featuresin addition to those listed in paragraph (a) of this section: (1) An audible warning device conveniently located near the operator. (2) Service brakes for each wheel of the vehicle such that failure of onebrake line shall not result in a complete loss of service braking capability.(3) Service brakes that safely bring the fully loaded vehicle to a completestop on the maximum grade on which it is operated. (4) A parking brake that holds the equipment stationary despite any contractingof the brake parts, exhaustion of any nonmechanical source of energy orleakage. (5) Headlights, tail lights and back-up lights. (i) Units normally operated in both directions shall be equipped with headlightsfor both directions. (ii) Lights shall be protected from accidental damage. (c) Portable limited class equipment shall have the following featuresin addition to those listed in paragraph (a) of this section: (1) Sensors to monitor the operation of limited class portable equipmentand stop the engine when an equipment malfunction would result in the creationof a hazardous condition.(2) A means to prevent inadvertent movement of the equipment. (3) Safety chains or other suitable secondary connections on equipmentthat is being towed. (4) One portable 20-pound multipurpose fire extinguisher on each unit.(d) Portable limited class equipment shall not be operated unattended.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1910</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stationary diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG>(a) Unattended stationary diesel-powered equipment shall not be permittedwhere permissible electric equipment is required. (b) Stationary diesel-powered equipment shall have the following: (1) A diesel power package approved under subpart F or G of part 7 of thistitle. (2) A fuel system constructed in accordance with andSection; 75.2909(a)(3)of this part. (3) A maximum fuel supply limited to that needed for one shift operationunless the storage facility and tank are constructed in accordance withandSection;andSection; 75.1902, 75.1903 and 75.1904 of this part and are separatedfrom the stationary diesel-powered equipment by a noncombustible barrier.(c) Stationary diesel-powered equipment shall be located in a noncombustibleenclosure vented directly to the return air course. An automatic self-closingdoor may be used to form one side of the enclosure. Stationary diesel-poweredequipment shall have the following: (1) A fire suppression system designed and installed according to andSection;75.1912 of this part. (2) A means to shut down the diesel engine from the surface and preventrestarting. The remote shutdown shall be designed and installed to shutthe engine down if the system is not operating. (3) A methane monitor that automatically activates an engine intake airshutdown device at 1.0 percent methane concentration and which preventsrestarting. The methane monitor shall be placed to take a representativesample of the atmosphere in the noncombustible enclosure. (d) Unattended stationary diesel-powered equipment shall not be permittedin the primary intake escapeway. (e) Exhaust shall be discharged directly into the return air course. (f) A spark arrester shall be provided to eliminate sparks before the exhaustair enters the return air stream. (g) All hydraulic lines shall be mounted to protect them against damagein ordinary use, and they shall be routed to prevent leaks from contactinghot surfaces. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1911</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire suppression systems for mobile diesel-powered equipment and fueltransportation units. </ITAG>(a) An automatic multipurpose dry powder type fire suppression system suitablefor the intended application and listed or approved by a nationally recognizedindependent testing laboratory shall be installed. (1) The system shall be installed in accordance with the manufacturer'sspecifications and the limitations of the listing or approval. (2) The system shall be installed in a protected location or guarded tominimize physical damage from routine vehicle operations. (3) Suppressant agent distribution tubing or piping shall be secured andprotected against damage, including pinching, crimping, stretching, abrasion,and corrosion. (4) Discharge nozzles shall be positioned and aimed for maximum fire suppressioneffectiveness in the protected areas. Nozzles shall also be protected againstthe entrance of foreign materials such as mud, coal dust, or rock dustwhich could prevent proper discharge of suppressant agent. (b) The fire suppression system shall provide automatic fire detectionand suppression for the following: (1) The engine compartment and battery areas and air compressors for limitedclass equipment meeting the requirements of andSection; 75.1908 of this part.(2) The engine, transmission, hydraulic pumps and tanks, fuel tanks, exposedbrake units, air compressors and battery areas on all other mobile diesel-poweredequipment. (3) Fuel containers and electric panels or controls used during fuel transferoperations on fuel transportation units. (c) The fire suppression system shall include a system fault and fire alarmannunciator which can be seen and heard by the equipment operator. (d) The fire suppression system shall provide for automatic engine shutdown.Engine shutdown and discharge of suppressant agent may be delayed for amaximum of 15 seconds after the fire alarm annunciator alerts the operator.(e) At least two manual actuators shall be provided with at least one manualactuator at each end of the equipment. If the equipment is provided withan operator's compartment, one of the mechanical actuators shall be locatedin the compartment within easy reach of the operator. (f) The fire suppression system shall remain operative in the event ofengine shutdown, equipment electrical system failure, or failure of anyother equipment system. (g) The electrical components of each fire suppression system installedon equipment used where permissible electric equipment is required shallbe permissible or intrinsically safe and such components shall be maintainedin permissible or intrinsically safe condition. (h) If electrically operated, the detection and actuation circuits shallbe monitored and provided with status indicators showing power and circuitcontinuity. If not electrically operated, a means shall be provided toindicate the functional readiness status of the system. (i) All fire suppression devices shall be visually inspected at least onceeach week by a person qualified to make such inspections. (j) Each fire suppression device shall be tested and maintained in accordancewith the requirements specified in andSection; 75.1100 of this part, as applicable.(k) A record shall be maintained of the inspections required by this section.The record of the weekly inspections shall be maintained at an appropriatelocation for each fire suppression device.(1) All miners normally assigned to the active workings of the mine shallbe instructed about the hazards inherent to the operation of the fire suppressiondevices installed and, where appropriate, the safeguards available foreach device.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1912</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire suppression systems for diesel fuel storage areas and stationarydiesel-powered equipment.</ITAG>(a) An automaic multipurpose dry-powder type fire suppression system suitablefor the intended application and listed or approved by a nationally recognizedindependent testing laboratory shall be installed.(1) Inert or halogenated gas suppressant agents may be used only in unoccupiedand enclosed areas where the use of such suppressants would not pose atoxic hazard to persons.(2) Alternate types of fire suppression systems shall be approved in accordancewith andSection; 75.1107-13 of this part.(3) The system shall be installed in accordance with the manufacturer'sspecifications and the limitations of the listing or approval.(4) The system shall be installed in a protected location or guarded tominimize physical damage from routine vehicle operations.(5) Suppressant agent distribution tubing or piping shall be secured andprotected against damage, including pinching, crimping, stretching, abrasion,and corrosion. (6) Discharge nozzles shall be positioned and aimed for maximum fire suppressioneffectiveness in the protected areas. Nozzles must also be protected againstthe entrance of foreign materials such as mud, coal dust, and rock dust,that could prevent proper discharge of suppressant agent. (b) The fire suppression system shall provide automatic fire detectionand suppression for the following areas: (1) The engine, hydraulic pumps and tanks, fuel tanks, battery areas andthe stationary equipment being powered if such equipment poses a fire hazard.(2) The fuel storage tanks, containers, safety cans, pumps, electricalpanels and control equipment in fuel storage areas. (c) Audible and visual alarms to warn of fire or system faults shall beprovided at the protected area and at a surface location which is alwaysstaffed when personnel are underground who could be endangered by a fire.A means shall also be provided for warning all endangered personnel inthe event of fire. (d) Fire suppression systems shall include two manual actuators locatedas follows: (1) At least one within the fuel storage facility or noncombustible enclosurehousing stationary equipment. (2) At least one a safe distance away from the storage facility or equipmentenclosure and located in intake air. (e) The fire suppression system shall remain operative in the event ofelectrical system failure or engine shutdown. (f) If electrically operated, the detection and actuation circuits shallbe monitored and provided with status indicators showing power and circuitcontinuity. If not electrically operated, a means shall be provided toindicate the functional readiness status of the system. (g) Fire suppression devices shall be visually inspected at least onceeach week by a person qualified to make such inspections. (h) Each fire suppression device shall be tested and maintained in accordancewith the requirements specified in andSection; 75.1100 of this part as applicable.(i) A record shall be maintained of the inspections required by this section.The record of the weekly inspections may be maintained at an appropriatelocation for each fire suppression device. (j) All miners normally assigned to the active workings of the mine shallbe instructed about any hazards inherent to the operation of all fire suppressiondevices installed and, where appropriate, the safeguards available foreach device. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1913</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Starting aids. </ITAG>(a) When not in use containers for volatile fuel starting aids shall bestored in a fire proof enclosure. (b) Volatile fuel starting aids shall not be used or taken into areas wherepermissible equipment is required. (c) Volatile fuel starting aids shall be used in accordance with the specificrecommendations in the engine manufacturer's maintenance and operationmanual. (d) Volatile fuel starting aids shall not be used in the presence of openflames, or burning flame safety lamps, or when welding and cutting. (e) Volatile fuels starting aids shall not be used in any area where 1.0percent concentration of methane is detected. (f) Compressed oxygen or compressed flammable gases shall not be connectedto diesel air-start systems. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1914</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Maintenance of diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG>(a) Diesel-powered equipment shall be maintained in approved and safe conditionor removed from service. (1) Maintenance and repairs of approved features of diesel-powered equipmentshall be made only by a person qualified in accordance with andSection; 75.1915of this part. (2) The water scrubber system shall be drained and flushed at least onceon each shift that the diesel equipment is operated. (3) The intake air filter shall be replaced or serviced when dirty or whenthe intake air pressure drop device so indicates. (b) Mobile diesel-powered equipment that is to be used during a shift shallbe inspected by the equipment operator before being placed in operation.Equipment defects affecting safety shall be reported to the mine operator.(c) All diesel-powered equipment shall be examined and tested weekly bya person qualified in accordance with andSection; 75.1915 of this part. (1) Examinations and tests shall be conducted in accordance with approvedchecklists. (2) Persons performing weekly examinations and tests of diesel-poweredequipment shall certify by initials and date that the examination and testswere performed. (3) Certifications shall be retained for at least one year at a surfacelocation at the mine. (d) The mine operator shall develop and implement written standard operatingprocedures for testing and evaluating, on a weekly basis, the undilutedexhaust emissions of diesel engines in use underground. The proceduresshall include the following: (1) The method of achieving a repeatable loaded engine operating conditionfor each type of equipment. (2) Sampling and analytical methods which include calibration of instrumentationcapable of accurately detecting carbon-monoxide in the expected concentrations.(3) Evaluation and interpretation of the results. (4) The concentration or changes in concentration of carbon monoxide thatwill indicate a change in engine performance. Carbon monoxide concentrationsshall not exceed 2,500 parts per million. (5) The designation and training of the individual to perform the test.(6) The maintenance and retention of necessary records.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1915</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Training and qualification of diesel mechanics. </ITAG>(a) A diesel mechanic shall be qualified to perform maintenance and repairsof approved features of diesel equipment as required by andSection; 75.1914of this part only after successfully completing a training and qualificationprogram, including an examination, developed by the mine operator and approvedby MSHA as meeting the requirements of this section. (b) The examination shall require the applicant to demonstrate that theapplicant is capable of maintaining the equipment in approved conditionwith acceptable emissions and in safe operating condition. Successful completionof any written portion of a qualification examination shall require a scoreof 80 percent. (c) A qualified diesel mechanic shall complete annual retraining in accordancewith the approved program once every 12 months. (d) An approved training and qualification program shall contain the following:(1) A description of the course content, materials and teaching methodsto be used for initial training and retraining. (2) A copy of the qualification examination. (3) For retraining, a copy of the evaluation program to be used to assessthe knowledge, skills and ability of the mechanic to perform the requiredduties in accordance with applicable requirements. (e) Courses in a training and retraining program shall_(1) Be presented by a qualified diesel mechanic or other instructor determinedby MSHA to be qualified; (2) Be of sufficient length and content to prepare or maintain a personto perform the duties of a diesel mechanic in accordance with all applicableregulatory requirements; (3) Address each piece of diesel equipment in use at the mine; and(4) Address, at a minimum, the following areas of instruction:(i) The requirements of subpart T of this part.(ii) Use of appropriate power package or machine check lists to conductappropriate tests to ensure that diesel equipment is in approved condition,including emission levels and safe operation.(iii) Proper maintenance of approved features and the correct use of theappropriate maintenance manuals; including machine adjustments, service,and assembly.(iv) Diesel equipment fire protection system tests and maintenance.(v) Fire ignition sources and their control or elimination.(iv) Safe fueling procedures and maintenance of the fuel system of themachine.(vii) Intake air system maintenance and tests.(viii) Engine shutdown device tests and maintenance.(ix) Other subjects determined by the District Manager to be necessaryto address specific health and safety needs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1916</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for approval and administration of diesel mechanic trainingand qualification programs. </ITAG>(a) Mine operators who use diesel-powered equipment underground shall submitto the appropriate District Manager not later than [90 days after publicationof the final rule] a training and qualification program for diesel mechanics.(b) As of [180 days after the effective date of the final rule] all personsperforming the duties of a diesel mechanic shall be initially qualifiedin accordance with andSection; 75.1915 of this part. (c) The training and qualification program submitted to the District Managershall contain the following: (1) The company name, mine name, and MSHA identification number of themine. (2) A list of instructors and the courses they are qualified to teach.(3) The location where the instruction will take place. (4) A description of the teaching methods and the course materials whichare to be used in the training. (5) A copy of the qualification examination and, in the case of annualretraining, the evaluation program to be used. (d) The operator shall furnish to the representative of the miners a copyof the training and qualification program 14 days prior to its submissionto the District Manager. Where a miner's representative is not designated,a copy of the program shall be posted on the mine bulletin board l4 daysprior to its submission to the District Manager. Written comments receivedby the operator from miners or their representatives shall be submittedto the District Manager. Miners or their representatives may submit writtencomments directly to the District Manager. (e) Revisions to the program may be initiated by the mine operator or theDistrict Manager to gain approval, retain approval, or to address trainingneeds, changes or modifications, and new technology. (f) In the event the District Manager disapproves a program or a revisionof the program, the District Manager shall notify the mine operator inwriting of_ (1) The specific changes or items of deficiency; (2) The action necessary to effect the changes or bring the disapprovedprogram or modification into compliance; and (3) The deadline for the completion of the revision. (g) Failure of a qualified diesel mechanic to complete required retrainingwithin 3 years of initial training and qualification or the most recentannual retraining shall result in a lapse of qualification. A mechanicwhose qualification lapses shall complete initial training and qualificationto regain qualification. (h) The District Manager may revoke a diesel mechanic's qualificationsfor cause, including intentional violation of the requirements of part75 or the intentional defeat of any safety or health device. Before anyrevocation becomes effective, the District Manager shall send written reasonsfor revocation to the diesel mechanic, who shall be given ten calendardays to respond. Unless otherwise determined by the District Manager, revocationshall become effective ten days from notification to the diesel mechanic.A decision by the District Manager, to revoke a diesel mechanic's qualification,may be appealed by the diesel mechanic to the Administrator for Coal MineSafety and Health, MSHA, 4015 Wilson Boulevard, Arlington, Virginia 22203.Such an appeal shall be submitted to the Administrator within 30 days fromthe effective date of the revocation. Upon revocation of a diesel mechanic'squalification, the District Manager shall immediately notify the appropriatemine operator. (i) The operator shall maintain a copy of the MSHA approved training andqualification program available at the mine site. This copy shall containa current instructor list. (j) The operator shall maintain available for inspection, at the mine site,the names of all persons qualified as underground diesel mechanics, datesof qualification, and the date of the last annual retraining. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.1917</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating speed of diesel-powered equipment. </ITAG>(a) All roadways where diesel-powered equipment is operated shall be maintainedas free as practicable from bottom irregularities, debris and wet or muddyconditions that affect control of the equipment. (b) Diesel-powered equipment operating speeds shall be consistent withconditions of roadways, grades, clearances, visibility and traffic andtype of equipment used. (c) Mobile diesel-powered equipment operators shall have full control ofthe equipment while it is in motion. (d) Traffic rules, including speed, signals and warning signs, shall bestandardized at each mine and posted.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23170 Filed 10-3-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>